रजिस्ट्री सं. डी.एल.- 33004/99 REGD. No. 0. L.-33004/99 


Jitd = Vista 
Che Gazette of India 


Ot. GH. -S7. Wet. -37.-2902024-258233 
CG-DL-E-2902024-258233 


असाधारण 
EXTRAORDINARY 
भाग Wi—ave 4 
PART IJ—Section 4 


प्राधिकार से प्रकाशित 
PUBLISHED BY AUTHORITY 
सं. 842] नई दिल्‍ली, सोमवार, अक्तूबर 2, 2024/आशिवन 29, 946 
No. 842] NEW DELHI, MONDAY, OCTOBER 2], 2024/ASVINA 29, 946 


भारतीय उपचर्या परिषद्‌ 
अधिसूचना 
नई दिल्‍ली, 7 अक्तूबर, 2024 
भारतीय उपचर्या परिषद्‌ (नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग (एनपीजीएन) - स्नातकोत्तर आवासीय 
कार्यक्रम) विनियम, 2023 
फा. सं. 44-7/ 2024-3 Uae? (09).--समय-समय पर यथासंशोधित भारतीय उपचर्या परिषद्‌ अधिनियम, 
4947 (4947 HT Wem) की धारा 460) के अधीन प्रदत्त शक्तियों का प्रयोग करते हुए, भारतीय उपचर्या परिषद्‌ 
एतद्दवारा निम्नलिखित विनियम बनाती है, यथा - 
4. लघु शीर्षक एवं प्रवर्तन 
i ये विनियम भारतीय उपचर्या परिषद्‌ (नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग (एनपीजीएन) - 
स्नातकोत्तर आवासीय कार्यक्रम) विनियम, 2023 कहे जाएंगे। 
i, ये विनियम भारत के राजपत्र में इनकी अधिसूचना की तिथि से प्रभावी होंगे। 
2. परिभाषाएं 
इन विनियमों में, जब तक कि संदर्भ से अन्यथा अपेक्षित न हो, 
i. अधिनियम' का अभिप्राय समय-समय पर यथासंशोधित भारतीय उपचर्या परिषद्‌, 4947 (4947 का जा शा) 
से है; 
i, 'परिषद्‌' का अभिप्राय अधिनियम के तहत गठित भारतीय उपचर्या परिषद्‌ से है; 
ii, 'एसएनआरसी”' का अभिप्राय संबंधित राज्य सरकारों द्वारा किसी भी नाम से गठित राज्य उपचर्या एवं 
प्रसाविका पंजीकरण परिषद्‌ से है; 
6840 6ा/2024 (l) 


2 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


a 


iv. आरएन US ARV का अभिप्राय एक पंजीकृत उपचर्या एवं पंजीकृत wader (आरएन एंड आरएम) से है 
और एक ऐसे नर्स को दर्शाता है जिसने मान्यता प्राप्त नर्सिंग स्नातक (बी.एससी. नर्सिंग) या डिप्लोमा इन 
जनरल नर्सिंग एंड मिडवाइफरी (जीएनएम) पाठ्यक्रम, जैसा कि परिषद्‌ द्वारा निर्धारित किया गया हो, 
सफलतापूर्वक पूरा कर लिया हो और किसी एक एसएनआरसी में पंजीकृत उपचर्या एवं पंजीकृत प्रसाविका के 
रूप में पंजीकृत हो; 

५. नर्स पंजीकरण एवं ट्रैकिंग प्रणली (एनआरटीएस)' का अभिप्राय भारतीय उपचर्या परिषद्‌ द्वारा राष्ट्रीय सूचना 
विज्ञान केंद्र (एनआईसी), भारत सरकार के सहयोग से विकसित सॉफ्टवेयर प्रणाली से है, जिसे भारतीय 
उपचर्या रजिस्टर के रखरखाव व संचालन के लिए एनआईसी द्वारा eee किया गया है। इसमें पंजीकृत 
उपचर्या एवं पंजीकृत प्रसाविका (आरएन एंड आरएम),पंजीकृत सहायक नर्स मिडवाइफ 
(आरएएनएम) / पंजीकृत महिला स्वास्थ्य परिदर्शिका (आरएलएचवी) के आंकड़ों के संग्रह के लिए ‘sme’ 
बायोमेट्रिक प्रमाणीकरण पर आधारित मानकीकृत प्रारूप हैं; 

vi. 'एनयूआईडी' का अभिप्राय एनआरटीएस प्रणाली द्वारा प्रत्याशी को दिया जाने वाला ato यूनिक 
आइडेंटिफिकेशन नंबर से है; 

vii, जनरल नर्सिंग एंड मिडवाइफरी (जीएनएम)' का अभिप्राय परिषद्‌ द्वारा अधिनियम की धारा 40 के तहत 
स्वीकृत तथा अधिनियम की अनुसूची के भाग-८ में शामिल डिप्लोमा इन जनरल नर्सिंग एंड मिडवाइफरी 
प्रशिक्षण से है। 

नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग (एनपीजीएन) - स्नातकोत्तर आवासीय कार्यक्रम 

L परिचय एवं पृष्ठभूमि 
डब्ल्यूएचओ के आधारभूत आंकड़ों (2022) के अनुसार विश्व में वयस्क लोगों की अनुमानित आयु में वृद्धि हुई है। 

वृद्ध लोगों की संख्या में यह वृद्धि रोग तथा विकलांगता के बोझ को बढ़ाती है, और स्वास्थ्य क्षेत्र के साथ-साथ 
सामाजिक एवं आर्थिक बुनियादी ढांचे के लिए भी एक जबरदस्त चुनौती पेश करती है। राष्ट्रीय स्वास्थ्य नीति (2047), 
राष्ट्रीय जनसंख्या नीति (20:5) और बुजुर्ग स्वास्थ्य देखभाल राष्ट्रीय कार्यक्रम (2044) में बुजुर्गों के लिए गुणवत्तापरक 
तथा विशिष्ट स्वास्थ्य देखभाल के प्रावधान की आवश्यकता पर बल दिया गया है। एनएचपी (2047) में सार्वजनिक एवं 
निजी, दोनों प्रकार के स्वास्थ्य क्षेत्रों में तृतीयक देखभाल सेवाओं के सार्थक विस्तार पर जोर दिया गया है। विशिष्ट व 
अति-विशिष्ट स्वास्थ्य सेवाओं को संबल प्रदान करने के लिए स्वास्थ्य देखभाल कर्मियों को क्षमता निर्माण में उन्‍नत 
शैक्षिक तैयारी की आवश्यकता होती है। नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर (एनपी) इस मांग को पूरा करने में सक्षम होंगे, बशर्ते वे अच्छी 
तरह से प्रशिक्षित हों और छिद्रान्वेषी सोच, निर्णय और कौशल के माध्यम से अभ्यास करने के लिए अधिकृत हों। कड़ी 
शैक्षिक तैयारी उन्हें जीर्ण एवं गंभीर रोगों से ग्रस्त बुजुर्ग रोगियों के स्वास्थ्य संवर्धन, स्वास्थ्य रखरखाव, स्वास्थ्य 
बहाली, पुनर्वास और उपशामक देखभाल का आंकलन करने और भाग लेने में सक्षम बनाएगी। एनपीजीएन की भूमिका 
वर्ष 4975 में संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका में स्थापित की गई थी, और फिर ऑस्ट्रेलिया, इजराइल, नॉर्वे और अन्य देशों में 
शुरु की गई। 

परिषद ने परास्नातक स्तर पर नर्स प्रेक्टिशनर इन जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग (एनपीजीएन) संवर्ग तैयार करने के लिए 

एक पाठ्यक्रम की रूपरेखा प्रस्तावित की है। इस कार्यक्रम की मुख्य विशेषता यह है कि यह एक नैदानिक आवासीय 

कार्यक्रम है जिसमें 45: सैद्धांतिक निर्देश और 85: व्यावहारिकता के साथ एक मजबूत नैदानिक घटक पर बल दिया 
गया है। इसका प्रमुख दृष्टिकोण योग्यता आधारित प्रशिक्षण है और एनपी शिक्षण इंटरनेशनल काउंसिल ऑफ नर्सेज 

(आईसीएन, 2005) और एनओएनपीएफ कपीटेंसीज (2047) से ली गई दक्षताओं पर आधारित है। एनपीजीएन शिक्षण 

व प्रशिक्षण एएसीएन, 2047 से ली गई दक्षताओं पर आधारित है। प्रत्येक पाठ्यक्रम दक्षताओं की उपलब्धि पर 

आधारित है। एनपीजीएन कार्यक्रम में विभिन्‍न अध्ययन पाठ्यक्रम शामिल हैं जो साक्ष्य आधारित अभ्यास और जटिल 

स्वास्थ्य प्रणालियों के प्रबंधन के साथ सुदृढ़ वैज्ञानिक नींव पर आधारित हैं। इन्हें बी.एससी. प्रशिक्षित नर्सों की 
सैद्धांतिक एवं व्यावहारिक दक्षताओं के आधार पर तैयार किया गया है। 

एनपीजीएन कार्यक्रम का उद्देश्य पंजीकृत बी.एससी. नर्सों को अस्पताल एवं सामुदायिक समायोजन में बुजुर्ग 

रोगियों को sad नर्सिंग देखभाल प्रदान करने के लिए तैयार करना है। नर्सिंग देखभाल रोगियों को स्थिर करने, 

गंभीर जटिलताओं को कम करने और अधिकतम स्वास्थ्य बहाली पर केंद्रित है। एनपीजीएन के लिए अभ्यास 
समायोजन में अस्पताल के बाह्य रोगी क्लीनिक, आंतरिक रोगी सुविधा और दीर्घकालिक देखभाल सुविधा शामिल हैं 
और उनके द्वारा मुख्य रूप से प्राथमिक तथा माध्यमिक देखभाल पर ध्यान दिया जाता है। इन एनपी को तृतीयक 
देखभाल केंद्रों की बुजुर्ग देखभाल इकाइयों में भी कार्य करना आवश्यक है। एनपीजीएन बढ़ती उम्र के जीर्ण व गंभीर 
स्थितियों एवं वृद्धावस्था के लक्षणों का निदान, उपचार तथा प्रबंधन करने और चिकित्सा हस्तक्षेप या, कभी-कभी, 
उपशामक उपचार और ROI देखभाल प्रदान करने में समर्थ होंगे। उन्हें ऐसी सेवाएं प्रदान करने के लिए उन्‍नत 


[भागवता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 3 


शिक्षा प्रदान की जाती है, जो बुजुर्गों को प्रभावित करने वाले स्वास्थ्य मुद्दों के साथ-साथ परिणामी संज्ञानात्मक, 
शारीरिक, मनोवैज्ञानिक और सामाजिक दुर्बलताओं का समाधान करती हैं। 

कार्यक्रम के पूरा होने और संबंधित एसएनआरसी में पंजीकृत होने पर, उन्हें परिषद्‌ द्वारा निर्धारित पाठ्यक्रम की 
लॉगबुक में सूचीबद्ध सभी दक्षताओं का अभ्यास करने और साथ ही संस्थागत प्रोटोकॉल /स्थायी आदेशों के अनुसार 
स्वतंत्र रूप से औषधि प्रबंधन तथा नैदानिक परीक्षण, प्रक्रिया, चिकित्सा उपकरण और उपचारों का आदेश देने के लिए 
अधिकृत किया जाता है। इस अधिकार का प्रयोग करते समय, एनपीजीएन निम्नलिखित दक्षताओं के लिए जवाबदेह 
होते हैं: 

a) उम्र बढ़ने में वैज्ञानिक जानकारी और सैद्धांतिक मूल का उपयोग करना; 

४७) रोगी चयन» जेरिएट्रिक इकाई में भर्ती व छुट्टी; 

०) यथोचित आंकलन द्वारा समस्या की पहचान; 

d) औषधि या उपकरण या उपचार का चयन / प्रबंधन; 

०) चिकित्साविधान उपयोग हेतु रोगी शिक्षा; 

f) चिकित्साविधान में औषधि के दुष्प्रभाव की जानकारी; 

8) परिणामों का आंकलन; 

४) जटिलताओं तथा अनहोनी प्रतिक्रियाओं की पहचान व प्रबंधन; 

i) जेरिएट्रिक नैदानिक अभ्यास में साक्ष्य-आधारित नवाचारों के लिए योगदान; 

) गंभीर तथा प्राथमिक देखभाल के संबंध में छात्र, नर्स व अन्य स्वास्थ्य कर्मियों को मार्गदर्शन, परामर्श, सलाह 

और शैक्षिक अनुभव प्रदान करना; 

k जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल संबंधित राष्ट्रीय स्वास्थ्य कार्यक्रमों में प्रभावी भागीदारी | 

एनपीजीएन, अपनी देखरेख में बुजुर्गों की समग्र देखभाल की जिम्मेदारी तथा जवाबदेही लेने के लिए तैयार और 
शिक्षित किए जाते हैं। इसने “दक्षताओं” के अंतर्गत “अध्ययन डोमेन” बनाए रखना आवश्यक बना दिया है। केंद्र और 
राज्य स्तर पर नए संवर्ग की स्थापना के साथ, एनपीजीएन बुजुर्ग रोगियों को जेरिएट्रिक वार्ड, बाह्य रोगी विभाग, 
जेरिएट्रिक डे-केयर सेवा, बुजुर्ग साइकाइट्री वार्ड, बुजुर्ग सामुदायिक और जेरिएट्रिक पुनर्वास वार्ड जैसे विभिन्‍न 
समायोजनों में लागत प्रभावी, सक्षम, सुरक्षित और गुणवत्ता संचालित विशेष नर्सिंग देखभाल प्रदान करने में सक्षम 
होंगे। 

उक्त स्नातकोत्तर डिग्री को एसएनआरसी द्वारा अतिरिक्त दक्षता के रूप में पंजीकृत किया जाएगा। 
दर्शन 

परिषद्‌ का मानना है कि बुजुर्ग रोगियों और उनके परिवार को गुणवत्तापरक देखभाल प्रदान करने के लिए भारत 
में प्राथमिक तथा तृतीयक स्वास्थ्य देखभाल सेवाओं की चुनौतियों और मांगों को पूरा करने हेतु नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन 
जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग (एनपीजीएन) नामक स्नातकोत्तर कार्यक्रम स्थापित करने की सख्त जरूरत है। 

परिषद्‌ का मानना है कि सुदृढ़ नैदानिक घटक और दक्षता-आधारित प्रशिक्षण पर केंद्रित एक आवासीय कार्यक्रम 
के स्नातकोत्तर को ठोस सैद्धांतिक और साक्ष्य-आधारित जानकारी के आधार पर नैदानिक क्षमता का प्रदर्शन करने में 
सक्षम होना चाहिए। शिक्षण-अधिगम दृष्टिकोण को वयस्क शिक्षण सिद्धांतों, आचार संहिता, योग्यता-आधारित शिक्षा, 
सहयोगात्मक शिक्षा, चिकित्सा और नर्सिंग शिक्षकों के साथ प्रचलित नैदानिक शिक्षा, अनुभवात्मक शिक्षा और 
स्व-निर्देशित शिक्षा पर ध्यान केंद्रित करना चाहिए। शिक्षा प्रदाताओं / प्रीसेप्टर्स / मेंटर्स को अपने वर्तमान ज्ञान और 
अभ्यास को अद्यतन रखना चाहिए। प्रशिक्षण में प्रीसेप्टर्स के रूप में भाग लेने के लिए चिकित्सा संकाय को आमंत्रित 
किया जाता है। 

परिषद्‌ का यह भी मानना है कि योग्य जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग संकाय की कमी को दूर करने के लिए नैदानिक 
समायोजन में विभिन्‍न शैक्षणिक रणनीतियों का उपयोग किया जा सकता है। आशा की जाती है कि 
पंजीकरण / लाइसेंस की दिशा में नीतियां विकसित करना आसान बनाया जाएगा और नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन जेरिएट्रिक 
नर्सिंग परास्नातकों के पदस्थापन हेतु प्राथमिक और गंभीर देखभाल केंद्रों में पदों का सृजन किया जाएगा। 

परिषद्‌ का मानना है कि मान्यताएं, नैतिकता तथा विश्वास और प्रेरणा रोगी एवं परिवार केंद्रित देखभाल, 
प्रक्रिया-उन्मुख देखभाल, स्व-देखभाल और साक्ष्य-आधारित अभ्यास का उपयोग करते हुए निरंतर व्यावसायिक 
विकास में दक्षता हासिल करेंगी जो गुणवत्तापरक परिणाम प्राप्त करने के लिए आवश्यक हैं। 


4 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


एनपी पाठ्यक्रम के लिए एक शैक्षणिक रूपरेखा प्रस्तावित है (चित्र-4 ee) | 


CX 
नैदानिक घटक 
(नैदानिक आवास) 


१. मूल पाठ्यक्रम 


oe उन्नत नर्सिंग अभ्यास के 
लिए सैद्धांतिक आधार 

« जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल में 
शोध अनुप्रयोग तथा 
साक्ष्य आधारित अभ्यास 

« नेतृत्व, प्रबंधन तथा 

शिक्षण में उन्‍नत कौशल 


 जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग 

में लागू उन्‍नत 5 

पैथोफिजियोलॉजी 

« जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग 
में लागू उन्‍नत 
फार्माकोलॉजी 

« उन्‍नत स्वास्थ्य / 


ज्ञरीरिक 
आंकलन है ८ 


दक्षता-आधारित 
शिक्षण तथा प्रशिक्षण 


Od ज्ञान तथा 
नैतिकता 


चित्र-4. नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग — एक शैक्षणिक पाठ्यचर्या की रूपरेखा 

I. कार्यक्रम विवरण 

यह कार्यक्रम जेरिएट्रिक aka aa में विशेषज्ञता और गहन समझ विकसित करने में छात्रों की सहायता के लिए 
तैयार किया गया है। यह छात्रों को जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग में उन्‍नत नर्सिंग कौशल विकसित करने में मदद करेगा | 

एनपीजीएन कार्यक्रम एक नर्सिंग आवासीय कार्यक्रम है जिसमें मुख्यतः दक्षता आधारित प्रशिक्षण पर ध्यान दिया 
जाता है। पाठ्यक्रम की अवधि दो वर्ष की है जिसमें सैद्धांतिक मूल पाठ्यक्रम, उन्‍नत अभ्यास पाठ्यक्रम और नैदानिक 
पाठ्यक्रम के अलावा नैदानिक अभ्यास शामिल हैं जो कि एक प्रमुख घटक है (पाठ्यचर्या की रूपरेखा देखें) | 
गा. लक्ष्य 

एनपीजीएन कार्यक्रम, पंजीकृत बी.एससी. नर्सों को नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग के रूप में नैदानिक 
विशेषज्ञ, प्रबंधक, शिक्षक और सलाहकार जैसी vad अभ्यास भूमिकाओं के लिए तैयार करता है, जो आगे चलकर 
एम.एससी. नर्सिंग (एनपी इन जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग) बनेंगे। 

इस पाठ्यक्रम का उद्देश्य बुजुर्गों की देखभाल के लिए एक ऐसा नर्सिंग कर्मी संवर्ग तैयार करना है जो उम्र से 
संबंधित जैविक परिवर्तनों के बारे में जानकारी प्राप्त करेंगे | 
IV. उद्देश्य 

कार्यक्रम के पूरा होने पर, एनपीजीएन निम्नलिखित में सक्षम हो जाएंगे - 

4. co रोगियों को सक्षम देक्षमाल व उचित पारिवारिक देखभाल प्रदान करने की जिम्मेदारी और उत्तरदायित्व 

| 


2. जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल प्रदान करने में नैदानिक क्षमता / विशेषज्ञता का प्रदर्शन करना जिसमें आंकलन, नैदानिक 
तर्क, जटिल निगरानी और उपचार शामिल है; 


[भागवता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 5 


3. जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल में उपचार »मध्यवर्तन को लागू करने में सैद्धांतिक, पैथोफिजियोलॉजिकल तथा 
फार्माकोलॉजिकल सिद्धांतों और साक्ष्य आधार को लागू करना; 

4. रोगी के स्वास्थ्य को स्थिर एवं बहाल करने के लिए बुजुर्गों के गंभीर रोगों का आंकलन करना तथा उनके 
प्रबंधन में भाग लेना; और जेरिएट्रिक बहुविषयक दल के सदस्य के रूप में जटिलताओं को कम करना या 
प्रबंधित करना; 

5. देखभाल की निरंतरता में, जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल दल में अन्य स्वास्थ्य देखभाल कर्मियों के साथ सहयोग 
करना | 

v. नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग (एनपीजीएन) कार्यक्रम शुरु करने के लिए न्यूनतम आवश्यकताएं 
संस्थान को एनपीजीएन कार्यक्रम और उसके छात्रों के प्रति जवाबदेही स्वीकार करनी होगी और परिषद्‌ के 

मानकों के अनुरूप कार्यक्रम की पेशकश करनी होगी। इसे निम्नलिखित आवश्यकताओं को पूरा करना होगा: 

7. अनिवार्यता ग्रमाणपत्र 

क. जो कोई भी संस्थान नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग कार्यक्रम शुरु करना चाहते हैं, उन्हें राज्य से 
अनिवार्यता प्रमाण पत्र असरकारी आदेश लेना होगा। 

ख. निम्नलिखित संस्थानों को अनिवार्यता प्रमाण पत्र लेने से छूट दी गई हैः 

i परिषद्‌ द्वारा अधिनियम की धारा 43 और 44 के तहत उपयुक्त पाए गए तथा बी.एससी. नर्सिंग या एम. 
एससी. नर्सिंग कार्यक्रमों की पहले से ही पेशकश करने वाले संस्थान » विश्वविद्यालय; 
ii, एमबीबीएस » डीएनबी कार्यक्रमों की पेशकश करने वाले संस्थान » विश्वविद्यालय | 
2 अस्पताल 
क. संस्थान का कम से कम 200 WA वाला अपना मूल अस्पताल /तृतीयक देखभाल केंद्र होना चाहिए। 
ख. मूल अस्पताल अधिमानत: एक मेडिकल कॉलेज / नर्सिंग कॉलेज से संबद्ध होना चाहिए। 
3. शय्या 

क. अस्पताल में ऑर्थेपेडिक्स, न्यूरोलॉजी, फिजियोथेरेपी, ऑक्यूपेशनल थेरेपी विभाग, ऑप्थेल्मोलॉजी, स्त्री रोग 
चिकित्सा, दंत रोग चिकित्सा, रुमेटोलॉजी, साइकाइट्री, पुनर्वास एवं सामुदायिक स्वास्थ्य सेवा जैसी सहायक 
सेवाओं के साथ कम से कम 30 Bea वाला जेरिएट्रिक वार्ड होना चाहिए; 

4. वृद्धाश्रमों के साथ सबद्धता 
क. अस्पताल वृद्धाश्रम से संबद्ध हो सकता है। 
5 जेरिएट्रिक इकार्ड के लिए स्टाफ 

क. प्रत्येक जेरिएट्रिक वार्ड में अधिमानत: बी.एससी. नर्सिंग या एम.एससी. नर्सिंग अर्हताधारक एक प्रभारी नर्स 
होना चाहिए; 

ख. परिषद्‌ के मानदंडों के अनुसार नर्स रोगी अनुपात 4:4 होना चाहिए; 

ग. आरक्षित अवकाश के लिए 45: अतिरिक्त कर्मियों का प्रावधान होना चाहिए; 

घ. जेरिएट्रिक इकाई में एक जेरिएट्रिक फिजिशियन, सामाजिक कार्यकर्ता /परामर्शदाता, फिजियोथेरेपिस्ट और 
एक ऑक्यूपेशनल थेरेपिस्ट होना चाहिए; 

ड. चिकित्सक रोगी अनुपात 4:40 हो सकता है। 

6. स्रकाय, स्टाफ संसाधन 

क. नैदानिक क्षेत्र: 

i नर्सिंग ग्रीस़ेप्टरः जेरिएट्रिक इकाई में 6 वर्ष अनुभव के साथ पूर्णकालिक जीएनएम अर्हताधारक, 
अधिमानतः 
2 वर्ष अनुभव के साथ जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग में पोस्ट बेसिक डिप्लोमा या बी.एससी नर्सिंग अर्हताधारक 
अथवा 4 वर्ष अनुभव के साथ एम.एससी. (मेडिकल-सर्जिकल नर्सिंग /सामुदायिक स्वास्थ्य नर्सिंग) 
अर्हताधारक; 

ii, मेडिकल ग्रीसेप्टरः जेरिएट्रिक / जनरल मेडिसिन में एमडी; 

ii, ग्रीसेप्टर छात्र अचुषातः नर्सिंग 4:40, मेडिकल 4:40 (प्रत्येक छात्र के लिए एक मेडिकल तथा एक नर्सिंग 
प्रीसेप्टर होना चाहिए) 

ख. शिक्षण संकायः 

i ऑओफेसर, एसोसिएट mer: 4 प्रिशिक्षण aqua: पीजी-एम.एससी. (मेडिकल-सर्जिकल नर्सिंग» 
सामुदायिक स्वास्थ्य नर्सिंग) के बाद 5 वर्ष) - प्रत्येक 40 छात्रों के लिए एक संकाय; 
ii, स्रह्मयक eae 4 (प्रशिक्षण अनुभव: बी.एससी. नर्सिंग के बाद 3 वर्ष) 

ग. जेरिएट्रिक इकाई में कार्यरत एम.एससी. नर्सिंग अर्हताधारक उपरोक्त संकाय दोहरी भूमिका निभाएंगे या एक 

सीनियर नर्स होंगे। 


6 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


घ. अतिथि प्राध्यापक: फार्माकोलॉजी, पैथोफिजियोलॉजी, जेरिएट्रिक मेडिसिन, जनरल मेडिसिन व जनरल 
सर्जरी, कार्डियोलॉजी, आर्थोपेडिक्स, साइकाइट्री, कम्युनिटी मेडिसिन, फिजियोथेरेपी और ऑक्यूपेशनल थेरेपी | 
7 अस्पताल, कॉलेज यें भौतिक तथा अध्ययन संसाधन 
क. नैदानिक क्षेत्र में एक अध्ययन कक्ष / कान्फ्रेंस कक्ष; 
ख. सिम्युलेटेड अध्ययन के लिए कौशल प्रयोगशाला (अस्पताल / कॉलेज); 
ग. ऑनलाइन जर्नल्स तक पहुंच के साथ पुस्तकालय और कंप्यूटर सुविधा; 
घ. ई-लर्निक सुविधा | 
तीस शय्या वाले जेरिएट्रिक वार्ड eg उपकरणों की सची (परिशिष्ट-4 देखें) 
9 छात्र थर्ती,प्रवेश संबंधी आवश्यकताएं 
क. आवेदक को पंजीकरण से पहले अधिमानत: किसी जनरल मेडिकल-सर्जिकल » जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल 
समायोजन में कम से कम 4-वर्ष नैदानिक अनुभव के साथ एक पंजीकृत बी.एससी. नर्सिंग /पी.बी.बी.एससी. 
नर्सिंग अर्हताधारक होना चाहिए; 
ख. परिषद्‌ द्वारा मान्यता प्राप्त संस्थान से बीएससी नर्सिंग उत्तीर्ण की होनी चाहिए और संबंधित एसएनआरसी में 
पंजीकृत होना चाहिए; 
ग. बी.एससी. नर्सिंग कार्यक्रम में कुल प्राप्तांक 55: से कम नहीं होने चाहिए। 
घ. चयन एक प्रवेश परीक्षा की उत्कृष्टता और सक्षम प्राधिकारी द्वारा आयोजित साक्षात्कार के आधार पर होना 
चाहिए। 
ड. शारीरिक रूप से स्वस्थ होना afer 
Papel की संख्या: io जेरिएट्रिक शय्या के लिए 4 अभ्यर्थी | 
वेतन: 4. Gard अभ्यर्थियों को नियमित वेतन fear जाएगा। 
2. अन्य अभ्यर्थियों के लिए वजीफा /वेतन उस अस्पताल की वेतन संरचना के अनुसार दिया जाएगा 
जहां पाठ्यक्रम संचालित किया जा रहा है। 


शा. परीक्षा विनियम 
परीक्षा में बैठने के लिए पात्रता 

उपस्थितिः विश्वविद्यालय की अंतिम परीक्षा में बैठने से पहले सैद्धांतिक तथा व्यावहारिक के लिए न्यूनतम 80:, 
लेकिन डिग्री प्रदान करने से पहले व्यावहारिक में 400: उपस्थिति पूरा करना अनिवार्य है। 

आंतरिक आंकलन अंकों के लिए कोई न्यूनतम सीमा नहीं है, क्योंकि उत्तीर्ण घोषित करने के लिए आंतरिक और 
बाह्य अंक एक साथ जोड़े जाते हैं। 


परीक्षा संचालन एवं डिग्री Tera ग्राधिकरणः संबंधित विश्वविद्यालय | 
परिणामों का वर्गीकरण 

यदि प्राप्तांक 60: और उससे अधिक हैं तो अभ्यर्थी को परीक्षा में उत्तीर्ण घोषित कर दिया जाता है। ये प्राप्तांक 
प्रत्येक पाठ्यक्रम / विषय में सैद्धांतिक तथा व्यावहारिक की आंतरिक एवं बाह्य विश्वविद्यालयी दोनों परीक्षाओं का कुल 
योग हैं और 60: से कम अनुत्तीर्ण होंगे। 

श्रेणी (रैंक) की गणना के लिए, दोनों वर्ष के कुल अंकों पर विचार किया जाएगा | 

यदि कोई अभ्यर्थी सैद्धांतिक अथवा व्यावहारिक में अनुत्तीर्ण हो जाता है, तो उसे वह प्रश्न-पत्र फिर से देना होगा 
जिसमें वह अनुत्तीर्ण हुआ है। 

किसी भी विषय में अनुत्तीर्ण होने वाले अभ्यर्थी की श्रेणी (रैंक) घोषित नहीं की जाएगी। 

कार्यक्रम को पूरा करने की अधिकतम अवधि 4 वर्ष होगी। 


व्यावहारिक परीक्षा 

ओएससीई परीक्षा के साथ-साथ मौखिक परीक्षा ली जाएगी - परिशिष्ट--2 में दिए गए ओएससीई 
दिशानिर्देश देखें | 

प्रति दिन छात्रों की अधिकतम संख्या - 40 छात्र। 

परीक्षा नैदानिक क्षेत्र में ही आयोजित की जानी चाहिए। 

व्यावहारिक परीक्षक दल में एक आंतरिक परीक्षक [[एनपीजीएन कार्यक्रम पढ़ाने में दो वर्ष अनुभव के साथ एम. 
एससी. नर्सिंग संकाय /5 वर्ष स्नातकोत्तर अनुभव के साथ एम.एससी. नर्सिंग संकाय (अधिमानत: मेडिकल-सर्जिकल 
नर्सिंग)), एक बाह्य परीक्षक (उपरोक्त के समान) और एक मेडिकल आंतरिक परीक्षक, जिसने एनपीजीएन कार्यक्रम के 
लिए प्रीसेप्टर के रूप में कार्य किया हो, शामिल होंगे। 


[भागवता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


शोध PTET 

शोध WES मुख्य गाइड - स्नातकोत्तर के उपरांत एनपी कार्यक्रम में 3 वर्ष पढ़ाने का अनुभव वाला नर्सिंग 
संकाय, Wess: मेडिकल प्रीसेप्टर | 

शोध eA की ग्रस्तुतिः प्रथम वर्ष में प्रवेश की तिथि के 6-9 माह उपरांत। 

गाइड छात्र अनचुपातः 5 

शोध सामितिः कॉलेज अस्पताल में शोध की प्रगति का मार्गदर्शन और पर्यवेक्षण करने के लिए प्रधानाचार्य या 
सीएनओ, जो एम.एससी. नर्सिंग अहर्ताधारक होना चाहिए, के साथ न्यूनतम 5 सदस्य वाली एक अलग शोध समिति 
होगी | 

ide मंजूरी संस्थागत समीक्षा बोर्ड /अस्पताल आचार समिति द्वारा प्राप्त की जानी चाहिए, क्योंकि इसमें 
नैदानिक शोध शामिल है। 

विष्य का बयनः विषय जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग से प्रासंगिक होना चाहिए जो नर्सिंग मध्यवर्तन में जानकारी या साक्ष्य 
जोड़े | शोध किसी भी जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल समायोजन में आयोजित किया जाना चाहिए। 

जेटा संग्रहण: डेटा संग्रहण के लिए 7 सप्ताह आवंटित किए जाते हैं, जिसे पहले वर्ष में 6 माह के बाद और दूसरे 
वर्ष में 6 माह से पहले नैदानिक अनुभव के दौरान एकीकृत किया जा सकता है। 

शोध रिपोर्ट लेखनः दूसरे वर्ष के 6-9 He FI 

ony शोध निबंध की ग्रस्दुतिः दूसरे वर्ष के पूरा होने से 3 माह पहले | 

शोध निबंध परीक्षा 

आतरिक आकलन: मौखिक और शोध निबंध रिपोर्ट = 50 अंक | 

विश्वविद्यालयी परीक्षाः मौखिक और शोध निबंध रिपोर्ट = 50 अंक | 

(आंकलन हेतु अन्य एम.एससी. नर्सिंग विशिष्टताओं के लिए उपयोग में लाए जाने वाले अंक दिशानिर्देशों का 
उपयोग किया जा सकता है ॥) 


शा. आंकलन (रचनात्मक और योगात्मक) 
प्रश्न पत्र, प्रश्नोत्तरी, सेमिनार 


«» लिखित कार्य » आवधिक प्रश्न पत्र 
« मामला» नैदानिक प्रस्तुति 
« नैदानिक या देखभाल पथ »मामले की अध्ययन रिपोर्ट 
« नैदानिक प्रदर्शन आंकलन 
« ais संरचित नैदानिक परीक्षा (ओएससीई) 
*» अंतिम परीक्षा 
(आंकलन दिशानिर्देशों के लिए परिशिष्ट-2 देखें) 
अंतिम परीक्षा योजना 
i शीर्षक सैद्धांतिक : व्यावहारिक : 
स. घंटे | आंतरिक | बाह्य | घंटे | आंतरिक | बाह्य 
प्रथम वर्ष 
मूल पाठ्यक्रम 
4 उन्नत नर्सिंग अभ्यास के लिए सैद्धांतिक आधार 2 50 
घंटे 
2 ।|जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल में शोध अनुप्रयोग तथा साक्ष्य 3 30 70 
आधारित अभ्यास घंटे 
3 नेतृत्व, प्रबंधन तथा शिक्षण में उन्‍नत कौशल 3 30 70 
घंटे 
उन्‍नत अभ्यास पाठ्यक्रम 
4 ।जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग में लागू उन्‍नत पैथोफिजियोलॉजी 3 30 70 
और उन्नत फार्माकोलॉजी घंटे 
5 (उन्नत स्वास्थ्य /»शारीरिक आंकलन 3 30 70 50 50 
घंटे 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART HI—SEc.4] 


द्वितीय वर्ष 
विशिष्ट पाठ्यक्रम 
4 ।जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग अभ्यास के मूल 3 30 70 400. | 400 
घंटे 
2 ।लजेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग . I 3 30 70 400. | 00 
घंटे 
3 ।जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग . I 3 30 70 400. | 400 
घंटे 
4 शोध निबंध और मौखिक 50 50 
शा. पाठ्यक्रम अनुदेश 
क्र. शीर्षक सैद्धांतिक | प्रयोगशाला / कौश | नैदानिक (घंटे) 
सं. (घंटे) ल प्रयोगशाला 
(घंटे) 
प्रथम वर्ष 
मूल पाठ्यक्रम 
I joa नर्सिंग अभ्यास के लिए सैद्धांतिक 40 
आधार 
I जिरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग में शोध अनुप्रयोग तथा 56 24 336 (7 सप्ताह) 
साक्ष्य आधारित अभ्यास 
गा नितृत्व, प्रबंधन तथा शिक्षण में उन्‍नत कौशल 56 24 492 (4 सप्ताह) 
उन्‍नत अभ्यास पाठ्यक्रम 
IV जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग में लागू oad | ७ | 336 (7 सप्ताह) 
पैथोफिजियोलॉजी 
V |जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग में लागू oad 54 336 (7 सप्ताह) 
फार्माकोलॉजी 
VI (|उनन्‍नत स्वास्थ्य / शारीरिक आंकलन 70 48 576 (॥2 सप्ताह) 
कुल योग = 2208 घंटे 336 (7 सप्ताह)| 96 (2 सप्ताह) 4776 (37 
सप्ताह) 
द्वितीय वर्ष 
विशिष्ट पाठ्यक्रम 
vir |जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग अभ्यास के मूल | at 48 576 (॥2 सप्ताह) 
VILL |जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग -] | 96 | 48 576 (42 सप्ताह) 
IX जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग - Ir | 96 48 624 (43 सप्ताह) 
कुल योग = 2208 घंटे 288 (6 सप्ताह)| 444 (3 सप्ताह) 4776 (37 
सप्ताह) 


एक वर्ष में उपलब्ध सप्ताहों की संख्या = 52 - 6 (वार्षिक अवकाश, आकस्मिक अवकाश, रुग्णतावकाश 
= 6 सप्ताह) = 46 सप्ताह x 48 घंटे = 2208 घंटे 

दो वर्ष = 44i6 घंटे (परीक्षा नैदानिक पदस्थापन के दौरान) 
निर्देशात्मक घंटे: सैद्धांतिक = 624 घंटे, कौशल प्रयोगशाला = 240 घंटे, नैदानिक = 3552 घंटे, कुल योग = 44i6 घंटे 
प्रथम वर्ष: 336--96-4776 घंटे (सैद्धांतिक-कौशल प्रयोगशाला-नैदानिक) (सिद्धांतिक = 
प्रयोगशाला एवं नैदानिक) ८ 85:) 
द्वितीय वर्ष: 288-444-4776 घंटे (सैद्धांतिक-कौशल प्रयोगशाला-नैदानिक) (सैद्धांतिक = 45:, व्यावहारिक (कौशल 
प्रयोगशाला एवं नैदानिक) ८ 85:) 
प्रथम वर्ष = 46 सप्ताह /2208 घंटे (46 x 48 घंटे) (सैद्धांतिक + प्रयोगशालाः 44 सप्ताह के लिए 7.5 घंटे प्रति 
सप्ताह = 330/336 + 96 घंटे”) 


5:, 


व्यावहारिक (कौशल 


[भागवता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 9 


'सैद्धांतिक + प्रयोगशाला ८ 96 घंटे 2 सप्ताह में परिचयात्मक ब्लॉक कक्षा व कार्यशाला के रूप में दिए जा सकते हैं 
द्वितीय वर्ष = 46 सप्ताह /2208 घंटे (46 x 48 घंटे) (सैद्धांतिक + प्रयोगशाला: 45 सप्ताह के लिए 8.5 घंटे प्रति 
सप्ताह = 384 + 48 घंटे) 
( सप्ताह ब्लॉक कक्षाएं ८ 48 घंटे) 
नैदानिक अभ्यास 
क. नैदानिक आवासीय अनुभव: न्यूनतम 48 घंटे प्रति सप्ताह निर्धारित हैं, हालांकि, यह अलग-अलग पारियों और 
ऑन कॉल ड्यूटी करने के बाद छुट्टी के आधार पर परिवर्तनशील है। 
ख. सप्ताह में एक दिन की छुट्टी के साथ 8 घंटे की ड्यूटी और प्रति सप्ताह एक ऑन कॉल ड्यूटी | 
नैदानिक पदस्थापन 
प्रथम वर्ष: 44 सप्ताह (परिचयात्मक ब्लॉक कक्षा व कार्यशाला के 2 सप्ताह छोड़कर) 
जेरिएट्रिक वार्ड — 2 सप्ताह 


जनरल मेडिकल वार्ड — 6 सप्ताह 
जनरल सर्जिकल वार्ड - 2 सप्ताह 
आर्थोपेडिक वार्ड - 4 सप्ताह 
ऑप्थेल्मोलॉजी वार्ड - 4 सप्ताह 
न्यूरोलॉजी वार्ड तथा ओपीडी - 3 सप्ताह 
साइकाइट्रिक वार्ड - 3 सप्ताह 
सामुदायिक पृष्ठभूमि अभ्यास क्षेत्र - 3 सप्ताह 
आपातकालीन विभाग - 4 सप्ताह 
बाह्य रोगी विभाग 

जेरिएट्रिक ओपीडी - 4 सप्ताह 
साइकाइट्रिक ओपीडी - 4 सप्ताह 
एंडोक्राइन ओपीडी - 2 सप्ताह 
फिजियोथेरेपी तथा ऑक्यूपेशनल थेरेपी - 2 सप्ताह 
द्वितीय वर्ष: 45 सप्ताह (ब्लॉक कक्षा का एक सप्ताह छोड़कर) 
जेरिएट्रिक वार्ड — 2 सप्ताह 
मेडिकल आईसीयू - 3 सप्ताह 
सर्जिकल आईसीयू - 3 सप्ताह 
पुनर्वास इकाई - 5 सप्ताह 
पेलिएटिव तथा हॉस्पाइस सेंटर - 4 सप्ताह 
वृद्धाश्रम - 4 सप्ताह 
हेमेटोलॉजी तथा ऑन्कोलॉजी वार्ड - 4 सप्ताह 
यूरोलॉजी वार्ड — सप्ताह 
साइकोजेरियाट्रिक वार्ड / डिमेंशिया - 2 सप्ताह 
सामुदायिक पृष्ठभूमि अभ्यास क्षेत्र - 3 सप्ताह 
आपातकालीन विभाग - सप्ताह 
बाह्य रोगी विभाग 

जेरिएट्रिक ओपीडी तथा डिमेंशिया क्लिनिक - 2 सप्ताह 
गायनी ऑन्कोलॉजी ओपीडी - 4 सप्ताह 
जेरिएट्रिक डे केयर केंद्र - 4 सप्ताह 
पोडियाट्रिक ओपीडी - 4 सप्ताह 
क्षेत्रीय दौरे - | सप्ताह 


हॉस्पाइस देखभाल 
प्रशामक देखभाल इकाई 
वृद्धाश्रम 


ग. शिक्षण पद्धतियां: सैद्धांतिक, प्रयोगशाला और नैदानिक शिक्षण निम्नलिखित तरीकों से किया जा सकता है और 
नैदानिक पदस्थापन के दौरान एकीकृत किया जा सकता है - 
e व्यावहारिक अध्ययन 


0 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


चिंतनशील अध्ययन 
अनुकरण 

नैदानिक सेमिनार 
नैदानिक Hepat 
मामला » नैदानिक प्रस्तुति 
गहन औषधीय अध्ययन, प्रस्तुति तथा रिपोर्ट 
नर्सिंग राउंड्स 

जर्नल क्लब 

मामले का अध्ययन 
उन्नत स्वास्थ्य आंकलन 
संकाय व्याख्यान 
निर्देशित पठन 

निहित कार्य 

कार्यशाला 


a. प्रक्रियाएं / लॉग ga: प्रत्येक नैदानिक पदस्थापन के अंत में, नैदानिक लॉग बुक (विशिष्ट प्रक्रियात्मक दक्षताएं / 
नैदानिक कौशल) (परिशिष्ट-3) और नैदानिक आवश्यकताएं (परिशिष्ट-4) पर प्रीसेप्टर / संकाय द्वारा हस्ताक्षर 
किए जाने चाहिए। 

ड. नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन जेरिएट्रिक केयर कंपीटेंसीज (एएसीएन, 2047 से अनुकूलित) 
नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग (एनपीजीएन) 


. 
2. 
3. 


4. 


5. 
6. 


2. 
43. 


44. 
45. 
6. 


बुजुर्ग लोगों के बारे में जानकारी विकसित करने और बेहतर देखभाल में योगदान देता है। 

प्रासंगिक केंद्रित इतिवृत्त प्राप्त करने की क्षमता विकसित करता है। 

बुजुर्गों के उपचार तथा निवारक रणनीतियों के लिए उचित निदान, मूल्यांकन और उपचार निर्धारण करने की 
क्षमता प्रदर्शित करता है। 

रोगियों में परसंक्रमण जोखिम के साथ-साथ संक्रमण को प्रबंधित / नियंत्रित करने की क्षमता विकसित करता 
है। 

रोगी देखभाल की गुणवत्ता तथा सुरक्षा सुनिश्चित करने के लिए दलों के साथ प्रभावी ढंग से कार्य करता है। 
व्यापक जेरिएट्रिक आंकलन करने की क्षमता प्रदर्शित करता है। 

बुजुर्गों की पोषण स्थिति का आंकलन करने की क्षमता और उचित पोषण आलंबन रणनीति प्रदर्शित करता 
है। 

गंभीर जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल में एनपी की वर्तमान व उभरती भूमिका का वर्णन करता है। 

जेरिएट्रिक लोगों की देखभाल के बारे में छात्र, नर्स तथा अन्य स्वास्थ्य कर्मियों को मार्गदर्शन, परामर्श, सलाह 
और शैक्षिक अनुभव प्रदान करता है। 


. किशोर, नवयुवक, वयस्क और बुजुर्गों को देखभाल प्रदान करने के लिए आवश्यक अत्यधिक पेचीदा समन्वय 


और योजना की सुविधा हेतु नेतृत्व प्रदान करता है। 


. गंभीर, नाजुक तथा पेचीदा जीर्ण रोगों से ग्रस्त बुजुर्गों के लिए सुरक्षा और जोखिम में कमी को बढ़ावा देने 


के लिए साक्ष्य-आधारित अभ्यास मध्यवर्तन लागू करता है। 

स्व-अभ्यास में निरंतर गुणवत्ता सुधार प्रदर्शित करता है। 

देखभाल वितरण तथा समन्वय में सुधार के लक्ष्य के साथ तकनीकी एवं सूचना प्रणालियों की ताकत और 
बाधाओं का विश्लेषण करता है। 

बुजुर्गों के स्वास्थ्य देखभाल में नैतिक और कानूनी मानकों को लागू करता है। 

बुजुर्गों के सामान्य रोगों की पैथोफिजियोलॉजी की महत्वपूर्ण अवधारणाओं को अभिनिर्धारित करता है। 

प्रभावी देखभाल प्रदान करता है और जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल में नैदानिक कौशल में उत्कृष्ट बनता है। 


a. संस्थागत प्रोटोकॉल /स्थायी आदेश के आधार पर औषधि देना और जांच व उपचार के लिए आदेश 
देना 


छात्रों को संस्थागत प्रोटोकॉल /स्थायी आदेशों के अनुसार स्वतंत्र रूप से औषधि देने और नैदानिक परीक्षण, 


प्रक्रिया, 


चिकित्सा उपकरण व उपचारों का आदेश देने के लिए प्रशिक्षित किया जाएगा (परिशिष्ट-5: स्थायी 


आदेश)। आपातकालीन औषधियां संबंधित चिकित्सक के परामर्श से दी जाती हैं और बाद में लिखित आदेश द्वारा 
समर्थित की जाती हैं। 


[भाग ave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


पाठ्यचर्या का कार्यान्वयन - संभावित योजना 


प्रथम वर्षीय पाठ्यक्रम | परिचयात्म | कार्यशाला | नैदानिक अभ्यास शिक्षण पद्धतियां 
क ay में एकीकृत | (विषय निर्दिष्ट किया जा सकता 
सिद्धांत है) 

4. उन्‍नत नर्सिंग अभ्यास के 8 घंटे 4 x 32 - 32 dele सेमिनार /सैद्धांतिक अनुप्रयोग 
लिए सैद्धांतिक आधार (40) ० व्याख्यान (संकाय) 

2. जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल में शोध। 8 घंटे 40 65 दिन)|4 x 24 = 24 घंटे|* शोध अध्ययन विश्लेषण 
अनुप्रयोग तथा साक्ष्य + 8 घंटे e अभ्यास / निहित कार्य 
आधारित अभ्यास (56 + (प्रयोगशाला) 

24) 

3. नेतृत्व, प्रबंधन तथा शिक्षण 2 + 2 घंटे 4 » 26 - 26 dele नैदानिक GPa 
में उन्‍त कौशल (66 + 25 AR - 40* सेमिनार 
24) घंटे e अभ्यास / निहित कार्य 

(प्रयोगशाला) 

4. जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग में लागू 4.5 » 40 = 60 मामले की प्रस्तुति 
उन्‍नत पैथोफिजियोलॉजी घंटे » सेमिनार 
(60) ० नेदानिक कान्फ्रेंस 

5. जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग में लागू | ॥0 घंटे 4 » 44 = 44 Gele नर्सिंग राउंड्स 
उन्नत फार्माकोलॉजी (54) « औषधि अध्ययन प्रस्तुति 

© स्थायी आदेश » प्रस्तुति 

6. उन्नत स्वास्थ्य / शारीरिक 8 घंटे 2 x 26 = 52 घंटे नैदानिक प्रदर्शन (संकाय) 
आंकलन (70 + 48) 45 x 48 - 27 वापसी प्रदर्शन 

घंटे « नर्सिंग राउंड्स 
Shea ee आंकलन (सभी 
pease ) 
na मामले का अध्ययन 
2 % 2- 4 घंटे 
कुल योग 48 घंटे | 48 घंटे 33 घंटे 


प्रथम वर्ष — परिचयात्मक कक्षाएं = 4 सप्ताह (48 घंटे), 


प्रति सप्ताह (330 / 336 घंटे) 


कार्यशाला = 4 सप्ताह (48 घंटे), 44 सप्ताह = 7.5 घंटे 


द्वितीय वर्ष पाठ्यक्रम 


4 सप्ताह ब्लॉक कक्षाएं (48 


घंटे) 


नैदानिक अभ्यास में 
एकीकृत सिद्धांत 


शिक्षण पद्धतियां 


4. जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग अभ्यास के 


मूल (96 + 48 घंटे) = 444 
घंटे 


घंटे 


9 घंटे x 44 सप्ताह = 99 


० प्रदर्शन (प्रयोगशाला) 

० वापसी प्रदर्शन (प्रयोगशाला) 
० नैदानिक प्रशिक्षण 

» मामले का अध्ययन 

e सेमिनार 

० नैदानिक कान्फ्रेंस 

० संकाय व्याख्यान 


. जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग . ८ 
(96 + 48 घंटे) = 444 घंटे 


घंटे 


9 घंटे x 46 सप्ताह = 444 


» प्रदर्शन (प्रयोगशाला) 

० वापसी प्रदर्शन (प्रयोगशाला) 

० नेदानिक कान्फ्रेंस /जर्नल क्लब 

० सेमिनार 

« मामले की प्रस्तुति 

*» औषधि अध्ययन (औषधीय पारस्परिक प्रभाव 
सहित) 


2 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEC.4] 
द्वितीय af पाठ्यक्रम नैदानिक अभ्यास में शिक्षण पद्धतियां 
4 सप्ताह ब्लॉक कक्षाएं (48 एकीकृत सिद्धांत 


घंटे) 


० नर्सिंग राउंड्स 
० संकाय व्याख्यान 


3. 


(96 + 48 घंटे) = 444 घंटे घंटे ० वापसी प्रदर्शन 


जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग दृ प: |g घंटे x 46 सप्ताह = 444 प्रदर्शन (प्रयोगशाला) 


० नर्सिंग राउंड्स 

० नैदानिक कान्फ्रेंस /जर्नल क्लब 
० सेमिनार 

० संकाय व्याख्यान 


द्वितीय वर्ष: ब्लॉक कक्षाएं - 4 सप्ताह, 45 सप्ताह - 85/9 घंटे प्रति सप्ताह (382.5 / 284 घंटे) 
प्रत्येक शिक्षण पद्धति हेतु विषय को संबंधित शिक्षक / संस्थान द्वारा विस्तृत योजना में निर्दिष्ट किया जाएगा। 


I. 


दक्षताएं 
4. 


aor WON 


0. 
. 


मूल पाठ्यक्रम 
ved नर्सिंग अभ्यास के लिए सैद्धांतिक आधार 


वैश्विक स्वास्थ्य देखभाल प्रवृत्तियों और चुनौतियों का विश्लेषण करता है। 

भारत में स्वास्थ्य देखभाल और शिक्षा नीतियों के नर्सिंग पर प्रभाव का विश्लेषण करता है। 

भारत में स्वास्थ्य सेवा वितरण प्रणाली और इसकी चुनौतियों की गहन समझ विकसित करता है। 

जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल सेवाओं के वितरण के लिए प्रासंगिक आर्थिक सिद्धांतों को लागू करता है। 

लागत, गुणवत्ता और संतुष्टि जैसे स्वास्थ्य परिणामों को प्रभावित करने के लिए स्वास्थ्य जानकारी का प्रबंधन और 
रूपांतर करता है। 

नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर की भूमिकाओं और दक्षताओं का अभ्यास करने में जवाबदेही तथा जिम्मेदारी स्वीकार करता है। 
जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल में स्वास्थ्य देखभाल दल के सभी सदस्यों को शामिल करते हुए सहयोगी अभ्यास में सक्रिय 
रूप से भाग लेता है और अभ्यास के अधिकृत दायरे के भीतर भूमिका निभाता है। 

विधिक, नैतिक और oad नर्सिंग अभ्यास के नियमन की अच्छी जानकारी के साथ नैतिक अभ्यास में संलग्न 
होता है। 

सुनियोजित प्रीसेप्टरशिप के माध्यम से प्रदान किए गए प्रशिक्षण के अवसरों का उपयोग करता है और नर्सिंग 
प्रक्रिया ,, देखभाल पथ या नैदानिक पथ को लागू करते हुए सुरक्षित और सक्षम देखभाल करता है। 

बुजुर्ग रोगियों को सक्षम देखभाल प्रदान करने में नर्सिंग सिद्धांतों की जानकारी को लागू करता है। 

विभिन्‍न स्वास्थ्य देखभाल समायोजनों में नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर की भूमिकाओं में आगामी चुनौतियों का पूर्वानुमान लगाता 
है। 


निर्देशन अवधि: सैद्धांतिक: 40 घंटे 


क्र. विषय घंटे 

सं. 

4. विश्विक स्वास्थ्य देखभाल चुनौतियां और रुझान (दक्षता-4) 2 

2. भारत में स्वास्थ्य प्रणाली: 2 
भारत में स्वास्थ्य देखभाल वितरण प्रणाली - बदलते परिदृश्य (दक्षता-3) 

3. राष्ट्रीय स्वास्थ्य योजना - पंचवर्षीय योजनाएं और राष्ट्रीय स्वास्थ्य नीति (दक्षता-2) 2 

4. स्वास्थ्य अर्थशास्त्र और स्वास्थ्य देखभाल वित्तपोषण (दक्षता-4) 

5. नर्सिंग सूचना विज्ञान के साथ स्वास्थ्य सूचना प्रणाली (कंप्यूटर का उपयोग) (दक्षता-5) 4 


उन्नत नर्सिंग अभ्यास (एएनपी) 


| एएनपी - परिभाषा, दायरा, दर्शन, जवाबदेही, भूमिका और जिम्मेदारियां (सहयोगी अभ्यास और 3 
नर्स की निर्धारण भूमिकाएं) (दक्षता-6 व 7) 
7. विनियमन (प्रशिक्षण संस्थानों की मान्यता तथा प्रमाणन) और उन्नत नर्सिंग अभ्यास भूमिका के 3 


नैतिक आयाम (दक्षता-8) 


[भाग ave 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 3 


विषय घंटे 


नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर - भूमिका, प्रकार, दक्षता, अभ्यास के लिए नैदानिक समायोजन, सांस्कृतिक।| 3 
क्षमता (दक्षता-6) 


एनपी के लिए प्रशिक्षण - प्रीसेप्टरशिप (दक्षता-9) 


एनपी अभ्यास की भविष्य की चुनौतियां (दक्षता-44) 


. एपीएन पर लागू नर्सिंग के सिद्धांत (दक्षता-40) 


एपीएन पर लागू नर्सिंग प्रक्रिया / देखभाल पथ (दक्षता-9) 


0) | > | ०० | ++ | NM 


स्व-अध्ययन कार्य 


स्वास्थ्य देखभाल एवं शिक्षा नीतियों की पहचान करना और नर्सिंग पर इसके प्रभाव का 
विश्लेषण करना 


भारत में एनपी अभ्यास के लिए कानूनी स्थिति की व्याख्या करना। भारत में नर्स निर्धारण 
नीतियों का अन्य देशों में इन नीतियों की प्रासंगिकता के साथ क्या भविष्य है? 


प्राथमिक तथा गंभीर जेरिएट्रिक इकाइयों में पाए जाने वाले एनपी अभ्यास से संबंधित नर्सिंग 
प्रोटोकॉल की जांच करना 


कुल योग 40 घंटे 


संदर्भ ग्रंथ सूची 


Il. 


एएसीएन (2024). द एसंसियल्स: कोर कपीटेंसीज फॉर प्रोफेशनल नर्सिंग एडूकेशन - एंट्री लेवल एंड एडवांस्ड 
लेवल नर्सिंग एडूकेशन, अमेरिकन एसोसिएशन ऑफ कॉलेज ऑफ नर्सिंग | 

डि feel व बार्कर्स ए.एम. (20:5). एडवांस्ड प्रैक्टिस नर्सिंग: एसेंसियल नोलेज फॉर द प्रोफेशन (तीसरा 
संस्करण), मैसाचुसेट्स: जोंस एंड बार्टलेट पब्लिशर्स gH | 

आईसीएन (2020). गाइडलाइंस ऑन एडवांस्ड प्रैक्टिस नर्सिंग, जिनेवाः: आईसीएन | 

एनओएनपीएफ (2022). नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर रोल कंपीटेंसीज, नेशनल ऑर्गेनाइजेशन ऑफ नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर फैकल्टीज | 
स्कोबर एम. व अफारा एफ.ए. (2006). एडवांस्ड नर्सिंग प्रैक्टिस, ऑक्सफोर्ड: ब्लैकवेल पब्लिशिंग | 

स्टीवर्ट जी.जे. व डेनिस्को एस.एम. (20:5). रोल डेवलपमेंट फॉर द नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर, यूएसए: Ree पब्लिशिंग 
कंपनी | 

जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल में शोध अनुप्रयोग तथा साक्ष्य आधारित अभ्यास 


दक्षताएं 


t. 


6. 


जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल समायोजन में स्वतंत्र शोध करने में गहन शोध संबंधी जानकारी और कौशल को लागू करता 
है। 

रोगी देखभाल गुणवत्ता में सुधार लाने के लिए सहयोगी शोध में भाग लेता है। 

ईबीपी प्रस्तुति के लिए शोध निष्कर्षों की व्याख्या और उपयोग करता है। 

सर्वोत्तम अभ्यास विकसित करने और स्वास्थ्य परिणामों तथा गुणवत्ता देखभाल के लिए वर्तमान अभ्यास का 
परीक्षण / आंकलन करता है। 

सुरक्षा और देखभाल की प्रभावशीलता को बढ़ाने के लिए जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग अभ्यास में किए गए नर्सिंग मध्यवर्तन 
के साक्ष्य का विश्लेषण करता है। 

वैज्ञानिक शोध रिपोर्ट लेखन में कौशल विकसित करता है। 


निर्देशन अवधि: सैद्धांतिक: 56 + प्रयोगशाला / कौशल प्रयोगशाला: 24 = 80 घंटे 


S| 
सं. 


विषय घंटे 


t. 


शोध और ST नर्सिंग अभ्यास: 2 
उन्नत नर्सिंग भूमिका से संबंधित शोध और पूछताछ का महत्व (दक्षता-4) 


एपीएन अभ्यास के लिए शोध एजेंडा: 5 
सर्वोत्तम अभ्यास विकसित करने के लिए वर्तमान अभ्यास का परीक्षण, स्वास्थ्य परिणाम और 
Vad अभ्यास में गुणवत्तापरक देखभाल के संकेतक (दक्षता-3, 4, 5), शोध संस्कृति को 
बढ़ावा देना 


4 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEC.4] 
क्र. विषय घंटे 
सं. 

3. शोध संबंधी जानकारी तथा कौशल: 40 
एपीएन के लिए आवश्यक शोध दक्षताएं (शोध की व्याख्या और उपयोग, अभ्यास का आंकलन, (5 
सहयोगी शोध में भागीदारी) दिवसीय 
साक्ष्य आधारित अभ्यास (ईबीपी) परियोजना का परिचय - wes प्रश्न, योजना के चरण, कार्यशाला) 
कार्यान्वयन, मूल्यांकन और विस्तार (परियोजना प्रस्ताव और परियोजना रिपोर्ट) 
शोध क्रियाविधि 
चरण /सोपान 
(शोध प्रश्न, साहित्यिक समीक्षा, वैचारिक संरचना, शोध डिजाइन, नमूनाकरण, डेटा संग्रहण, 
पद्धतियां तथा उपकरण, विश्लेषण और रिपोर्टिंग) 
शोध प्रस्ताव और शोध रिपोर्ट लेखन (दक्षता-4, 2) 

4. [प्रकाशन के लिए लेखन 5 
(लेखन कार्यशाला - पाण्डुलिपि तैयार करना और वित्त पोषण के स्रोत gear) (दक्षता-6) (कार्यशाला) 

5. साक्ष्य आधारित अभ्यास 4 


- अवधारणा, सिद्धांत, महत्व और चरण 

- कार्य परिवेश में ईबीपी को एकीकृत करना 

- ईबीपी को लागू करने में बाधाएं 

- ईबीपी को बढ़ावा देने की रणनीतियां 
(दक्षता-3, 4, 5) 


कुल योग 56 घंटे 


व्यावहारिक / प्रयोगशाला और निहित कार्य: 24 घंटे 


शोध प्राथमिकताओं की पहचान करना 

शोध प्रश्न, उद्देश्य और परिकल्पना पर अभ्यास लेखन 

शोध प्रस्ताव /» ईबीपी परियोजना प्रस्ताव लेखन 

वैज्ञानिक पत्र लेखन - प्रकाशन के लिए पांडुलिपि तैयार करना 

व्यवस्थित समीक्षा /साहित्यिक समीक्षा लेखन - जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग में दिए गए नर्सिंग मध्यवर्तन के साक्ष्य का 
विश्लेषण करना 


व्यावहारिक 


व्यावहारिक शोध: शोध निबंध (336 घंटे = 7 सप्ताह) /साक्ष्य आधारित अभ्यास परियोजना (ईबीपी परियोजना) 


संदर्भ ग्रंथ सूची 


ग्रे जे. व ग्रोव एस.के. (2020). बर्न्स एंड ग्रोव्स, द प्रैक्टिस ऑफ नर्सिंग रिसर्च: अप्राइजल, सिंथेसिस एंड जनरेशन 
ऑफ एवीडेंस (at संस्करण), सेंट Age: एल्सेवियर सॉन्डर्स | 

पोलित डी.एफ. व बेक सी.टी. (2048). नर्सिंग रिसर्च: जेनेरेटिंग एंड एसेसिंग vasa फॉर नर्सिंग प्रैक्टिस (१वां 
संस्करण), नई दिल्‍ली: वॉल्टर्स क्लूवर | 

श्मिट VAN. व ब्राउन जे.एम. (2009). एविडेंस aes प्रैक्टिस फॉर नर्सेस अप्राइजल एंड एप्लिकेशन ऑफ रिसर्च, 
एसडी: जोंस एंड बार्टलेट पब्लिशर्स इंक | 


गा. नेतृत्व, प्रबंधन तथा शिक्षण में उन्‍नत कौशल 
दक्षताएं 

. 
2. 


जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल इकाइयों में नेतृत्व तथा प्रबंधन के सिद्धांतों को लागू करता है। 

सिद्धांतों की बेहतर जानकारी का उपयोग करके जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल समायोजन में तनाव और संघर्ष को प्रभावी 
ढंग से प्रबंधित करता है। 

समस्या समाधान और निर्णय लेने के कौशल को प्रभावी ढंग से लागू करता है। 

जेरिएट्रिक रोगी देखभाल में नेतृत्व प्रदान करने तथा प्रबंधन में महत्वपूर्ण चिंतन व संचार कौशल का उपयोग 
करता है। 

दल बनाता है और जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल समायोजन में दूसरों को प्रेरित करता है। 


[भागवता---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


इकाई का बजट तैयार करता है, आपूर्ति और स्टाफ का प्रभावी ढंग से प्रबंधन करता है। 
नवाचार और बदलाव के समय समुचित तरीके से भाग लेता है। 


SOON «0२ 


इकाइयों में गुणवत्ता और नैतिकता का अनुरक्षण करता है। 


शिक्षण के ठोस सिद्धांतों के आधार पर प्रभावी शिक्षण विधियों, मीडिया और आंकलन का उपयोग करता है। 
रोगी देखभाल में पक्ष-समर्थन भूमिका विकसित करता है, अस्पताल एवं सामुदायिक समायोजन की जेरिएट्रिक 


40. संकट की स्थिति में, विशेष रूप से मरणासन्न अवस्था में, परिजनों और रोगियों को परामर्श प्रदान करता है। 


निर्देशन अवधि: सैद्धांतिक: 56 + प्रयोगशाला / कौशल प्रयोगशाला: 24 = 80 घंटे 


DX. विषय घंटे 
4. सिद्धांत, नेतृत्व शैली और वर्तमान रुझान 2 
2. सिद्धांत, प्रबंधन शैली और वर्तमान रुझान 2 
3. जिरिएट्रिक देखभाल समायोजन पर लागू नेतृत्व और प्रबंधन के सिद्धांत 4 
4. िनाव प्रबंधन और टकराव प्रबंधन - सिद्धांत और जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल परिवेश में अनुप्रयोग, 4 

प्रभावी समय प्रबंधन 
5. गुणवत्ता सुधार और संपरीक्षा 4 
fea समस्या समाधान, महत्वपूर्ण चिंतन और निर्णय लेना, जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल नर्सिंग अभ्यास पर लागू। 5 
संचार कौशल 
7. जिरिएट्रिक वार्ड तथा सामुदायिक समायोजन में दल बनाना, प्रेरित करना और सलाह देना 2 
i बजट तथा संसाधन प्रबंधन जिसमें मानव संसाधन के साथ जेरिएट्रिक वार्ड /सामुदायिक 5 
समायोजन में बजट, सामग्री प्रबंधन, स्टाफ तथा निहित कार्य शामिल हैं 
| 9. बदलाव और नवाचार 2 
40. स्टाफ प्रदर्शन और मूल्यांकन (निष्पादन मूल्यांकन) | 6 | 
44. जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग पर लागू शिक्षण-अध्ययन सिद्धांत और नियम 2 
42. दिक्षता आधारित शिक्षा और परिणाम आधारित शिक्षा 2 
43. शिक्षण विधियां /रणनीतियां — अनुभवात्मक, चिंतनशील, परिदृश्य आधारित, अनुकरण आदि, ex 
मीडिया: जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल समायोजन में रोगियों और कर्मचारियों को शिक्षित करना 
44. कर्मचारी शिक्षा और आंकलन में उपकरणों का उपयोग 4 
45. [एपीएन - एक शिक्षक के रूप में भूमिका 
46. जिरिएट्रिक देखभाल परिवेश में समर्थन भूमिकाएं 2 
ea योग 56 घंटे 


व्यावहारिक / प्रयोगशाला = 24 घंटे 

4. स्टाफ रोगी निहित कार्य तैयार करना 
2. इकाई बजट तैयार करना 

3. स्टाफ ड्यूटी रोस्टर तैयार करना 

4. रोगी देखभाल संपरीक्षा 

5. नर्सिंग देखभाल मानक और प्रोटोकॉल तैयार करना 
6 

7 

8 


उपकरण और आपूर्ति प्रबंधन 
संक्रमण नियंत्रण प्रथाओं की निगरानी, मूल्यांकन और रिपोर्ट लेखन 
. शिक्षण योजना विकसित करना 
9. सूक्ष्म शिक्षण /रोगी शिक्षा सत्र 
40. रोगियों और कर्मियों के लिए शिक्षण पद्धति और मीडिया तैयार करना 
44. ओएससीई /ओएसपीई की योजना बनाना और संचालन करना 
42. परीक्षण निर्माण 


निहित कार्य: जेरिएट्रिक इकाई के लिए नर्सिंग देखभाल मानक तैयार करना। 
संदर्भ ग्रंथ सूची 


© acd एस.बी. (20:9). नर्स एज एडूकेटर: प्रिंसिपल्स ऑफ टीचिंग एंड लर्निंग फॉर aR प्रैक्टिस (bai 


संस्करण), नई दिल्‍ली: जोंस एंड बार्टलेट पब्लिशर्स इंक। 


6 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


« बिलिंग्स डी.एम. व हैल्स्टेड TY (20:9). टीचिंग इन aT: अ गाइड फॉर फैकल्टी (छठा संस्करण), सेंट लुइस, 
मिसौरी: dieses एल्सवियर | 

e gah सी.सी. (2040). क्रिएटिव नर्सिंग लीडरशिप एंड मेनेजमेंट, नई दिल्‍ली: जोंस Us बार्टलेट पब्लिशर्स इंक | 

* older जे.जी. व मैक्कोनेल सी.आर. (2008). मेनेजमेंट प्रिंसिपल्स फॉर हैल्थ प्रोफेशनल्स, सडबरी, VU: जोंस 
एंड बार्टलेट पब्लिशर्स So | 

e Wa एल. व स्वांसबर्ग आर.सी. (2040). मेनेजमेंट एंड लीडरशिप फॉर नर्स एडमिनिस्ट्रेटर्स (5वां संस्करण), नई 
दिल्‍ली: जोंस एंड बार्टलेट पब्लिशर्स sm | 

उन्नत नर्सिंग पाठ्यक्रम 

Iv. जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग में लागू उन्‍नत पैथोफिजियोलॉजी 

दक्षताएं 

4. जेरिएट्रिक स्थितियों में पैथोफिजियोलॉजिकल प्रक्रिया के ज्ञान को निदान और देखभाल योजना तैयार करने के 
लिए एकीकृत करता है। 

2. बुजुर्गों में लक्षण प्रबंधन और रोगों की द्वितीयक रोकथाम में पैथोफिजियोलॉजिकल सिद्धांतों को लागू करता है। 

3. निदान, उपचार, देखभाल और पूर्वानुमान के मूल्य को पहचानते हुए प्रत्येक जेरिएट्रिक रोग से संबंधित 
पैथोफिजियोलॉजिकल परिवर्तनों का विश्लेषण करता है। 

निर्देशन अवधि: सैद्धांतिक: 30 घंटे 

इकाई घंटे विषय 

| | 4 [रोग प्रतिरक्षा कारक 
० प्रतिरक्षा प्रणली घटक 


* प्रतिरक्षा अनुक्रिया तंत्र 


प्रतिरक्षा में कमी और लसीका प्रसार संबंधी विकार 


रोग प्रतिरोधक क्षमता 


० प्रतिरक्षा प्रतिक्रियाओं के प्रकार 


« टीके 


a |2 | संक्रमण तथा रोग 


» महामारी तथा संक्रमण का प्रसार 


* संक्रमण का निदान तथा प्रबंधन (आरटीआई, यूटीआई, त्वचा) 


| गा | 4 फ्ल्यूड तथा इलेक्ट्रोलाइट संतुलन 


e हाइपरनेट्रेमिया व हाइपोनेट्रेमिया 


e हाइपरकेलेमिया व हाइपोकेलेमिया 


e केल्शियम-फॉस्फेट तथा मैग्नीशियम मेटाबोलिज्म »विटामिन डी 


e एसिड बेस में गड़बड़ी 


IV Ee कार्डियोवस्कुलर फंक्शन 
हृदय संबंधी स्थितियों की sara पैथोफिजियोलॉजिकल प्रक्रिया 


e कार्डियोमायोपैथी 


मायोकार्डिटिस 


उच्च रक्तचाप (हाइपरटेंशन) 


महाधमनीय रोग 


बाह्य संवहनीय रोग 


e इस्कीमिक हृदय रोग 


Vv io Ta) फंक्शन 
फुफ्फुसीय स्थितियों की उन्‍नत पैथोफिजियोलॉजिकल प्रक्रिया 


e od व निचले श्वसन तंत्र के विकार 


e ब्रोन्कियल अस्थमा, सीओपीडी, कोर पल्मोनेल 


* गंभीर और oft श्वसन विफलता (एक्यूट एंड क्रोनिक रेस्पिरेटरी फेल्योर) 


[भागवता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


iG; 


इकाई 


घंटे 


विषय 


e फेफड़े की रसौली (नियोप्लाज्म्स ऑफ लंग) 


* इंटरस्टिशियल at डिसीज (आईएलडी) - डिसीज ऑफ प्ल्यूरा, मीडियास्टिनम एंड डायाफ्राम 


VI 


गैस्ट्रोइंटैस्टिनल फंक्शन 
जठरांत्रिय स्थितियों की saa पैथोफिजियोलॉजिकल प्रक्रिया 


e ग्रासनली (ओसियोफेगस) के रोग 


*« खाने की नली में खाना ऊपर लौटना (गैस्ट्रोसियोफेगस रिफलक्स रोग) 


* पेप्टिक अल्सर, गैस्ट्रिटिस (जठर शोध) 


« पेट की असाध्यता, कोलन (बृहदान्त्र) 


शा 


हेपेटोबिलरी एंड पैंक्रियाटिक फंक्शन 
हेपेटोबिलरी स्थितियों की उन्‍नत पैथोफिजियोलॉजिकल प्रक्रिया 


« यकृत रोग की नैदानिक प्रक्रियाएं 


यकृत / पित्त चयापचय की गड़बड़ी 


गंभीर यकृत शोध 


जीर्ण यकृत शोध 


यकृत का सूत्रण विकार (सिरोसिस) 


यकृत के ट्यूमर 


यकृत में फोड़ा होना (एब्सेस) 


कोलेसीस्टाइटिस, कोलेलिथियसिस 


पैंक्रियाटिटिस (अग्नाशयशोथ) 


० पेंक्रियाटिक मेलिग्नेंसी (अग्न्याशय की असाध्यता) 


vill 


एंडोक्राइन फंक्शन 
अंतःस्रावी स्थितियों की उन्‍नत पैथोफिजियोलॉजिकल प्रक्रिया 


« पीयूष ग्रंथि (पिट्यूटरी ग्लैंड) 


« एंटीरियर पिट्यूटरी रोग 


* न्यूरोहाइपोफाइसिस रोग 


e हाइपर एंड हाइपोथायरायडिज्म 


० हाइपर एंड हाइपोपैराथायरायडिज्म 


e मधुमेह 


« अधिवृक्क प्रांतस्था और मज्जा (कॉर्टेक्स एंड Age) रोग 


Ix 


रीनल Us यूरीनरी फंक्शन 
गुर्दे व मूत्र संबंधी स्थितियों की saa पैथोफिजियोलॉजिकल प्रक्रिया 


« गंभीर वृक्‍्कीय विफलता (एक्यूट रीनल फेल्योर) 


जीर्ण gaa विकार 


नेफ्रोटिक सिंड्रोम 


नेफ्रिटिक सिंड्रोम 


गुर्दे के संवहनीय विकार (qe धमनीय संकुचन) 


नेफ्रोलिथियासिस 


ऑस्सट्रक्टिव यूरोपैथी 


यूरीनरी ट्रैक्ट इनफैक्शन (मूत्र मार्ग में संक्रमण) 


यूरीनरी इनकंटीनेंस (मूत्रीय असंयमिता) 


एपिडिडायमोर्चिटिस (अधिवृषण शोध) 


हेमाटोलॉजिकल फंक्शन 
रक्‍त संबंधी स्थितियों की seta पैथोफिजियोलॉजिकल प्रक्रिया 


० रक्‍त संरचना व भंजन 


8 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


इकाई | घंटे विषय 


Vat समूह और रकताधान प्रतिक्रिया 


* vated (एनीमिया) 


e अस्थि मज्जा विफलता (बोन ART फेल्योर) 


मायलोप्रोलिफेरेटिव डिस्ऑर्डर 


इडियोपैथिक श्रोम्बोसाइटोपेनिक पुरपुरा (आईटीपी) 


* अधिश्वते रक्‍तता (ल्यूकेमिया) 


e लिम्फोमास 


xI डर wae ऑफ कनेक्टिव टिस्यूज, जाइंट्स एंड बोस 
संयोजी ऊतक, जोड़ और esa को प्रभावित करने वाली स्थितियों की wa 
पैथोफिजियोलॉजिकल प्रक्रिया 


* संधिवात गठिया (रिह्यूमेटोइड आर्थिरिटिस) 


रीढ़ के जोड़ों में गतिविधि-रोधक सूजन (एंकोलोजिंग स्पोंडिलिसिस) 


* प्रणालीगत रक्तिम त्वग्यक्ष्मा (सिस्टेमिक ल्यूपस इराइथिमेटोसिस) 


e पॉलीमेल्जिया 


वात विकार (गाउट) 


अस्थिसंधिशोध (ओस्टिओआर्थिरिटिस) 


* हड्डी के विकार - चयापचय और अंतःस्रावी (मेटाबोलिक एंड एंडोक्राइन) 


xi fea न्यूरोलॉजिकल फंक्शन 
तंत्रिका संबंधी स्थितियों की उन्‍नत पैथोफिजियोलॉजिकल प्रक्रिया 


न्यूरोलॉजी में नैदानिक परीक्षण — ईएमजी, स्कैन 


* प्रगाढ़ बेहोशी (कोमा) 


« सिर दर्द 


© मिर्गी (एपिलेप्सी) 


e नींद संबंधी विकार - ऑब्सट्रक्टिव ella एप्निया 


e कपाल तंत्रिकाओं (क्रेनियल नर्व्स) के विकार 


« सेरेब्रोवस्कुलर विकार - सीवीए, ट्रांजिएंट इस्केमिक अटैक 


० रीढ़ की हड्डी (स्पाइनल Os) में चोट 


* परिधीय तंत्रिका विकृति (पेरीफेरल न्यूरोपैथी) 


० सीएनएस के पायोजेनिक संक्रमण - एन्सेफलाइटिस, मेनिनजाइटिस 


« वायरल संक्रमण - हर्षीस UCR 


e डिमाइलिनेटिंग विकार 


« अपक्षयी विकार - पार्किसंस विकार, प्रोग्रेसिव yur न्यूक्लियर ures 


सीएनएस में चयापचय और पोषण संबंधी विकार - विटामिन बी42, थायमिन 


xi fe इंटिगुमेंटरी फंक्शन 
झिल्ली संबंधित स्थितियों की sera पैथोफिजियोलॉजिकल प्रक्रिया 


* प्रणालीगत रोग की त्वचीय अभिव्यक्ति (क्यूटेनियस मेनिफेस्टेशन ऑफ fecha इलनेस) 


° सामान्य खुजली ([प्रूरिटिस) 


e त्वचीय रंजकता और शल्कीत्वचा (स्किन पिगमेंटेशन एंड इच्थायोसिस) 


दाद (स्केबीज) 


* संश्लेषण संवेदनशीलता (फोटोसेंसिटिविटी) 


विचर्चिका (सोरायसिस) 


त्वचा का फंगल संक्रमण 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 9 


संदर्भ ग्रंथ सूची 


V. 


बर्कोविदूज ए. (2024). क्लिनिकल पैथोफिजियोलॉजी (दूसरा संस्करण), मेडमास्टर इंक. 

ह्यूथर Wag. मैककैंस HVA. व ब्रशर्स वी.एल. (2049). अंडरस्टेंडिंग पैथोफिजियोलॉजी (7वां संस्करण), सेंट 
लुइस, मिसौरी: veufaar | 

नॉरिस टी.एल. (2020). पोर्थ्स एसेंशियल्स ऑफ पैथोफिजियोलॉजी (5वां संस्करण), वाल्टर्स एंड क्लूवर | 

पोर्थ सी.एम. (2007). असेंसियल्स ऑफ पैथोफिजियोलॉजी: कसेप्ट्स ऑफ अल्टर्ड oa स्टेट्स (चौथा संस्करण), 
फिलाडेल्फिया: लिपिनकॉट विलियम्स एंड विल्किस | 

स्टोरी एल. व डलुगाश एल. (2049). एडवांस्ड पैथोफिजियोलॉजी फॉर द एडवांस्ड प्रैक्टिस नर्स (पहला संस्करण), 
जोंस एंड बार्टलेट पब्लिशर्स इंक. 

विलिस एल.एम. (209). प्रोफेशनल गाइड फॉर पैथोफिजियोलॉजी (चौथा संस्करण), एलडब्ल्यूडब्ल्यू | 

जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग में लागू ota फार्माकोलॉजी 


दक्षताएं 


6 


बुजुर्ग रोगियों और परिजनों को देखभाल प्रदान करने में औषधीय सिद्धांतों को लागू करता है। 

बुजुर्ग रोगियों में उपयोग की जाने वाली प्रासंगिक उपचार औषधियों (फार्मेकोथेराप्यूटिक ड्रग्स) का विश्लेषण 
करता है। 

सैद्धांतिक और संस्थागत प्रोटोकॉल के आधार पर सुरक्षित औषधि प्रशासन करता है। 

सटीक दस्तावेजीकरण और अनुवर्ती देखभाल प्रदान करता है। 

गंभीर देखभाल समायोजन में बुजुर्ग रोगियों के औषधि प्रशासन में औषधियों की अंतःक्रियाओं की ठोस जानकारी 
को प्रयोग में लाता है। 

स्व-देखभाल प्रबंधन में उनके परिजनों का मार्गदर्शन करता है। 


निर्देशन अवधि: सैद्धांतिक: 54 घंटे 


इकाई घंटे विषय 
है जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल में औषध विज्ञान (फार्माकोलॉजी) का परिचय 
e इतिवृत्त 
° इंडैक्स कार्ड 


*« औषधियों का वर्गीकरण और अनुसूचियां 


। फार्माकोकाइनेटिक्स और फार्माकोडायनेमिक्स 
* परिचय 
* बुजुर्गों में अवशोषण, विस्तार, चयापचय, फैलाव और उत्सर्जन 
« प्लाज्मा सांद्रता, अर्द्ध आयु (हाफ लाइफ) 
* लोडिंग एंड मेंटिनेंस डोज 


चिकित्सा सूचकांक और औषधि सुरक्षा 

क्षमता और प्रभावकारिता 

औषधि प्रशासन के सिद्धांत 

=» औषधि प्रशासन के अधिकार 

= माप प्रणालियां 

» औषधि प्रशासन - आंत्रीय, सामयिक और आंत्रेतर (एंटेरल, टोपिकल एंड पेरेंटेरल) 


| | ater विज्ञान (फार्माकोलॉजी) और बुजुर्गों में हृदय संबंधी प्रत्यावर्तन (कार्डियोवस्कूलर 


see a) 

* हृद्शूल (एंजिना पेक्टोरिस), हृद्पेशीय रोधगलन (मायोकार्डियल इंफारक्शन) और ह्ृद्पात प्रबंधन 
औषधियां 

अतालता (डिसरिथमिआस), ह्ृद्रोध (हर्ट ब्लॉक) और चालन (Hse) गड़बड़ी की प्रबंधन 
औषधियां 

* महाधमनी और परिधीय धमनी रोग के एथेरोस्क्‍क्लोरोटिक रोग की प्रबंधन औषधियां 

* गहरी शिरा घनास्त्रता (डीप वीन शथ्रोम्बोसिस) प्रबंधन औषधियां 

हृदय संबंधी आपात स्थितियों के लिए संस्थागत प्रोटोकॉल / स्थायी आदेश 


IV 5 औषध विज्ञान (फार्माकोलॉजी) और बुजुर्गों में फुफ्फुसीय प्रत्यावर्तन (पल्मोनरी अल्ट्रेशंस) 


* स्थिति दमा (स्टेटस अस्थ्मेटिकस) प्रबंधन औषधियां 
« फुफ्फुसीय शोथ (पल्मोनरी एडिमा) प्रबंधन औषधियां 
« फफ्फसीय अंतःशल्यता (पल्मोनरी एंबोलिज्म) प्रबंधत औषधियां 


20 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


इकाई | घंटे विषय 


एक्यूट रेस्पिरेटरी फेल्यर Us एक्यूट रेस्पिरेटरी डिस्ट्रैस सिंड्रोम की प्रबंधन औषधियां 
जीर्ण प्रतिरोधी फुफ्फुसीय (क्रोनिक ऑक्स्ट्रक्टिव पल्‍्मोनरी) रोग प्रबंधन औषधियां 
निमोनिया प्रबंधन औषधियां 

फुफ्फुसीय बहाव (प्लूरल एफ्यूजन) प्रबंधन औषधियां 

श्वासरोध (एटिलेक्टेसिस) प्रबंधन औषधियां 

pps eae) आपात स्थितियों के लिए स्थायी आदेश 


V औषध विज्ञान (फार्माकोलॉजी) और बुजुर्गों में तंत्रिका संबंधी प्रत्यावर्तन (न्यूरोलॉजिकल 
अल्ट्रेशंस) 

«दर्द 

= डब्ल्यूएचओ Wout (पेन) लेडर 

= एनएसएआईडी 

« ओपोइड एनल्जेसिया 

बेहोश करने की क्रिया (सीडेशन) 

* गामा अमीनो ब्यूटिरिक एसिड स्टिमुलेंट्स 

* डेक्‍्समेडेटोमिडाइन 

= अनुरूपीकरण (एनोलॉगाइजेशंस) 

= बेहोश करने की क्रिया हेतु निगरानी नीति 

प्रलाप (डेलिरियम) 

« हेलोपेरिडोल 

* असामान्य मनोविकार नाशक (एटिपिकल एंटीसाइकोटिक्स) 

स्थानीय और सामान्य संज्ञाहरण (एनेस्थीसिया) के लिए उपयोग की जाने वाली औषधियां 
* स्थानीय - एमाइड्स, एस्टर्स और विविध एजेंट 

* सामान्य - गैस, वाष्पशील तरल पदार्थ, प्ट एनेस्थेटिक्स 

* शल्यचिकित्सा में सहायक गैर संवेदनाहारी औषधियां 

= रोगी नियंत्रित संज्ञाहरण 

लकवे की औषधियां 

* गैर-विध्रुवण और विघ्रुवण एजेंट 

= एंक्सिओलिटिक्स 

स्वायत्त औषधियां (ऑटोनोमिक ड्रग्स) 

= एड्रीनर्जिक एजेंट » सिम्पेथोमिमेटिक्स 

= एड्रीनर्जिक ब्लॉकिंग एजेंट 

= एंटी कोलीनर्जिक एजेंट 

चिंता और अनिद्रा प्रबंधन औषधियां 

= टवसादरोधक (एंटीडिप्रेसेंट्स) 

« बेंजोडायजेपाइन्स 

तंत्रिका संबंधी रोगों (न्यूरोलॉजिकल कंडीशंस) की प्रबंधन औषधियां 

= सेरेब्रो-वैस्कुलर रोग और सेरेब्रो-वैस्कुलर दुर्घटना 

एन्सेफैलोपैथी 

उच्च आंतरकपालीय दबाव (एलिवेटेड इंट्राक्रेनियल wax) के साथ सिर व रीढ़ की हड्डी में 
गंभीर चोट 

कोमा, बेहोशी, और लगातार निष्क्रियता (कोमा, अनकोंसियसनेस एंड पर्सिस्टिंट वेजिटेटिव 
स्टेट) 

दौरे का विकार (सिजर डिस्ऑॉर्डर) 

पार्किसनिज्म 

= अल्जाइमर रोग 

= बिस्तर पर पड़ा हुआ रोगी 

तंत्रिका संबंधी (न्यूरोलॉजिकल) आपात स्थितियों के लिए स्थायी आदेश 


VI हि औषध विज्ञान (फार्माकोलॉजी) और बुजुर्गों में नेफ्रोलॉजी प्रत्यावर्तन (अल्ट्रेशंस) 
° मूत्रलवर्धक 
e द्रव प्रतिस्थापन 


[भागवता---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


2I 


इकाई 


घंटे 


विषय 


= क्रिस्टलोइड्स 

* कोलाइड्स 

इलेक्ट्रोलाइट्स 

सोडियम 

पोटैशियम 

कैल्शियम 

मैग्नीशियम 

फास्फोरस 

बाइकार्बोनिट 

गुर्दे से संबंधित रोग 

" गंभीर / जीर्ण गुर्दे की विफलता (एक्यूट /क्रोनिक रीनल फेल्यर)) की प्रबंधन औषधियां 
= गंभीर ट्यूबलर नेक्रोसिस की प्रबंधन औषधियां 

» डायलिसिस के दौरान उपयोग की जाने वाली औषधियां 

वृक्‍क संबंधी (नेफ्रोलॉजी) आपात स्थितियों के लिए स्थायी आदेश 


Vil 


औषध विज्ञान (फार्माकोलॉजी) और बुजुर्गों में जठरांत्र प्रत्यावर्तन (गैस्ट्रोइंटेस्टिनल 
अल्ट्रेशंस) 

अल्सर Vell औषधियां 

रेचक (लैक्सेटिव्स) 

अतिसार रोधी 

वमनरोधी 

पैंक्रियाटिक एंजाइम्स 

पोषक तत्वों की खुराक, विटामिन और खनिज 

जहरांत्र रोग 

निम्नलिखित के प्रबंधन की औषधियां 

* जटरांत्र शल्यचिकित्सा और जिगर प्रत्यारोपण (लिवर ट्रांसप्लांट) 
Wea में गंभीर vara 

यकृत विफलता (हेपाटिक फेल्यर) 

गंभीर अग्नाशयशोथ (एक्यूट पैक्रियाटिटिस) 

जिगर संबंधी मष्तिष्क विकृति (cafes एंसीफेलोपेथी) 

vera संबंधी (गैस्ट्रोइंटेस्टिनल) आपात स्थितियों के लिए स्थायी आदेश 


Vul 


औषध विज्ञान (फार्माकोलॉजी) और बुजुर्गों में अंत:स्रावी प्रत्यावर्तन (एंडोक्राइन अल्ट्रेशंस) 
० हार्मोनल थेरेपी 
« इंसुलिन और अन्य हाइपोग्लाइसेमिक एजेंट 
* अंतःस्रावी गंभीर देखभाल स्थिति 
* हाइपोग्लाइकेमिया व हाइपरग्लाइकेमिया प्रबंधन औषधियां 
* हाइपोथायरायडिज्म व हाइपरथायरायडिज्म प्रबंधन औषधियां 
* अधिवृक्क संकट (एड्रिनल क्राइसिस) प्रबंधन औषधियां 
=» सिआध प्रबंधन औषधियां 
* अंतःस्रावी (एंडोक्राइन) संबंधी आपात स्थितियों के लिए स्थायी आदेश 


Ix 


औषध विज्ञान (फार्माकोलॉजी) और बुजुर्गों में रुधिर संबंधी प्रत्यावर्तन (हेमाटोलॉजी 
अल्ट्रेशंस) 
« स्कंदनरोधी (एंटीकोएगुलेंट्स) 
* एंटीप्लेटलेट औषधियां 
० थ्रोम्बोलाइटिक्स 
e हेमोस्टैटिक्स /एंटीफाइब्रिनोलिटिक्स 
e Vdd और रक्त उत्पाद संकेत और प्रतिक्रिया 
* ala os tas Ys ब्लड सैल्स, ल्यूकोसाइट-रिड्यूस्ड रैड सैल्स, aes रैड ब्लड सैल्स, फ्रैश 
फ्रोजन प्लाज्मा, क्रायोप्रेसिपिटेट 


= आधान प्रतिक्रियाएं, आधान प्रशासन प्रक्रिया 


22 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SECc.4] 


इकाई | घंटे विषय 


= एल्बुमिन 

टीके 

प्रतिरक्षादमनकारी 

कीमोथेराप्यूटिक औषधियां - एल्काइलेटिंग एजेंट, एंटी-मेटाबोलाइट्स, एंटी-ट्यूमर 
एंटीबायोटिक्स, एल्कलॉइड्स, हार्मोन और हार्मोन एंटागोनिस्ट, कॉर्टिकोस्टेरॉइड्स, गोनाडल 
हार्मोन, एंटी-एस्ट्रोजेन, एण्ड्रोजन एंटागोनिस्ट, जैविक प्रतिक्रिया संशोधक 

wR संबंधी (हेमाटोलॉजी) स्थितियां 

* एनीमिया श्रोम्बोसाइटोपेनिया प्रबंधन औषधियां 

» डीआईसी प्रबंधन औषधियां 

= श्रोम्बोसाइटोपेनिया और एक्यूट ल्यूकेमिया प्रबंधन औषधियां 

* ट्यूमर लाइसिस सिंड्रोम प्रबंधन औषधियां 

ग्राफ्ट बनाम होस्ट रोग जैसी रुधिर संबंधी (हेमाटोलॉजी) आपात स्थितियों के लिए स्थायी आदेश 


xX है alee विज्ञान (फार्माकोलॉजी) और बुजुर्गों में त्वचीय प्रत्यावर्तन (स्किन अल्ट्रेशंस) 
e जलन प्रबंधन में उपयोग की जाने वाली औषधियां 

e घाव प्रबंधन में उपयोग की जाने वाली औषधियां 

e त्वचा की गंभीर देखभाल संबंधी आपात स्थिति के लिए स्थायी आदेश 


XI = विज्ञान (फार्माकोलॉजी) और बुजुर्गों में बहु-प्रणालीय प्रत्यावर्तन (मल्टीसिस्टम 
अल्ट्रेशंस) 

we, सेप्सिस, मल्टीपल ऑर्गन डिसफंक्शन, प्रणालीगत सूजन प्रतिक्रिया सिंड्रोम 
एनाफिलेक्सिस की प्रबंधन औषधियां 

काटने, दवा की अधिक मात्रा और विषाक्तता की प्रबंधन औषधियां 

अल्पकालिक बुखार की प्रबंधन औषधियां 

* ज्वरनाशक (एंटीपाइरेटिक्स) 

*" कॉर्टिकोस्टेरॉइड्स 

बहु-प्रणालीय (मल्टीसिस्टम) आपात स्थितियों के लिए स्थायी आदेश 


XII | औषध विज्ञान (फार्माकोलॉजी) और बुजुर्गों में संक्रमण 
« जीवाणुरोधी औषधियां 


» परिचय 

= बीटा लैक्टम - पेनिसिलिन, सेफलोस्पोरिन, मोनोबैक्टम, कार्बापेनम, 
© अमीनोग्लाइकोसाइड्स 

० एंटी एमआरएसए औषधियां - वैनकोमाइसिन 

* मेक्रोलाइड्स 

* कुइनोलोनेस 


विविध - लिन्कोसामाइड समूह, नाइट्रोइमिडाजोल, टेट्रासाइक्लिन और क्लोरैम्फेनिकॉल, 

पॉलीमीक्सिन, मलेरिया रोधी, फंगल रोधी, वायरल Vell, प्रोटोजोअल रोधी औषधियां 

रोगाणुरोधकों का चयन 

संक्रामक स्थितियां 

= एचआईवी, टेटनस, सार्स, रिकेट्सियोसिस, लेप्टोस्पायरोसिस, डेंगू, मलेरिया, चिकनगुनिया, 
रेबीज, एवियन फ्लू और स्वाइन फ्लू, सीओवीआईडी की प्रबंधन औषधियां 

० बैरियर नर्सिंग 

« संक्रामक आपात स्थितियों के लिए स्थायी आदेश 


XIII | विविध 
« पॉलिफार्मेसी 
e औषधियों का पालन 
« रोगी शिक्षा और औषधि अनुपालन 
e सामान्य निर्धारण सिद्धांत 
e साइकाइट्री औषधियां 
« Fane (डिमेंसिया) 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 23 


इकाई घंटे विषय 


प्रलाप (डेलिरियम) 

faydt साहचर्य विकार (बाइपोलर एसोसिएटिव डिस्ऑर्डर) 
अवसाद (डिप्रेसन) 

अनिद्रा (इनसोमनिया) 


संदर्भ ग्रंथ सूची 


Vv 


ईसेन एच.जे. (2020). फार्माकोलॉजी ऑफ SRA (पहला संस्करण), RTE | 

मैके जी.ए. व वाल्टर्स एम.आर. (2024). क्लिनिकल फार्माकोलॉजी एंड थेरेप्यूटिक्स (ogi संस्करण), 
वाइली-ब्लैकवेल | 

त्रिपाठी के.डी. (2049). एसेंशिअल्स ऑफ मेडिकल फार्माकोलॉजी (al संस्करण), जेपी ब्रदर्स मेडिकल पब्लिशर्स, 
नई दिल्‍ली | 

faq ए.एल., वू टी.एम. व ओल्याई ए.जे. (2007). फार्माकोथेरेप्यूटिक्स फॉर नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर प्रिस्क्राइबर्स (दूसरा 
संस्करण), फिलाडेल्फिया: डेविस | 


L Od स्वास्थ्य / शारीरिक आंकलन 


दक्षताएं 


t. 


2. 


3. 
4. 


5. 


उपयुक्त प्रणालीवार परीक्षा कौशल विकसित करने और विशेषतः गिरने, औषधियों, शय्या घाव आदि के लिए 
शारीरिक आंकलन सिद्धांतों को लागू करता है। 

सामान्य और असामान्य निष्कर्षों की विविधता के बीच अंतर करने के लिए Gd स्वास्थ्य आंकलन कौशल का 
उपयोग करता है। 

जांच निष्कर्षों और संस्थागत प्रोटोकॉल के आधार पर जांच और नैदानिक परीक्षणों का आदेश देता है। 

शारीरिक जांच निष्कर्षों और विभिन्‍न जांच परिणामों का विश्लेषण करता है और आवश्यक निदान विकास के लिए 
जराचिकित्सकों के साथ मिलकर काम करता है। 

स्वास्थ्य देखभाल दल के सदस्यों, रोगियों और परिवारों की साझेदारी में दस्तावेजों का आंकलन, निदान व प्रबंधन 
और अनुवर्ती देखभाल की निगरानी करता है। 


निर्देशन अवधि: सैद्धांतिक: 70 घंटे + प्रयोगशाला / कौशल प्रयोगशाला: 48 घंटे 


इकाई | घंटे विषय 


a ie परिचय 
« इतिवृत्त लेना 
e शारीरिक जांच 


प्रणालीवार आंकलन 


i ; हृदय प्रणाली (कार्डियोवस्कूलर सिस्टम) 


« हृदय संबंधी इतिवृत्त (कार्डियाक हिस्ट्री) 

० शारीरिक जांच 

e हृदय प्रयोगशाला अध्ययन - जैवरसायनिक चिन्हक, रक्त जांच 

e हृदय निदान अध्ययन - इलेक्ट्रोकार्डियोग्राम, इकोकार्डियोग्राफी, तनाव परीक्षण, रेडियोलॉजिकल 
इमेजिंग 


i : श्वसन प्रणाली (रेस्पिरेटरी सिस्टम) 


e इतिवृत्त 

© शारीरिक जांच 

e श्वसन निगरानी - आर्टिरियल ब्लड गैस, पल्‍्स ऑक्सीमेट्री 

« श्वसन निदान परीक्षण - चैस्ट रेडियोग्राफी (वेंटिलेशन परफ्यूजन ehh, फुफ्फुसीय 
एंजियोग्राफी, ब्रोंकोस्कोपी, थोरैसेन्टेसिस, स्पूटम कल्चर, UH Haar टैस्ट) 


IV तंत्रिका प्रणाली (ada सिस्टम) 


न्यूरोलॉजिकल इतिवृत्त 

सामान्य शारीरिक जांच 

संज्ञानात्मक कार्य का आंकलन 

उच्च मानसिक कार्यप्रणाली का आंकलन 

मोटर असेसमेंट - मांसपेशियों की क्षमता, ताकत और सजगता (रिफलेक्सेस) 
अनुमस्तिष्क कार्य - चाल (सेरिबेलर फंक्शन - गैट) 

संवेदी आंकलन — त्वचा संबंधी आंकलन (सेंसरी असेसमेंट - डर्माटोम असेसमेंट) 


24 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEC.4] 
इकाई | घंटे विषय 
« न्यूरोडायग्नोस्टिक अध्ययन — सीटी स्कैन, एमआरआई, पीईटी, आंख / सुनना 
Vv | वृक्‍क प्रणाली (रीनल सिस्टम) 
e इतिवृत्त 
० शारीरिक जांच 
* गुर्दे की कार्यप्रणाली का आंकलन 
e द्रव संतुलल आंकलन 
VI ! जरराांत्र प्रणाली (गैस्ट्रोइंटेस्टिनल सिस्टम) 
e इतिवृत्त 
० शारीरिक जांच 
e पोषण संबंधी आंकलन 
© प्रयोगशाला अध्ययन — यकृत फलन (लिवर फंक्शन) अध्ययन, रक्‍त मानदंड, मल परीक्षण 
e नैदानिक अध्ययन — रेडियोलॉजिकल अध्ययन, इमेजिंग अध्ययन और एंडोस्कोपिक अध्ययन 
शा | अंतःस्रावी प्रणाली (एंडोक्राइन सिस्टम) 
« निम्नलिखित का इतिवृत्त, शारीरिक जांच, प्रयोगशाला अध्ययन और नैदानिक अध्ययन 
= पिट्यूटरी ग्लैंड 
= थाइरॉयड ग्लैंड 
» पेराथाइरॉइड ग्लैंड 
» एंडोक्राइन ग्लैंड - डायबिटीज मेलेटस 
= एड्रिनल ग्लैंड 
VIII r हेमेटोलॉजिकल प्रणाली 
e इतिवृत्त 
० शारीरिक जांच 
« प्रयोगशाला अध्ययन - Yat जांच 
e नेदानिक अध्ययन - अस्थि मज्जा आकांक्षा (बोन मेरो एस्पिरेशन) 
IX | 3 अध्यावरणी प्रणाली (इंटिगुमेंटरी सिस्टम) 
e इतिवृत्त 
० शारीरिक जांच 
e रोग परीक्षण - ऊतक परीक्षण 
x ५ ars पिंजर प्रणाली (मस्क्यूलोस्केलेटल सिस्टम) 
e इतिवृत्त 
e शारीरिक जांच - चाल और जोड़ों का आंकलन 
« प्रयोगशाला अध्ययन - Yad मानदंड (सूजन चिन्हक, यूरिक एसिड) 
e नैदानिक अध्ययन - रेडियोलॉजिकल अध्ययन 
XI : प्रजनन प्रणाली (पुरुष एवं महिला) 
e इतिवृत्त 
० शारीरिक जांच 
« प्रयोगशाला अध्ययन 
e नैदानिक अध्ययन 
« रजोनिवृत्ति के बाद की समस्याएं - हॉट फ्लश 
XII हु संवेदी अंग 
e इतिवृत्त 
e शारीरिक जांच 
e प्रयोगशाला अध्ययन 
e नेदानिक अध्ययन - रेडियोलॉजिकल और इमेजिंग अध्ययन, एंडोस्कोपिक अध्ययन 
XI : 0 व्यापक जेरिएट्रिक स्वास्थ्य आंकलन 


इतिवृत्त 

शारीरिक जांच 
कार्यात्मक आंकलन 
सुरक्षा आंकलन 
एडीएल आंकलन 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 25 


इकाई घंटे विषय 


e भंगुरता आंकलन 
*० पोषण संबंधी sper 
» मनोसामाजिक आंकलन 


कौशल ग्रयोगशाला में अभ्यास की जाने वाली दक्षताओं की सूची (48 Te में संकाय ग्रदर्शन व छात्र 
अभ्यास शामिल हैं) 


व्यापक वृद्धावस्था आंकलन 

नैदानिक मापदंडों की प्रणालीवार निगरानी और जांच 

इनवेसिव बीपी मॉनिटरिंग, मल्टी-पैरामीटर मॉनिटर्स, ईसीजी, एबीजी, पल्‍स sited, ग्लासगो कोमा स्केल 
(जीसीएस), दर्द व बेहोशी स्कोर मोटर आंकलन, संवेदी आंकलन, गुर्दे की कार्यप्रणाली का परीक्षण, द्रव संतुलन, 
अम्ल क्षार संतुलन, इलेक्ट्रोलाइट्स, aia ध्वनि, पेट का दबाव, अवशिष्ट गैस्ट्रिक मात्रा, यकृत फलन परीक्षण, 
जीआरबीएस, प्रयोगशाला परीक्षण, रेडियोलॉजिकल और इमेजिंग परीक्षण (प्रणालीवार) 

जांच और नैदानिक परीक्षणों का आदेश देना और व्याख्या करना (प्रणालीवार) (संलग्न परिशिष्ट-3 देखें) 

बुजुर्गों का आंकलन (संलग्न आंकलन दिशानिर्देश देखें) 


संदर्भ ग्रंथ सूची 


बिकली एल.एस. व स्ज़िलागी पी.जी. 2078). बेट्स गाइड टु फिजिकल एक्जामिनेशन एंड हिस्टरी टेकिंग (साउथ 
एसिअन संस्करण), वॉल्टर्स क्लूवर इंडिया प्रा. लिमिटेड | 

रोड्स जे. (20:3). एडवांस्ड हेल्‍थ असेसमेंट एंड डायग्नोस्टिक रीजनिंग (दूसरा संस्करण), फिलाडेल्फियाः 
लिपिनकॉट विलियम्स एंड विल्किस | 

विल्सन एस.एफ. व गिडेंस जे.एफ. (2024). हेल्‍थ असेसमेंट फॉर नर्सिंग प्रैक्टिस (वां संस्करण), एल्सेवियर - 
हेल्‍थ साइंसेज डिविजन | 


द्वितीय वर्ष 
जेरिएट्रिक स्पेशियलिटी पाठ्यक्रम 


(जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग अभ्यास के मूल, जेरिएट्रिक aft -I और जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग - I) 


दक्षताएं 


॥. 
2. 


9; 


विकास, आयु संबंधी और लिंग विशिष्ट विविधताओं के बारे में जानकारी प्रदर्शित करता है। 

पेचीदा, गंभीर, नाजुक एवं लंबे समय से बीमार रोगियों हेतु प्रासंगिक व्यापक व समस्या-केंद्रित स्वास्थ्य इतिवृत्त 
लेता है। 

आयु-उपयुक्‍्त परिवर्तनों सहित संकेतों और लक्षणों का मूल्यांकन करता है। 

सतत प्रक्रिया के रूप में, रोगी उम्र, तत्काल स्थिति या जरूरत अनुसार जानकारी के संग्रहण को प्राथमिकता देता 
है। 

प्रासंगिक व्यापक और समस्या-केंद्रित स्वास्थ्य इतिवृत्त का सटीक दस्तावेजीकरण करता है। 

प्रासंगिक, व्यापक व केंद्रित शारीरिक, मानसिक स्वास्थ्य और संज्ञानात्मक आंकलन करता है और उसका सटीक 
दस्तावेजीकरण करता है। 

किसी व्यक्ति की स्वास्थ्य स्थिति और जीवन की गुणवत्ता पर आ्िक, कार्य, संस्थागत, स्कूल, सामाजिक और 
रहने के वातावरण सहित परिवार, समुदाय और पर्यावरण के प्रभाव का आंकलन करता है। 

विकासात्मक (जीवन चरण) परिवर्तनों से निपटने और प्रबंधन करने के लिए व्यक्ति और समर्थन प्रणाली की क्षमता 
का आंकलन करता है। 

व्यक्ति की देखभाल, देखभाल निर्णय, कार्य, स्कूल, शारीरिक व सामाजिक गतिविधियों में भाग लेने की क्षमता 
निर्धारित करता है। 


शा. जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग अभ्यास के मूल 
निर्देशन अवधि: सैद्धांतिक: 96 घंटे + प्रयोगशाला / कौशल प्रयोगशाला: 48 घंटे 


इकाई घंटे विषय 


7 परिचय तथा स्वस्थ बुढ़ापा 

© बुढ़ापे की जैविकी 

« मानव बुढ़ापे की महामारी विज्ञान 
« मानव बुढ़ापे की प्रतिरक्षा विज्ञान 


26 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


इकाई 


घंटे 


विषय 


है 


जेरिएट्रिक नसिंग का अवलोकन 


जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग स्पेशियलिटी के मूल 

बुजुर्गों की जनसांख्यिकीय प्रोफाइल 

बुजुर्गों की स्वास्थ्य स्थिति 

जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल का बोझ - वैश्विक और राष्ट्रीय 
बुजुर्गों की बढ़ती आबादी का जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग पर प्रभाव 
बुजुर्ग व्यक्तियों में स्वास्थ्य जोखिम 


| 


| 0 


जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग: अवधारणाएं व सिद्धांत 


जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग की परिभाषा, अवधारणाएं व सिद्धांत 

बुढ़ापे की प्रक्रिया 

महिलाओं का बुढ़ापा 

नर्सिंग प्रक्रिया 

जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल के स्तर और नर्स की भूमिका 

जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल दलः जेरिएट्रिक चिकित्सक, जेरिएट्रिक नर्स, न्यूरो मनोचिकित्सक, 
व्यावसायिक चिकित्सक, फिजियोथेरेपिस्ट, एएलसी विभाग के कर्मचारी, मनो-वृद्धचिकित्सक, 
वाक-चिकित्सक, सामाजिक कार्यकर्ता, धार्मिक गुरु 

जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल विशेषज्ञ और जेरिएट्रिक नर्स चिकित्सक की भूमिका 

बुजुर्गों में संक्राण की रोकथाम के सिद्धांत 

मानक सुरक्षा उपाय और जैवचिकित्सा अपशिष्ट प्रबंधन 


IV 


ved जेरिएट्रिक नसिंग आंकलन 


व्यापक और केंद्रित स्वास्थ्य इतिवृत्त और शारीरिक आंकलन 

हाल में बिगड़ी स्वास्थ्य स्थिति का आंकलन 

घटक - नैदानिक, कार्यात्मक, दैनिक जैविक गतिविधियां (एडीएल), पर्यावरण, सामाजिक समर्थन, 
मानसिक स्थिति परीक्षा (एमएसई) 

बहुविषयक जेरिएट्रिक आंकलन 

आंकलन के लिए उपकरण और पैमाने - संज्ञानात्मक पैमाने 


जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग से संबंधित मनोसामाजिक मुद्दे 


बुढ़ापे के मनोसामाजिक पहलू 

बुढ़ापे में मनोवैज्ञानिक परिवर्तन 

अध्ययन, प्रेरणा, ध्यान और धारणा 

भावनाएं 

मानव व्यवहार और संकटकालीन आवश्यकताएं 
तनाव और संकट की स्थितियों से निपटना 
मानवतापरक व्यवहार और देखभाल 

सामाजिक संगठन और सामुदायिक संसाधन 
समुदाय में नेतृत्व की भूमिका 

बुजुर्गों की देखभाल में सामाजिक भूमिकाएं और पहलू 
परिवार और पारिवारिक रिश्ते 

बुजुर्गों की देखभाल पर सामाजिक सांस्कृतिक प्रभाव 


VI 


. 0 


स्वास्थ्य पर प्रभाव और रोग 
A. सांस्कृतिक 


* जनसांख्यिकी 

© सांस्कृतिक अवधारणाएं 

० स्वास्थ्य और रोग में सांस्कृतिक far 

* बुजुर्गों के साथ अंतरसांस्कृतिक संचार अवधारणाएं 
« सांस्कृतिक सिद्धांत और रूपरेखा 


B. परिवार 


* परिवारों की भूमिका और कार्य 
© बुजुर्गों के सामान्य पारिवारिक मुद्दे और निर्णय 
« परिवार द्वारा देखभाल करना 


[भागवता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


27 


इकाई 


घंटे 


विषय 


e देखभाल करने वाले का बोझ 

« बुढ़ापे की ओर अग्रसर परिवारों के साथ काम करना - रणनीतियां 
0. सामाजिक आर्थिक एवं पर्यावरण 

e सामाजिक आर्थिक कारक 

e पर्यावरणीय प्रभाव 

० पक्षसमर्थन 


vil 


बुढ़ापे में सामाजिक समर्थन और सेवाएं 
बुजुर्गों के लिए राष्ट्रीय नीतियां और राष्ट्रीय स्वास्थ्य नीतियां 

© बुढ़ापा और समाज पर इसका प्रभाव 

© सरकारी संगठनों और गैर सरकारी संगठनों की भूमिका 

© बुजुर्गों के लिए काम करने वाली एजेंसियां: राष्ट्रीय और राजकीय 

« सामाजिक समर्थन और सामाजिक मेलजोल बढ़ाना, स्वयं सहायता समूह, बुजुर्ग क्लब, पुलिस की 
भूमिका 
बुजुर्गों के लिए कल्याणकारी उपाय और प्रावधान - उपलब्ध योजनाएं - राष्ट्रीय और राजकीय 


Vul 


जेरिएट्रिक में विशेष आवश्यकताएं 
A. पोषण 
*» आंकलन 
e पोषण संबंधी सलाह 
* कल्याण: स्वास्थ्य संवर्धन 
e पोषण, व्यायाम 
8. नींद और गतिविधि 
e नींद के चरण 
० नींद में उम्र से संबंधित सामान्य बदलाव 
e नींद को प्रभावित करने वाली औषधियां 
e नींद संबंधी विकार और नींद को प्रभावित करने वाली स्थितियां 
e नींद संबंधी विकारों का प्रबंधन 
Cc. अंतरंगता और यौन 
* बुजुर्गों की यौन प्रतिक्रिया में सामान्य परिवर्तन 
e वैकल्पिक यौन प्रथाएं 
* बुजुर्गों की यौन प्रतिक्रिया को प्रभावित करने वाली पैथोलॉजिकल स्थितियां 
e यौन व्यवहार में पर्यावरणीय बाधाएं 
9. सुरक्षा 
« पुनर्वास स्थापना में जोखिम कारक 
» रोकथाम 
« नहीं गिरने से संबंधी प्रमुख चोटें 
e अतिसंवेदनशील रोगी 
E. मानसिक स्वास्थ्य 
*« प्रमुख मानसिक स्वास्थ्य समस्याएं - द्विध्रुवी भावात्मक विकार, अवसाद 
० मानसिक स्वास्थ्य संसाधन 


Ix 


ह 2 


सामान्य मनोवैज्ञानिक तनावदायक (कॉमन साइकोफिजियोलॉजिक स्ट्रैसर्स) 
A. जीर्ण रोग और पुनर्वास 
* जीर्णता 
« पुनर्वास 
8. कैंसर 
e केंसर की समीक्षा 
e केंसर का मनोसामाजिक प्रभावी 
e अध्यात्म और कैंसर 
०. दर्द 
* बुजुर्गों में दर्द की समीक्षा 
0. संक्रमण 


28 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SECc.4] 


इकाई | घंटे विषय 
e प्रतिरक्षा प्रणाली में उम्र से संबंधित परिवर्तन 
० प्रतिरक्षा-क्षमता को प्रभावित करने वाले कारक 
० सामान्य समस्याएं एवं स्थितियां 
ए. मादक द्रव्यों का सेवन 
e जोखिम कारक 
*» आंकलन 
e हस्तक्षेप 
* बुजुर्गों में आमतौर पर दुरुपयोग किये जाने वाले मादक द्रव्य 
e भविष्य के रुझान 
ए. नाश, मरण और मृत्यु 
« नाश, दुःख और मातम 
« मरने की प्रक्रिया: बुजुर्गों का दृष्टिकोण 
x | 2 कानूनी और नैतिक मुद्दे 
नैतिक सिद्धांत, नैतिक निर्णय लेना - अग्रिम निर्देश, वसीयत 
इच्छा-मृत्यु 
जेरिएट्रिक प्रद्धति में नैतिक मुद्दे 
नैतिक निर्णय लेने को बढ़ावा देने वाली रणनीतियां 
अंग दान, मस्तिष्क की कभी ठीक न होने वाली क्षति - नर्सों की भूमिका 
सरकारी अधिनियम 
हैल्प एज इंडिया 
वरिष्ठ नागरिक अधिनियम 
सामाजिक न्याय 
सामाजिक एजेंसियां - गैर-सरकारी संस्थाओं की भूमिका 
FRU की देखभाल 


कौशल ग्रयोगशाला में अभ्यास की जाने वाली दक्षताओं की सूची (48 Ae में संकाय ग्रदर्शन व छात्र 

अभ्यास शामिल हैं) 

© Sted और टीकाकरण पर स्वास्थ्य शिक्षण 

© wen मानसिक स्थिति परीक्षण 

e  जैवचिकित्सा अपशिष्ट प्रबंधन 

« सामाजिक समर्थन के लिए बुजुर्गों के घर का दौरा 

© जांच: कैंसर की जांच 

शा जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग - I 

दक्षताएं 

4. किसी गंभीर, नाजुक और »या जीर्ण रोग या चोट के प्रभाव और स्वास्थ्य संवर्धन आवश्यकताओं, सामाजिक 
समर्थन और शारीरिक व मानसिक स्वास्थ्य स्थिति का आंकलन करता है। 

2. सह-रुग्णताओं की उपस्थिति, उम्र से संबंधित परिवर्तन, स्वास्थ्य समस्याओं की प्रस्तुति पर उनके प्रभाव, शारीरिक 
और मानसिक स्वास्थ्य में तेजी से गिरावट की संभावना की शिनाख्त करता है। 

3. गंभीर एवं जीर्ण रोगों की जांच और रोकथाम के लिए नैदानिक रणनीतियों तथा नैदानिक उपकरणों के उचित 
उपयोग की योजना तैयार करता है। 

4. नैदानिक परीक्षण एवं नैदानिक प्रक्रियाओं के आदेश, व्याख्या, प्रदर्शन तथा पर्यवेक्षण के माध्यम से गंभीर, नाजुक 
और लंबे समय से बीमार रोगियों के आंकलन का प्रबंधन करता है। 

5. शारीरिक कार्य की निगरानी व उसे बनाए रखने और रोगी की सुरक्षा सुनिश्चित करने के लिए विशिष्ट नैदानिक 
रणनीतियों तथा तकनीकी कौशल का प्रदर्शन करता है। 

6. चिन्हित स्वास्थ्य संवर्धन आवश्यकताओं के आधार पर व्यक्ति और उनके परिवार को अग्रिम मार्गदर्शन तथा 
परामर्श प्रदान करता है। 


[भागवता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


निर्देशन अवधि: सैद्धांतिक: 96 घंटे + प्रयोगशाला / कौशल प्रयोगशाला: 48 घंटे 


इकाई | घंटे विषय 


प्रणालीगत आयु संबंधी परिवर्तनों और सामान्य विकारों से ग्रस्त बुजुर्गों की नर्सिंग 
देखभाल 


हृदय विकार (कार्डियोवस्कुलर फंक्शन) 

* बुजुर्गों की आम हृदय संबंधी समस्याएं 

श्वसन विकार (रेस्पिरेटरी फंक्शन) 

e संरचना और कार्य में उम्र से संबंधित परिवर्तन 

« एनेस्थीसिया और सर्जरी से जुड़े श्वसन संबंधी परिवर्तन 
* वृद्ध व्यक्तियों में सामान्य श्वसन समस्याएं और स्थितियां 
० ब्रोन्कोपल्मोनरी संक्रमण 

अंतःस्रावी विकार (एंडोक्राइन फंक्शन) 

* बुजुर्गों में अंतःस्रावी तंत्र में सामान्य विकृति की घटना 

© सामान्य ग्लूकोज मेटाबोलिज्म 

* ग्लूकोज मेटाबोलिज्म में उम्र से संबंधित परिवर्तन 

e थायराइड में उम्र से संबंधित परिवर्तन 

° थायराइड में होने वाली सामान्य समस्याएं 

यकृत फलन (लिवर फंक्शन) 

* यकृत की संरचना और कार्य में उम्र से संबंधित परिवर्तन 
* सामान्य समस्याएं एवं स्थितियां 

vot विकार (गैस्ट्रोइंटैस्टिनल फंक्शन) 

e जटाररांत्र प्रणाली में संरचना और कार्य में उम्र से संबंधित परिवर्तन 
* सामान्य समस्याएं एवं स्थितियां 

मूत्र विकार (यूरीनरी फंक्शन) 

मूत्र पथ में उम्र से संबंधित परिवर्तन 

सामान्य समस्याएं एवं स्थितियां 

बुजुर्गों में मूत्र असंयम (यूरीनरी इनकंटीनेंस) 

सामान्य प्रोस्टेट संरचना और कार्य 

प्रोस्टेट में सामान्य समस्याएं 

यौन क्रिया 

तंत्रिका संबंधी विकार ( न्‍्यूरोलॉजिकल फंक्शन) 

e तंत्रिका तंत्र में उम्र से संबंधित सामान्य परिवर्तन 
तंत्रिका संबंधी समस्याएं 

e ट्रांजिएंट इस्कैमिक अटैक 

« सेरेब्रोवास्कुलर डिस्ऑर्डर और स्ट्रोक 

e पार्किसंस रोग 

अध्यावर्णी तंत्र (इंटिगुमेंटरी सिस्टम) 

e त्वचा की संरचना और कार्य में उम्र से संबंधित परिवर्तन 
e सामान्य समस्याएं एवं स्थितियां 

* संक्रमण 

« प्रेशर सोर 

संवेदी विकार (सेंसरी फंक्शन) 


४ आयु संबंधी परिवर्तन 

« दृष्टि में सामान्य शिकायतें 
श्रवण और संतुलन 

« श्रवण संरचनाएं और उनके कार्य 
आयु संबंधी परिवर्तन 

बहरापन 

श्रवण विकलांगता का प्रबंधन 
संतुलन 


30 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


इकाई 


घंटे 


विषय 


स्वाद और गंध 

संवेदी विकार में उम्र से संबंधित परिवर्तन 

छ्ना 

दांतों की समस्या 

ars पिंजर के विकार (मस्क्यूलोस्केलेटल फंक्शन) 
e संरचना और कार्य में उम्र से संबंधित परिवर्तन 

« मस्क॒लोस्केलेटल विकारों का प्रबंधन 


i 


Garcia विकार (कॉग्निटिव डिस्जॉर्डर्स) 

बदली हुई विचार प्रक्रिया 

* प्रलाप/तीव्र भ्रम की स्थिति (डेलिरियम / एक्यूट कनफ्यूजन स्टेट) 
e पागलपन (डिमेंसिया) 

e अवसाद (डिप्रेसन) 


| 


। 4 


बुजुर्गों के मानसिक विकार 

० मानसिक विकारों की महामारी विज्ञान 
मानसिक विकारों की परिभाषा और वर्गीकरण 
बुढ़ापे में अवसाद 

दोध्रुवी विकार (बाइपोलर डिस्जऑर्डर्स) 
वृद्धावस्था में कार्यात्मक मानसिक विकार 
व्यक्तित्व और व्यवहार संबंधी विकार 
मनोरोगी वृद्धावस्था सेवा 

मनोरोग संबंधी रोग का प्रबंधन 

शराब की लत और बुजुर्ग रोगी 
देखभाल करने वालों की समस्याएं 


IV 


घरेलू देखभाल सेवाएं (होम कयर सर्विसेज) 

« भारत और पश्चिमी देशों में वृद्धावस्था घरेलू देखभाल सेवाएं (जेरिएट्रिक होम केयर सर्विसेज) 
* धर्मशाला की देखभाल (हॉस्पाइस केयर) 

* देखभाल करने वालों की भूमिका 

« चल देखभाल (एंबुलेटरी केयर) 

* सहयोगी यन्त्र 


गुणवत्ता आश्वासन 

*« जेरिएट्रिक पर लागू गुणवत्ता आश्वासन मॉडल 
मानक, प्रोटोकॉल, नीतियां, प्रक्रियाएं 

संक्रमण नियंत्रण और अभ्यास 

मानक सुरक्षा उपाय 

नर्सिंग ऑडिट 

स्टाफिंग 


VI 


2 


बुजुर्गों की शल्यचिकित्सा (सर्जरी) 
e प्रीऑपरेटिव आंकलन 

e शल्यचिकित्सा के लिए प्राथमिकताएं 
e शल्यचिकित्सीय आपात स्थिति 

° फ्रैक्चर 

e पैथोलॉजिकल फ्रैक्चर 

० सौम्य घाव (बिनाइन लेसिअन) 

* गैंग्रीन - एंपुटेशन 

e वैकल्पिक शल्यचिकित्सा 

e पोस्ट ऑपरेटिव समस्याएं और प्रबंधन 
* बुढ़ापे में एनेस्थीसिया 


vil 


है 0 


विशेष समस्याएं 
जेरिएट्रिक सिंड्रोम 
* शय्याव्रण त्वचा (प्रेशर सोर्स) 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 3] 


इकाई घंटे विषय 


लंबे समय से बीमार लोगों की देखभाल 
असाध्य रोगियों की देखभाल 

धर्म और रोग 

गिरना (फॉल्स) 

नर्सिंग होम प्लेसमेंट 

बेहोशी (सिंकोप) 

कमजोरी (Pact) 

प्रशामक देखभाल 

बुजुर्ग महिलाओं में स्त्री रोग संबंधी समस्याएं 
स्त्री रोग संबंधी संकट 

वल्वोवैजाइनल इनफ्लेमेशन 

जेनिटल प्रोलेप्सेज 

रजोनिवृत्ति के बाद रक्तस्राव 

मूत्राशय की कार्यप्रणाली में परिवर्तन 
रजोनिवृत्ति उपरांत महिलाओं में हार्मोन उपचार 


Vill | 0 |निवारक जेरिएट्रिक 

बुढ़ापे में बीमारियों की रोकथाम और स्वास्थ्य को बढ़ावा देना 

स्वास्थ्य संवर्धन के सिद्धांत / मॉडल 

स्वास्थ्य विश्वास मॉडल - बुजुर्गों में सामान्य स्वास्थ्य प्रथाएं 

बुजुर्गों के लिए व्यायाम - शारीरिक और मानसिक प्रक्षेत्र - व्यायाम के लाभ 
प्रत्याशित देखभाल का विकास और उसका औचित्य 

वृद्ध रोगियों की स्वास्थ्य संवर्धन आवश्यकताएं 

बुजुर्गों में स्वास्थ्य संवर्धन और स्वास्थ्य शिक्षा 

स्वास्थ्य संवर्धन आवश्यकताओं को पूरा करने के लिए रोगी व परिवारों को मार्गदर्शन और 
परामर्श 

© बुढ़ापा-रोधी मध्यवर्तन 

* औषधि की प्रतिकूल प्रतिक्रिया की रोकथाम 

© टीकाकरण 


e ७ ७ e e e e e » e e e e ७ ७ 


Ix | 0 पुनर्वास 

पुनर्वास की अवधारणा और इतिवृत्त 

पुनर्वास के लक्ष्य 

पुनर्वास के सिद्धांत 

बुढ़ापे में पुनर्वास 

दलीय कार्य के रूप में पुनर्वास 

स्व-देखभाल आंकलन और दैनिक जीवन की गतिविधियों का प्रबंधन 
सहायता और अनुप्रयोग 

बुजुर्गों में फिजियोथेरेपी की भूमिका 

संकुचन और esa के अन्य हानिकारक प्रभाव 

प्रेसर अल्सर 

बुजुर्गों में स्ट्रोक के बाद पुनर्वास 

विशिष्ट रोगों का पुनर्वास 

पुनर्वास सेवाओं का व्यवस्थापन और प्रभावशीलता 

वृद्धावस्था इकाई, डे हॉस्पिटल, डे केयर सेंटर, लंबे समय तक रहने वाली देखभाल संस्था 


कौशल ग्रयोगशाला में अभ्यास की जाने वाली दक्षताओं की सूची (48 Te में संकाय ग्रदर्शन व छात्र 
अभ्यास शामिल हैं) 

डायग्नोस्टिक टूल: जेरियाट्रिक डिप्रेशन स्केल, मिनी कॉग टेस्ट, सीएएम आईसीयू स्केल 

साइकोमेट्रिक परीक्षण 

घर पर सहायक उपकरणों पर स्वास्थ्य शिक्षा 

गुणवत्ता परियोजना - संक्रमण नियंत्रण अभ्यास 


32 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART HI—SEc.4] 


ऑपरेशन से पहले की तैयारी 

cr, Rec, कास्ट और एंपूटेशन वाले रोगी की देखभाल 
घाव की ड्रेसिंग 

पोडियाट्रिक देखभाल 

जांच: एचयूटी परीक्षण 

Ix. जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग . I 


दक्षताएं 


4. रोगी की स्थिति, उम्र, विकासात्मक व जैविक परिवर्तन, रोगी तथा परिवार की जरूरतों की गतिशील प्रकृति को 


प्रतिबिंबित करने के लिए व्यक्तिगत देखभाल योजना तैयार करता है। 


2. HART /मादक द्रव्य दुरुपयोग से होने वाले विकारों से ग्रस्त व्यक्तियों में शारीरिक और व्यवहारिक लक्षणों को 
सुधारने के लिए फार्माकोलॉजिक और गैर-फार्माकोलॉजिक प्रबंधन रणनीतियों का उपयोग करता है। 
3. विशेष रूप से उच्च जोखिम और कमजोर वर्ग में प्रतिकूल दवा परिणामों और जटिल चिकित्सा नियमों के बारे में 


जागरूकता बनाने और निगरानी रखने के लिए औषधि निर्धारित करता है। 
4. जटिल तीव्र, गंभीर और पुराने रोग वाले रोगियों के लिए दर्द और बेहोशी का प्रबंधन करता है। 


5. चिन्हित शिक्षा व परामर्श आवश्यकताओं के आधार पर व्यक्ति तथा उसके परिवार को शिक्षा और परामर्श प्रदान 


करता है। 


निर्देशन अवधि: सैद्धांतिक: 96 घंटे + प्रयोगशाला / कौशल प्रयोगशाला: 48 घंटे 


इकाई | घंटे विषय 


! i परिचय 

© वृद्धावस्था में रुगणता और मृत्यु दर 

उम्र बढ़ने की रूढ़िवादिता - सामान्य मिथक और तथ्य 
« वृद्ध रोगियों की देखभाल में नर्सिंग प्रक्रिया 

* बुजुर्गों की देखभाल में चुनौतियां 

© बुजुर्गों की सहायता में नर्स की भूमिका 


| | वृद्धावस्था में होने वाली विकृतियां 

« वृद्धावस्था में कैंसर 

e महिलाएं तथा कैंसर: स्तन कैंसर, एंडोमेट्रियल और सर्वाइकल कैंसर 

महिलाओं में कैंसर की जांच 

प्रबंधन के सिद्धांतः सर्जरी, रेडियोथेरेपी, कीमोथेरेपी 

कैंसर से पीड़ित वृद्ध व्यक्तियों में जीवन की गुणवत्ता 

प्रशामक देखभाल 

हॉस्पाइस केयर 

असाध्य रूप से बीमार की देखभाल - AIST देखभाल (एंड ऑफ लाइफ केयर) 


। | 0 वृद्धावस्था चिकित्सा में प्रगति (एडवांसेज इन जेरिएट्रिक मेडिसिन) 
अल्जाइमर रोग 

० पार्किसनिज़्म 

» ऑस्टियोपोरोसिस 

= मृत्र असंयम (यूरीनरी इनकंटीनेंस) 

० गिरना / फ्रैक्चर की रोकथाम 

० मां बाप संबंधी पोषण (पेरेंटेरल न्यूट्रीशन) 

Yelp fee और मेमोरी क्लिनिक 

बुढ़ापा-रोधी शोध 


IV i विशेष देखभाल समायोजन 

गहन देखभाल (एक्यूट केयर) 

« गहन देखभाल का वातावरण 

« ग्राहक देखभाल संबंधी मुद्दे 

© भविष्य के रुझान और शोध 

» परामर्श - ROT देखभाल (एंड ऑफ लाइफ केयर) 


[भागवता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


33 


इकाई 


घंटे 


विषय 


घरेलू देखभाल (होम केयर) 
* जीवन स्तर 
« समुदाय आधारित दीर्घकालिक देखभाल 
« घरेलू देखभाल 
* घरेलू स्वास्थ्य एजेंसियों की प्रोफाइल 
« देखभाल की निरंतरता 
* उपचार योजना को क्रियान्वित करना 
* घरेलू देखभाल प्रबंधन और सहायता 
© गुणवत्ता आंकलन और सुधार 
दीर्घकालिक देखभाल (लोंग टर्म केयर) 
नर्सिंग सुविधा के नैदानिक पहलू 
« नर्सिंग सुविधा के प्रबंधन पहलू 
« विशेष देखभाल समायोजन 
« नर्सिंग सुविधा में भर्ती रोगी के जीवन का परिप्रेक्ष्य 
« नर्सिंग सुविधा में परिवार की भागीदारी 
* नवाचार 
नर्सिंग देखभाल में भविष्य के लक्ष्य 


है 0 


बुजुर्गों के साथ दुर्व्यवहार और हिंसा 

* बुजुर्गों के साथ दुर्व्यवहार की पहचान 

e संभावित शिकार 

e रोकथाम एवं प्रबंधन 

« ग्राहक, दुर्व्यवहार करने वाले / परिवार को परामर्श देना 


VI 


देखभाल करने वाले का तनाव 

© देखभाल करने का बोझ 

© देखभाल करने वाले के बोझ का आंकलन 
* देखभाल करने वाले का सहयोग करना 


Vil 


| 0 


उम्र अनुकूल वातावरण 
« सुरक्षा के मुद्दे, जोखिमों की रोकथाम, गिरने से लगने वाली चोटें 
« घर, संस्थानों और समुदाय में संशोधन: सड़क, भवन, अस्पताल, सार्वजनिक स्थान, वृद्धाश्रम 
« स्वतंत्रता बढ़ाने के लिए प्रौद्योगिकी 
© सहायक उपकरण 
समाज, पड़ोसियों, पुलिस की भूमिका 


शा 


चिकित्सीय संबंध 
नर्स रोगी संबंध 
e उपचारात्मक संचार कौशल 
e उपचारात्मक स्पर्श 
© बुजुर्गों की देखभाल में नर्स की भूमिका 
« नर्सिंग देखभाल गृह 


Ix 


रोगी तथा पारिवारिक शिक्षा और परामर्श 

« रोगी तथा पारिवारिक शिक्षा की चुनौतियां 

* वयस्क अध्ययन प्रक्रिया 

e शिक्षण अधिगम प्रक्रिया को प्रभावित करने वाले कारक 

« वृद्धावस्था देखभाल में परिवारों की सूचनात्मक आवश्यकताएं 
e रोगी और परिवार की परामर्श संबंधी आवश्यकताएं 

« परामर्श तकनीक 


F 0 


सामुदायिक स्वास्थ्य: बुजुर्गों के लिए स्वास्थ्य सेवाएं और कार्यक्रम 
« ग्रामीण भारत में वृद्ध महिलाएं 

« बुजुर्ग देखभाल सेवाओं के प्रकार 

« स्वास्थ्य संवर्धन और रोग की रोकथाम 


34 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


इकाई | घंटे विषय 


- स्वाश्थ्य शिक्षा 
- सामान्य स्वास्थ्य की जांच 
- गर्भाशय ग्रीवा के कैंसर की जांच (स्क्रीनिंग ऑफ यूटिरिन सर्विक्स) 
- विशिष्ट स्वास्थ्य संवर्धन कार्यक्रम (धूम्रपान बंद करना, टीकाकरण) 
* रोगनिवारक 
- पीएचसी, मेडिकेयर, मोबाइल क्लीनिक में दैनिक रोगों का शीघ्र निदान और उपचार 
- स्वास्थ्य बीमा /सुरक्षाएं 
- माध्यमिक और तृतीयक देखभाल अस्पतालों में गंभीर रोगों का निदान और उपचार 
- घर पर जीर्ण रोग देखभाल 
« पुनर्वास 
- फिजियोथेरेपी, रेस्टोरेटिव सर्जरी, प्रोस्थेसिस, व्यावसायिक थेरेपी 
० मानसिक स्वास्थ्य सेवाएं 
- सेवानिवृत्ति, स्थानांतरण, वैधव्य और शोक, नशीली दवाओं और aren gal के सेवन, 
मानसिक रोगों के लिए चल उपचार के लिए परामर्श सेवाएं 
- जेरिएट्रिक नर्स स्पेशियलिस्ट की भूमिका 
- स्वास्थ्य शिक्षा: अवधारणा, सिद्धांत, दृष्टिकोण और विधियां 
- वृद्ध व्यक्तियों के लिए स्वास्थ्य शिक्षा सामग्री 


कौशल ग्रयोगशाला में अभ्यास की जाने वाली दक्षताओं की सूची (48 Te में संकाय ग्रदर्शन व छात्र 
अभ्यास शामिल है) 

© दर्द आंकलन - डब्ल्यूएचओ लेडर, वीएएस 

© कीमोथेरेपी औषधि प्रशासन 

e विकिरण चिकित्सा (रेडियेशन थेरेपी) के पश्चात निगरानी 
e  नेदानिक मापदंडों की निगरानी (प्रणालीवार) 

*« टोटल पेरेंटेरल न्यूट्रिशन (टीपीएन) 

© Ul: मूत्राशय का अल्ट्रासाउंड, यूरोफ्लोमेट्री 

© st डायरी 

©  पेल्विक फ्लोर एक्सरसाइज 

© बीएलएस / एसीएलएस 

e  पीएचसी का दौरा 

« परामर्श: मरणासन्न देखभाल 


संदर्भ ग्रथ सूची 

© कैश foot व ग्लास चेरिया (2049). एडल्ट जेरोन्टोलॉजी गाइडलाइंस (दूसरा संस्करण), सिंप्रगर पब्लिकंशंस, 
न्यूयॉर्क | 

© acy डॉन (2049). एडल्ट जेरोन्टोलॉजी एक्यूट केयर नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर क्यू एंड ए रिव्यू, सिंप्रगर पब्लिकशंस, 
न्यूयॉर्क | 

*«  चारोलोटे एलिओपोलस (2022). जेरोन्टोलॉजिकल नर्सिंग (i0gt संस्करण), फिलाडेल्फिया: वोल्टर्स क्लूवर 
पब्लिकशंस | 

*« लिंटन User डी. व लैच एच.डब्ल्यू. (2007). मैटेसन एंड मैक्कोनेल्स जेरोन्टोलॉजिकल नर्सिंग कसेप्ट्स एंड 
प्रैक्टिस (तीसरा संस्करण), सॉन्डर्स पब्लिकशंस | 

« शर्मा GN. (2007). testo इन जेरोन्टोलॉजी इंटरजनरेशनल पर्सपैक्टिव्स, रावत पब्लिकशंस, जयपुर | 

e जेरिएट्रिक ool किट, टेक्सास नर्सेज एसोसिएशन https://cdn.ymaws.com/www.texasnurses.org/resource/ 
resmegr/docs/practice/Geriatric_Competency_-_Full_.pdf 

© नेशनल मेडिकल काउंसिल: https://www.nmc.org.in/information-desk/for-colleges/pg-curricula-2., 
क्‍005:/99०० .॥0.0 2 .॥/90-002॥/0909345/209/09/0॥2-00879/70& .00 

© नेशनल जेरिएट्रिक काउंसिल: |॥905:/7क्ा.709,200.॥॥/828/0०0॥/॥]25/832432452  090980074] _ 
Guidelines _NPHCE _ final.pdf 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 35 


परिशिष्ट- 

तीस wear वाले जेरिएट्रिक वार्ड हेतु उपकरणों की सूची 
Te के साथ एडजस्टेबल जेरिएट्रिक ote (सिराहना, ऊंचा पायदान, चारपाई ऊपर उठाने की सुविधा, ट्रैपेज़ बार, 
पायदान, साइड रेल - 30) 
प्ट स्टैंड — 20 
बेड साइड लॉकर - 30 
ओवर बेड ट्रॉली — 30 
ड्रेसिंग ट्रॉली (छोटी) - 5 
ड्रेसिंग ट्रॉली (मध्यम) - 2 
सिरिंज पंप - 40 
इन्फ्यूजन पंप - 40 
ASH] Wel या हवाई Wel — 25 


. मॉनिटर — 40 

. ट्रांसपोर्ट मॉनिटर /uca ऑक्सीमीटर - 2 

. ईसीजी मशीन - 4 

. अल्ट्रासाउंड मशीन (मूत्राशय) - ॥ 

. डिफिब्रिलेटर - ॥ 

. क्रैश कार्ट — 4 

. क्रैश कार्ट का सामान: ag बैग, लैरिंगोस्कोप, औषधियां, सक्शन कैथेटर 
. हाइट एडजस्टेबल ट्रांसफर ट्रॉली - 4 

. ओआर ट्रॉली - 4 

. लॉक वाली व्हीलचेयर - 6 

. सेफ स्‍लाइडर - 4 

. कम्प्यूटर - 4 

. प्रिंटर - 2 

. ऑक्सीजन फ्लोमीटर - 45 

. जार के साथ wes पोर्ट - 45 

. पल्‍्मो-एड - 40 

. रेफ्रिजरेटर - 3 (4 - खाद्य, 4 - औषधियां, 4 - अन्य उपयोग) 
. मेटल फुटस्टेप / फूट Kat - 20 

. एंबुलेशन जेरिएट्रिक चेयर - 6 

. फ्लैट ट्रॉली - 4 

. स्पॉटलाइट - 2 

. ग्लूकोमीटर - 6 

. ट्यूनिंग फॉर्क - 2 

. ऑप्थेलमोस्कोप - 4 

. ओटोस्कोप - 4 

. नी हैमर - 2 

. इंच टेप - 2 

. सहायक उपकरण - वॉकर, क्वाड़िपॉड, ट्राइपॉड 

. विभिन्‍न प्रक्रियाओं के लिए स्टेराइल सेट /डिस्पोजेबल सेट के साथ ट्रे (जैसे, सेंट्रल वीनस कैथेटर लगाना, 


ट्रेकियोस्टोमी आदि) 


. स्नेलन चार्ट 
. नेब्युलाइजर - 4 
. पल्‍स ऑक्सीमीटर - 2 


गतिशीलता और व्यायाम के लिए अन्य सामान: न्यूनतम मानक 


42. 
43. 
44. 
45. 


सर्वाइकल cer / ग्रीवा कर्षण (रुक-रुक कर) 
चाल प्रशिक्षण उपकरण के लिए चलना 

वॉकिंग स्टिक्स » कैलीपर्स 

शोल्डर व्हील 


36 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


46. चरखी / Gott 
47. वॉकर (साधारण) 
48. सर्वाइकल ट्रैक्शन (मैनुअल) 
फिजियोथेरेपी उपकरण 
शॉर्ट वेव डायथर्मी, dea बाथ, इंटरफेरेंशियल थेरेपी यूनिट, एक्सरसाइज थेरेपी यूनिट - पैरेलल बार्स, स्टेशनरी 
साइकिल, मेरिनर व्हील आदि| सहायक उपकरण - वर्किंग फ्रेम, व्हीलचेयर, बेडसाइड चेयर, else, fece टेबल 
आदि | 
जेरिएट्रिक वार्ड स्थापन 
ऑक्सीजन आउटलेट - 2 
वैक्यूम आउटलेट - 2 
कंप्रैर्ड एअर आउटलेट - ॥ 
5 /45-एम्पीयर पिन के साथ इलेक्ट्रिक आउटलेट (मरीजों के हर तरफ 2) 
सेंट्रल नर्सिंग स्टेशन 
मेडिकल कॉलेज अस्पतालों में जेरिएट्रिक विभाग के पास आंतरिक रोगी और बाह्य रोगी सेवाओं के लिए 
निम्नलिखित भवन परिव्यय होना चाहिए | 
परिचालन संबंधी दिशानिर्देश 
बाह्य रोगी विभाग 
प्रतीक्षालय / पंजीकरण कक्ष - कंप्यूटर, टेलीफोन के साथ 36 वर्ग मीटर 
तीन ओपीडी कक्ष - प्रत्येक 6 वर्ग मीटर 
फार्मेसी 
विशेष क्लिनिक 
पुनर्जीवन कक्ष (रिससीटेशन रूम) 
फिजियोथेरेपी (बाह्य रोगियों और आंतरिक रोगियों दोनों के लिए) 
ईसीजी - 42 वर्ग मीटर 
बुनियादी रेडियोलॉजी सेवाएं 
प्रयोगशाला / नमूना संग्रहण कक्ष 
परामर्श कक्ष 
प्रदर्शन कक्ष — 36 वर्ग मीटर 
पुस्तकालय 
. संकाय कक्ष - 44 वर्ग मीटर 
. इंजेक्शन » प्रक्रिया कक्ष - 42 वर्ग मीटर 
अंतःरोगी सेवाएं (30 शय्या वाला वार्ड) 
« पुरुष वार्ड: 45 WA ( Vee देखभाल, 7 सबएक्यूट देखभाल और 5 दीर्घकालिक देखभाल) 
*« महिला वार्ड: 45 शय्या (3 एक्यूट देखभाल, 7 सबएक्यूट देखभाल और 5 दीर्घकालिक देखभाल) 
© पेंट्री रूम, लिनन रूम, नर्सिंग स्टेशन, ड्यूटी डॉक्टर का कमरा, साइड लैब, प्रक्रिया कक्ष, अध्ययन कक्ष, व्याख्यान 
हॉल, संकाय कक्ष, पुस्तकालय, प्रशासनिक कार्यालय, भंडारगृह, शॉवर कुर्सी के साथ स्नानघर, way Hay 
मनोरंजन हॉल | 
आयु-मित्र पर्यावरण के सामान्य दिशानिर्देश 
« विकलांगों के लिए बाह्य रोगी और आंतरिक रोगी सुविधा 4 चौड़े गलियारे, रैंप, रेलिंग, da बार, एंटी-स्किड 
टाइल, पर्याप्त रोशनी, एलन डोर की लॉक /शौचालय और लिफ्ट होने afer 
« व्यावसायिक चिकित्सा सेवाओं के लिए सामान - कला और शिल्प सामान, इनडोर गेम आइटम, चार्ट, 
टेलीविजन | 
© UW व्यापक डेटाबेस, वेबसाइट, अभ्यास दिशानिर्देश, बाह्य रोगी और अंतःरोगी का मॉडल रिकॉर्ड, आंकलन 
(संज्ञानात्मक और कार्यक्षमता) विकसित की जानी चाहिए | 
« निम्नलिखित पर शोध करना: उम्र बढ़ने की जीव विज्ञान, उम्र बढ़ने के सामाजिक और मनोवैज्ञानिक पहलू और 
पारिवारिक समर्थन, देखभाल करने वाले बोझ, विभिन्‍न वृद्धावस्था रोगों की महामारी विज्ञान, हस्तक्षेप में नवाचार, 
बुढ़ापा रोधी औषधियां आदि, जैसे राष्ट्रीय और अंतर्राष्ट्रीय एजेंसियों से वित्त पोषण के साथ एकल केंद्रित या 
बहु-केंद्रित अध्ययन के रूप में | 
(संदर्भ एमओएचएफडजब्ल्यू दिशानिर्देश) 


Sor roe ४ 9० ae os B 


5 


[भागवता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 37 


परिशिष्ट--2 
आंकलन दिशानिर्देश (ओएससीई दिशानिर्देशों सहित) 


आंतरिक आंकलन (सैद्धांतिक तथा व्यावहारिक) 
प्रथम वर्ष 


4. उन्नत नर्सिंग अभ्यास के लिए सैद्धांतिक आधार 
कॉलेज परीक्षा - केवल सैद्धांतिक : 50 अंक 
आंतरिक आंकलनः 
प्रश्न-पत्र और प्रश्नोत्तरी: 40 अंक 
लिखित कार्य / आवधिक प्रश्न-पत्र: 40 अंक (वैश्विक और राष्ट्रीय स्वास्थ्य देखभाल के रुझान और नीतियां) 
नैदानिक सेमिनार (नैदानिक /केयर पाथवे इन स्पेसिफिक fiction कंडीशन / एप्लिकेशन ऑफ स्पेसिफिक 
नर्सिंग थ्योरी): 5 अंक 
अंतिम सैद्धांतिक परीक्षा: 25 अंक 
कुल: 50 अंक 
2. जेरिएट्रिक देखभाल में शोध अनुप्रयोग तथा साक्ष्य आधारित अभ्यास 
सैद्धांतिक: 
प्रश्न-पत्र: 20 अंक 
लिखित कार्य: 5 अंक (साहित्य समीक्षा / शोध उपकरण की तैयारी) 
ude क्लब: 5 अंक (नर्सिंग दक्षताओं के लिए शोध साक्ष्य का विश्लेषण) 
कुलः 30 अंक 
3. नेतृत्व, प्रबंधन तथा शिक्षण में ota कौशल 
सैद्धांतिक: 
प्रश्न-पत्र: 45 अंक 
जर्नल क्लब नेतृत्व / प्रबंधन / शिक्षण में रुझान): 5 अंक 
लिखित कार्य: 5 अंक (जेरिएट्रिक सिंड्रोम) 
सूक्ष्म शिक्षण: 5 अंक 
कुल: 30 अंक 
4. ace नर्सिंग में लागू उन्‍नत पैथोफिजियोलॉजी और ora फार्माकोलॉजी 
द्वांतिक: 
प्रश्न-पत्र और प्रश्नोत्तरी: 20 अंक (पैथोफिजियोलॉजी - 40, फार्माकोलॉजी - 0) 
औषधि अध्ययन: 5 अंक (औषधि अध्ययन एवं प्रस्तुति) 
मामले की प्रस्तुति और मामले की अध्ययन रिपोर्ट (पैथोफिजियोलॉजी): 5 अंक 
कुलः 30 अंक 
5. उन्‍नत स्वास्थ्य “शारीरिक आंकलन 
सैद्धांतिक: 
प्रश्न-पत्र: 20 अंक 
लिखित कार्य: 40 अंक (नैदानिक /जांच रिपोर्ट - निष्कर्षों की व्याख्या तथा विश्लेषण) 
कुलः 30 अंक 
व्यावहारिक: 
नैदानिक प्रदर्शन Ser: 40 अंक 
पदस्थापन के पश्चात परीक्षा (ओएससीई): 40 अंक 
मामले की प्रस्तुति और मामले की अध्ययन रिपोर्ट: 5 अंक 
आंतरिक ओएससीई: 25 अंक 
कुल आंतरिक व्यावहारिक: 50 अंक 
(पदस्थापन की समाप्ति परीक्षा किसी भी जेरिएट्रिक वार्ड /इकाई में आयोजित की जा सकती है, एक व्यावहारिक 
सत्र समुदाय में होना चाहिए) 
द्वितीय वर्ष 
4. जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग अभ्यास के मूल 
सैद्धांतिक: 
प्रश्न-पत्र और प्रश्नोत्तरी: 20 अंक 


38 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


4. 


लिखित कार्य: 40 अंक (राजकीय कार्यक्रम) 

कुल: 30 अंक 

व्यावहारिक: 

नैदानिक प्रदर्शन Sibert: 20 अंक 

औषधि अध्ययन (औषधि अध्ययन और प्रस्तुति)) 40 अंक 

मामले की प्रस्तुति और मामले की अध्ययन रिपोर्ट (पारिवारिक शिक्षा / परामर्श): 5 अंक 
मामले की प्रस्तुति (नैदानिक / केयर पाथवे का अनुप्रयोग): 5 अंक 
पदस्थापन के पश्चात परीक्षा (ओएससीई): 40 अंक 

आंतरिक ओएससीई: 50 अंक 

कुल आंतरिक व्यावहारिक: 400 अंक 

जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग . ॥ 

सैद्धांतिक: 

प्रश्न-पत्र और प्रश्नोत्तरी: 20 अंक 

नैदानिक सेमिनार और जर्नल Fes: 40 अंक 

कुलः 30 अंक 

व्यावहारिक: 

नैदानिक प्रदर्शन Sort: 20 अंक 

पदस्थापन के पश्चात परीक्षा (ओएससीई): 40 अंक 

नैदानिक प्रस्तुति: 40 अंक 

मामले की अध्ययन रिपोर्ट: 40 अंक 

आंतरिक ओएससीई: 50 अंक 

कुल आंतरिक व्यावहारिक: 400 अंक 

जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग . वा 

सैद्धांतिक: 

प्रश्न-पत्र: 20 अंक 

नैदानिक सेमिनार: 40 अंक 

कुलः 30 अंक 

व्यावहारिक: 

नैदानिक प्रदर्शन Sort: 20 अंक 

पदस्थापन के पश्चात परीक्षा (ओएससीई): 40 अंक 

नैदानिक प्रस्तुति: 40 अंक 

मामले की अध्ययन रिपोर्ट (विकसित नैदानिक / केयर पाथवे): 40 अंक 
आंतरिक ओएससीई: 50 अंक 

कुल आंतरिक व्यावहारिक: 400 अंक 

(पदस्थापन की समाप्ति परीक्षा किसी भी जेरिएट्रिक वार्ड /इकाई में आयोजित की जा सकती है, एक व्यावहारिक 
सत्र समुदाय में होना चाहिए) 

निबंध 

व्यावहारिक: 50 अंक 


बाह्य (अंतिम) परीक्षा (पाठ्यक्रम में दी गई अनुसूची के अनुसार) 
सैद्धांतिक: लघु उत्तर और निबंधीय प्रश्न (भारिता विश्वविद्यालय द्वारा तय की जा सकती है) 
(निबंध 2 x 45 अंक = 30, लघु उत्तर 5 x 6 अंक = 30, अति संक्षिप्त उत्तर 5 x 2 अंक = 40) 


आंतरिक और बाह्य व्यावहारिक परीक्षा के लिए ओएससीई दिशानिर्देश 


प्रथम वर्ष 


I. 


स्वास्थ्य आंकलन 

आंतरिक 

ओएससीई: 25 अंक 

मुख्य दक्षता क्षेत्र 

4. केंद्रित इतिवृत्त लेना 

2. बुजुर्ग रोगी की शारीरिक जांच 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 39 


3. निष्कर्ष और परिणामों की व्याख्या 

4. नैदानिक मापदंडों की निगरानी 

5. पैमाने - संज्ञानात्मक, अवसाद, शय्याव्रण आदि 
स्टेशनों की संख्या: 5 (4 4+ १ We स्टेशन) 
प्रत्येक स्टेशन के लिए समय: 40 मिनट 

प्रत्येक स्टेशन के लिए अंक: 5 अंक (दक्षता जांच सूची और आवंटित अंकों के अनुसार) 
कुल: 4 < 5 = 20 अंक 

मौखिक परीक्षा = 5 अंक 

कुल = 25 अंक 

बाह्य 

ओएससीई: 50 अंक 

मुख्य दक्षता क्षेत्र 

4. बुजुर्ग रोगी का केंद्रित इतिवृत्त लेना 

बुजुर्ग रोगी की केंद्रित शारीरिक जांच 

इतिवृत्त की व्याख्या 

शारीरिक जांच निष्कर्षों की व्याख्या 

प्रयोगशाला नैदानिक परीक्षण परिणामों की व्याख्या 
. नैदानिक मापदंडों की निगरानी 

स्टेशनों की संख्या: 40 (8 + 2 We स्टेशन) 
प्रत्येक स्टेशन के लिए समय: 40 मिनट 

प्रत्येक स्टेशन के लिए अंक: 5 अंक (दक्षता जांच सूची और आवंटित अंकों के अनुसार) 
कूल: 8 X 5 = 40 अंक 

मौखिक परीक्षा = 40 अंक 

कुल = 50 अंक 


द्वितीय वर्ष 
Il. अंतिम व्यावहारिक परीक्षा में बैठने के पात्र होंगे। 


जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग अभ्यास के मूल, जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग . प८्तथा जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग . = 
(सभी तीन पाठ्यक्रमों के लिए क्रमशः निम्नलिखित एक-समान प्रतिरूप अपनाया जाता है) 
आंतरिक 

ओएससीई: 50 अंक 

मुख्य दक्षता क्षेत्र 

4. केंद्रित इतिवृत्त लेना तथा शारीरिक जांच और निष्कर्ष तथा परिणामों की व्याख्या 

2. दक्षताओं की निगरानी (जेरिएट्रिक आंकलन) 

3. उपचार मध्यवर्तन (आपातकालीन प्रक्रियात्मक दक्षताएं) जिसमें औषधि प्रशासन शामिल है 
4. पारिवारिक शिक्षा और परामर्श - दुःखद समाचार सुनाना, मामले का अध्ययन 

स्टेशनों की संख्या: 5 (4+  रैस्ट स्टेशन) 

प्रत्येक स्टेशन के लिए समय: io मिनट 

प्रत्येक स्टेशन के लिए अंक: 40 अंक (दक्षता जांच सूची और आवंटित अंकों के अनुसार) 
कूल: 40 x 4 = 40 अंक 

मौखिक परीक्षा = 40 अंक 

कुल = 50 अंक 


बाह्य 

ओएससीई: 400 अंक 

मुख्य दक्षता क्षेत्र 

4. केंद्रित इतिवृत्त लेना, बुजुर्ग रोगी की शारीरिक जांच और परिणामों की व्याख्या 
दक्षताओं की निगरानी 

देखभाल योजना का विकास 

पारिवारिक शिक्षा और परामर्श 

उपचार मध्यवर्तन (आपातकालीन प्रक्रियाएं) जिसमें औषधि प्रशासन शामिल है 


9 एफ 0० 


लॉग बुक तथा नैदानिक आवश्यकताओं में प्रक्रियात्मक दक्षताओं के पूरा होने पर, एनपी छात्र 


GiB ७05 ७ 


40 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


6. परिवार केंद्रित देखभाल 

स्टेशनों की संख्या: 40 (8 + 2 We स्टेशन) 

प्रत्येक स्टेशन के लिए समय: 40 मिनट 

प्रत्येक स्टेशन के लिए अंक: 40 अंक (दक्षता जांच सूची और आवंटित अंको के अनुसार) 
कुल: 8 X 40 = 80 अंक 

मौखिक परीक्षा = 20 अंक 

कुल = 400 अंक 


लॉग बुक तथा नैदानिक आवश्यकताओं में प्रक्रियात्मक दक्षताओं के पूरा होने पर, एनपी छात्र अंतिम 
व्यावहारिक परीक्षा में बैठने के पात्र होंगे। 


मूल्यांकन पैमानों का उपयोग करने के लिए विशिष्ट दिशानिर्देश 


त्वचीय समग्रता (स्किन इंटीग्रिटी) - sea स्केल, नॉर्टन प्रेशर UR Rep असेसमेंट स्केल | 


४७. मूत्र असंयम (यूरीनरी इनकंटीनेंस) — आईपीएसएस प्रश्नावली, मेल यूरोजेनिटल डिस्ट्रेस इनवेंटरी (एमयूडीआई)। 

०. जेरिएट्रिक सिंड्रोम - स्पाइस टूल (नींद संबंधी विकार, खाने या खिलाने में समस्या, असंयम, भ्रम, गिरने के प्रमाण, 
त्वचीय क्षरण), वृद्धावस्था का व्यापक आंकलन | 

१. पोषण स्थिति का आंकलन - 72 घंटे का स्मरण, निगलने का आंकलन | 

०. दर्द - दर्द आंकलन पैमाना (विजुअल एनालॉग स्केल), वृद्धावस्था में दर्द का आंकलन | 

f. नींद - पिट्सबर्ग नींद गुणवत्ता सूचकांक (पीएसक्यूआई), एपवर्थ सलीपीनेस स्केल (ईएसएस)। 

82. संज्ञानात्मक कार्य - वृद्धावस्था अवसाद पैमाना (जीडीएस), घटना पैमाने का प्रभाव, सीएएम — आईसीयू - 
आईसीयू के लिए भ्रम आंकलन विधि, मिनी of cee, टीयूजी जांच, weed सूक्ष्म मानसिक स्थिति परीक्षा 
(एमएमएसई), आईक्यूसीओडीई, एमओसीए | 

४. बुजुर्गों में प्रलाप, मनोभ्रंश और अवसाद की जांच - सर्वोत्तम नर्सिंग अभ्यास दिशानिर्देश | 

i, अवरोध | 

ji. बुजुर्गों के साथ दुर्व्यवहार का आंकलन। 

k. गिरने की रोकथाम - फॉल्स एफीकेसी स्केल - अंतर्राष्ट्रीय (एफईएस-79, मॉडिफाइड मोर्स ota Rep स्केल, 
प्रदर्शन wag गतिशीलता आंकलन (पीओएमए), फॉल Rep असेसमेंट स्केल (फ्रेट-अप स्केल) | 

L संचार - बुजुर्गों की श्रवण जांच। 

m. देखभाल प्रदाता समन्वय - संशोधित देखभाल प्रदाता तनाव सूचकांक (एमसीएसआई) | 

n. दैनिक जीवन की गतिविधियां - कार्यात्मक आंकलन - बार्थल सूचकांक | 

०. पुनर्वास उपाय - व्यायाम पैमाने के लिए स्व-प्रभावकारिता (एसईई स्केल) | 

परिशिष्ट-3 
नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग (एनपीजीएन) कार्यक्रम हेतु नैदानिक लॉग बुक 
(विशिष्ट प्रक्रियात्मक दक्षताएं / नैदानिक कौशल) 
प्रथम वर्ष 
क्र. विशिष्ट दक्षताएं / कौशल प्रदर्शन की | तिथि | प्रीसेप्टर' / संकाय 
सं. गई संख्या के हस्ताक्षर 
| I शोध अनुप्रयोग तथा साक्ष्य आधारित अभ्यास 
4 शोध उपकरण की तैयारी 
2 jaaRed समीक्षा / साहित्यक समीक्षा लेखन 
3 [प्रकाशन के लिए पांडुलिपि तैयार करना (प्रथम या द्वितीय 
वर्ष) 
4 [शोध निबंध (द्वितीय वर्ष) 
विषय: 
| I नेतृत्व, प्रबंधन तथा शिक्षण 
4 स्टाफ रोगी निहित कार्य तैयार करना 


इकाई का बजट तैयार करना 


स्टाफ ड्यूटी रोस्टर तैयार करना 


[भाग ave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


4] 


विशिष्ट दक्षताएं / कौशल 


प्रदर्शान की 
गई संख्या 


तिथि 


प्रीसेप्टर' / संकाय 
के हस्ताक्षर 


इकाई में रोगी देखभाल संपरीक्षा करना 


उपकरण तथा आपूर्ति प्रबंधन 


७ | ० | ++ 4 a 


संक्रमण नियंत्रण / औषधियों की प्रतिकूल प्रतिक्रिया से 
संबंधित निगरानी, आंकलन और रिपोर्ट लेखन 


रोगियों / कर्मचारियों के लिए शिक्षण योजना और शिक्षण 
सामग्री तैयार करना 


सूक्ष्म शिक्षण / रोगी शिक्षा सत्र 


ओएससीई / ओएसपीई की योजना बनाना और संचालन 
करना 


परीक्षणों का निर्माण 


स्वास्थ्य आंकलन 


व्यापक इतिवृत्त लेना 


व्यापक बुजुर्ग जांच 


केंद्रित शारीरिक जांच (प्रक्रिया वार) 


श्वसन तंत्र 


हृदवाहिनी 


UGTA 


स्नायविक 


जनन-मूत्रीय 


अंतःस्रावी 


रुधिर 


कंकाल-पेशीय 


अध्यवर्णी 


संवेदी अंग 
a. दृष्टि 
b. श्रवण शक्ति 


वृद्धावस्था आंकलन 


मांसपेशियों की शक्ति का आंकलन 


चाल का आंकलन 


पोषण संबंधी आंकलन 


गिरने के जोखिम का आंकलन 


कार्यत्मक आंकलन — ato सूचकांक 


सूक्ष्म मानसिक स्थिति परीक्षण 


दर्द का आंकलन 


शय्याव्रण TAY आंकलन (प्रेसर सोर असेसमेंट) 


Aa रोगियों का आकलन तथा देखभाल 


पार्किसन रोग से पीडित रोगियों का आंकलन तथा 
देखभाल 


वृद्धावस्था अवसाद पैमाना 


मिनी कॉग परीक्षण 


समय समाप्त होने पर जांच करना (टाइम्ड अप एंड गो 
टेस्ट) 


निष्पादित की जाने वाली प्रक्रियाएं 


SS अल्ट्रासाउंड के माध्यम से अवशिष्ट मूत्र माप 


हृदय संबंधी जांच 


42 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART HI—SEc.4] 


विशिष्ट दक्षताएं / कौशल 


प्रदर्शन की 
गई संख्या 


तिथि 


प्रीसेप्टर' / संकाय 
के हस्ताक्षर 


धमनीय रक्तचाप जांच 


मुखग्रसनी वायुमार्ग 


अंतःश्वासनलीय चूषण (एंडोट्रैचियल weet) 


मौखिक चूषण (ओरल सकक्‍्शनिंग) 


प्ट कैन्युलेशन » थेरेपी 


०० | | ७० | ०|+ [५०० 4 : 3 


ऑक्सीजन थेरेपी 
a. नेजल केनुला वेंचुरी / सिंपल फेस मास्क 
४७. एनआईवी 


ट्रेकियोस्टोमी की देखभाल 


आहार योजना 
a. नरम ठोस 
b. तरल आहार 


कुल आंत्रेतर पोषण (टोटल पेरेंटेरल न्यूट्रीशन) 


शय्याव्रण त्वचा (प्रेशर GR) की देखभाल 


बुजुर्गों का पुनर्वास 
a. आंख की देखभाल 


व्यायाम 

a. निगलना 
b. बोली 

०. ब्रांट-डारॉफ 


फिजियोथेरेपी 
a. छाती / अंग (चैस्ट /लिंब) 


व्यायाम 
a. आइसोटोनिक व्यायाम 
b. आइसोमेट्रिक व्यायाम 


प्रतिबंधों पर रोगियों की देखभाल (केयर ऑफ 
पेशेंट्स ata tee ca) 

a. भौतिक 

४७. रसायनिक 


ARORA की देखभाल 


परामर्श 
a. रोगी 
७. परिवार 


प्ट औषधियों का प्रशासन 


अंतःपेशीय (इंट्रामस्क्युलर) इंजेक्शन 


पोडियाट्रिक देखभाल 


वेंटीलेटर लगाना 


निम्नलिखित के साथ रोगी की देखभाल 
a. वेंटीलेटर 
७. इनफ्यूजन पम्प 


घरेलू सुरक्षा उपाय 


दर्द प्रबंधन 
तीव्र दर्द - विजुअल एनालॉग स्केल 
पुराना दर्द - डब्ल्यूएचओ पेन लैडर 


27 


निम्नलिखित के साथ रोगी की देखभाल 
a. सांचा /ढालना (कास्ट) 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 43 


fee विशिष्ट दक्षताएं / कौशल प्रदर्शान की | तिथि | प्रीसेप्टर' // संकाय 
सं गई संख्या के हस्ताक्षर 


७. खपच्ची / पट्टी (स्पिलिंट) 
०. खिंचाव »संकर्षण (ट्रैक्शन) 
0. छिन्नांग (एंप्यूटी) 


28 कृत्रिम अंग श्रवण यंत्र का उपयोग 


29 [दांतों की देखभाल 


30 [वॉकर का उपयोग 


34 व्हीलचेयर का उपयोग 


32 |एडीएल के लिए सहायक उपकरण 


उपचार पद्धतियां 


33 (विपथी चिकित्सा (डायवर्सनल थेरेपी) 


34 [संज्ञानात्मक उत्तेजना उपचार (काग्निटिव स्टिमुलेशन 
थेरेपी) 


35 |सामूहिक चिकित्सा 


स्वास्थ्य शिक्षा 


36 ग्लूकोज निगरानी 


37 [इंसुलिन का घरेलू देखभाल प्रबंधन 


38 [इंसुलिन का स्व-प्रशासन 


39 |नपीतुली खुराक का उपयोग (les डोज यूज) 


40 |उपचारात्मक आहार 


4. [पांव की देखभाल 


42 टीकाकरण 


43 |ऑक्सीजन सांद्रक 


44 [पोर्टेबल सक्‍्शनिंग 


45 laren परामर्श में भागीदारी 


* - छात्र के कौशल प्रदर्शन में सक्षम पाए जाने पर, उस पर प्रीसेप्टर द्वारा हस्ताक्षर किए जाएंगे। 

छात्र: छात्रों से यह अपेक्षा की जाती है कि वे सूचीबद्ध कौशलों / दक्षताओं को तब तक करते रहें जब तक कि वे 
स्तर 3 दक्षता तक नहीं पहुंच जाते, जिसके बाद प्रत्येक दक्षता के समक्ष प्रीसेप्टर द्वारा हस्ताक्षर किए जाएंगे। 
प्रीसेप्टर // संकाय: यह सुनिश्चित करेंगे कि प्रत्येक दक्षता के लिए हस्ताक्षर, स्तर 3 पर पहुंचने के बाद ही किए 
जाएं। 

«स्तर 3 दक्षता यह दर्शाती है कि wah छात्र पर्यवेक्षण के बिना उस दक्षता का प्रदर्शन करने में सक्षम है। 
«स्तर 2 दक्षता यह दर्शाती है कि छात्र पर्यवेक्षण के साथ प्रत्येक दक्षता का प्रदर्शन करने में सक्षम है। 


« स्तर 4 दक्षता यह दर्शाती है कि छात्र पर्यवेक्षण के साथ भी उस दक्षता / कौशल का प्रदर्शन करने में सक्षम नहीं 
है। 


कार्यक्रम समन्वयक / संकाय के हस्ताक्षर विभागाध्यक्ष / प्रधानाचार्य के हस्ताक्षर 


द्वितीय वर्ष 


| विशेष दक्षताएं / कौशल प्रदर्शन की|। तिथि | प्रीसेप्टर' / संकाय 
सं गई संख्या के हस्ताक्षर 


उन्‍नत दक्षताएं 


hea जेरिएट्रिक वार्ड उपकरणों का स्थापन, उपयोग 
तथा रखरखाव 


44 वेंटिलेटर 


4.2 |डिफिब्रिलेटर 


4.3 |पेसमेकर 


44 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART HI—SEc.4] 


विशेष दक्षताएं / कौशल 


प्रदर्शन की 
गई संख्या 


तिथि 


प्रीसेप्टर' / संकाय 
के हस्ताक्षर 


क्रैश ट्रॉली 


St [SUT |e मशीन 


प्राथमिकता निर्धारण (ट्राइएज) 


पारिवारिक शिक्षा तथा परामर्श 


छुट्टी / लामा जांच सूची 


चिकित्सा-विधिक अनुपालन 


RIT की देखभाल 


मृत्युपरयत देखभाल 


संक्रमण नियंत्रण अभ्यास 


७|०||०| ० | +|५०।| ७७५० ०४) 


मानक /सार्वभौमिक सावधानियां 


= 
५ 


कीटाणुशोधन / विसंक्रमण 


—_ 
—_ 


बीएलएस और एसीएलएस 


= 
NO 


आईसीयू में नीति/मानक /प्रोटोकॉल तैयार 
करना 


= 
wo 


औषधि प्रशासन (स्थायी आदेश शामिल हैं) 
प्रथम व द्वितीय वर्ष 


= 
wo 
= 


केटेकोलमाइन (परिगणना, अनुमापन और प्रशासन) 
a. एड्रिनलाइन 
b 


3.2 


अतालतारोधी (एंटीडिसरिथमिक) 
a. एमियोडेरोन 


43.3 


b. 
एड्रेनर्जिक एजेंट 
a. एफेड्रिन 

b. 


43.4 


श्वासनलिकासारकयंत्र (ब्रोंकोडाईले टर्स) 
a. एमिनोफाइलिन 
४. डेरिफाइलिन 


Cc 


43.5 


एनलजेसिक 
a. [Ur 


43.6 


एंटीहिस्टमीन 
a. एविल 


43.7 


उच्चरक्तचापरोधी (एंटीहाइपरटें Rica) 
a. ग्लिसरीन ट्राइनाइट्रेट 


43.8 


b. 
कोर्टिकोस्टेरॉइड 
a. हाइड्रोकॉर्टिसोन 


43.9 


मिर्गीरोधी (एंटीएपीलेप्टिक) 
a. लेवेटिरेसिटम 


b. 


3.0 


पीड़ाहह व आरामदायक (सीडेटिव्स 
रिलेक्सें ट्स) 

a. वैलियम 

b 


Us 


3.74 


एसपायरेटिक्स 


[भाग ता--खण्ड 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


45 


|| विशेष दक्षताएं / कौशल प्रदर्शन की| तिथि | प्रीसेप्टर' / संकाय 
सं गई संख्या के हस्ताक्षर 
43.42 | एंटी पार्किसंस रोग 

a. 

b. 
43.43 | इलेक्ट्रोलाइट Us एसिड बेस ara एजेंट 


a. सोडा बाइकार्बोनिट 8.4: 

सोडा बाइकार्बोनेट 7.5: 

पोटेसियम क्लोराइड 

3: नॉर्मल सेलाइन (सोडियम क्लोराइड) 
0.9: नॉर्मल सेलाइन (सोडियम gigs) 


SS 


3.4 


मधुमेह रोधी (एंटीडायबेटिक) wica 
a. इनसुलिन 
b. 


| 44 | 4 


हृदय प्रत्यावर्तन का प्रबंधन 


44.4 


BARR द्रव प्रशासन (कोलोइड / क्रिस्टेलोइड) 


44.2 


Yad और रक्त उत्पाद प्रशासन 


44.3 


टीईडी स्टॉकिंग का अनुप्रयोग 


44.4 


पेसमेकर लगे रोगी की देखभाल 


| 45 | 5 


फेफड़े प्रत्यावर्तन का प्रबंधन 


45.4 


वायुमार्ग की देखभाल 


45.2 


लेरिंग्यल मास्क वायुमार्ग अनुप्रयोग 


45.3 


एक्सट्यूबेशन 


45.4 


अंतःश्वासनलीय / श्वासनलीय चूषण - खुला और बंद 


45.5 


नेबुलाइजेशन 


45.6 


ae ड्रेनेज ट्यूब लगे रोगी की देखभाल 


5.7 


इनवेसिव वेंटिलेशन लगे रोगी की देखभाल 


45.8 


नॉन-इनवेसिव वेंटिलेशन 


45.9 


वेंटिलेटर लगाना 


45.40 


वेंटिलेटर हटाना 


45.44 


टी-ट्यूब और वेनट्युरी उपकरण का उपयोग 


5.2 


ट्रेकियोस्टोमी से हटाना 


45.43 


are फिजियोथेरेपी 


| 6 | 6 


तंत्रकीय प्रत्यावर्तन का प्रबंधन 


46.4 


संवेदी उत्तेजना 


6.2 


चेतन / कोमा स्थिति में निगरानी 


46.3 


आईसीपी निगरानी 


7 


wry प्रत्यावर्तन का प्रबंधन 


47.4 


हेमोडायलिसिस पर रोगी की देखभाल 


7.2 


पेरिटोनियल डायलिसिस शुरू करना 


47.3 


पेरिटोनियल डायलिसिस पर रोगी की देखभाल 


47.4 


द्रव प्रतिस्थापन का परिमापन 


47.5 


मूत्राशय का अल्ट्रासाउंड 


7.6 


यूरोफ्लोमीट्री 


॥7.7 


मूत्राशय असंयमन का प्रबंधन 
« मूत्राशय डायरी /समय पर मलत्याग 


46 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART HI—SEc.4] 


विशेष दक्षताएं / कौशल 


प्रदर्शन की 
गई संख्या 


तिथि 


प्रीसेप्टर' / संकाय 
के हस्ताक्षर 


» कंडोम कैथीटेराइजेशन 
० डायपर का उपयोग 


पेल्विक फ्लोर व्यायाम (केगेल व्यायाम) 


VTA प्रत्यावर्तन का प्रबंधन 


आहार भत्ते का अनुमान 


उपचार आहार योजना 


aia पोषण - गैस्ट्रोस्टोमी / जेजुनोस्टॉमी फीडिंग 


अभिभावकीय पोषण का प्रशासन (टीपीएन) 


हाइपोडर्मोक्लाइसिस 


अंतःस्रावी प्रत्यावर्तन का प्रबंधन 


इंसुलिन थेरेपी (स्लाइडिंग स्केल तथा इन्फ्यूजन) 
परिगणना, अनुमापन और प्रशासन 


स्टेरॉइड — परिगणना तथा प्रशासन 


पैर का आंकलन 


स्वास्थ्य शिक्षण 
a. इंसुलिन का स्व-प्रशासन 
७. पैर की देखभाल 


जांच के आदेश 


ईसीजी 


एबीजी 


छाती का एक्‍्स-रे 


मूल सूक्ष्म जीव-विज्ञानीय जांच 


मूल जैवरसायनिक जांच 


प्रक्रिया / उपचार के आदेश 


नेबुलाइजेशन 


are फिजियोथेरेपी 


यूरिनरी केथेटर लगाना और हटाना 


ज्म्कै 


शल्यचिकित्सा मरहम-पट्टी 


थ्रोम्बोफ्लेबिटिस » परिस्त्रवण के लिए इचथमोल 
ग्लिसरीन / मैग्नीशियम सल्फेट मरहम-पट्टी का 
अनुप्रयोग 


बाह्य निर्धारकों पर रोगियों के लिए पिन साइट 
देखभाल 


आइसोमेट्रिक तथा आइसोटोनिक अभ्यास 


गर्म व ठंडा अनुप्रयोग 


डिजिटल निकासी 


अवलोकित प्रक्रियाएं 


गैस्ट्रोस्कोपी 


सिस्टोस्कोपी 


क्षेत्रीय दौरे 


वृद्धाश्रम 


धर्मशाला 


[aT WI—ave 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 47 


a विशेष दक्षताएं / कौशल प्रदर्शन की| तिथि | प्रीसेप्टर' / संकाय 
सं. गई संख्या के हस्ताक्षर 
23.3 |डे-केयर केन्द्र 

23.4 वृद्ध क्लब 


*_ छात्र के कौशल प्रदर्शन में सक्षम पाए जाने पर, उस पर प्रीसेप्टर द्वारा हस्ताक्षर किए जाएंगे। 

छात्र: छात्रों से यह अपेक्षा की जाती है कि वे सूचीबद्ध कौशलों / दक्षताओं को तब तक करते रहें जब तक कि वे 

स्तर 3 दक्षता तक नहीं पहुंच जाते, जिसके बाद प्रत्येक दक्षता के समक्ष प्रीसेप्टर द्वारा हस्ताक्षर किए जाएंगे। 

प्रीसेप्टर / संकाय: यह सुनिश्चित करेंगे कि प्रत्येक दक्षता के लिए हस्ताक्षर, स्तर 3 पर पहुंचने के बाद ही किए 

जाएं। 

© GR 3 दक्षता यह दर्शाती है कि wah छात्र पर्यवेक्षण के बिना उस दक्षता का प्रदर्शन करने में सक्षम है। 

© WR 2 दक्षता यह दर्शाती है कि छात्र पर्यवेक्षण के साथ प्रत्येक दक्षता का प्रदर्शन करने में सक्षम है। 

« स्तर 4 दक्षता यह दर्शाती है कि छात्र पर्यवेक्षण के साथ भी उस दक्षता / कौशल का प्रदर्शन करने में सक्षम नहीं 
है| 

टिप्पणी: 5-0: दुर्लभ प्रक्रियाओं का अभ्यास कौशल प्रयोगशाला में किया जा सकता है और स्तर 3 दक्षता प्राप्त 

करनी चाहिए। 


कार्यक्रम समन्वयक / संकाय के हस्ताक्षर विभागाध्यक्ष / प्रधानाचार्य के हस्ताक्षर 
परिशिष्ट-4 
नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग कार्यक्रम हेतु नैदानिक आवश्कताएं 
प्रथम वर्ष 
Fa नैदानिक आवश्यकताएं तिथि प्रीसेप्टर / संका 
सं. य के हस्ताक्षर 
4 | नैदानिक सेगिनार,/जर्नत क्लब, नैदानिक कान्क्रेस 


हि 4 |'एपीएन - विशिष्ट नैदानिक स्थिति में नैदानिक मार्ग / 

विशिष्ट नर्सिंग सिद्धांत का अनुप्रयोग (नैदानिक सेमिनार) 

विषय का शीर्षक: 

i 2 |आरए — जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग दक्षताओं के लिए साक्ष्य की खोज 
(नैदानिक कान्फ्रेंस / जर्नल क्लब) 

विषय का शीर्षक: 

4.3 | एलएमएंडटी - नेतृत्व / प्रबंधन / शिक्षण में रुझान (जर्नल क्लब) 
विषय का शीर्षक: 

ea नैदानिक दौरे (TIT स्टाफ संकाय, छात्रों के साथ) — 
WANS नैदानिक अदर्शन 

_ 4 |पैथोफिजियोलॉजी (नैदानिक स्थितियां) 

नैदानिक स्थिति का नाम: 

को पैथोफिजियोलॉजी (नैदानिक स्थितियां) 

मामले का अध्ययन (लिखित रिपोर्ट) 

नैदानिक स्थिति का नाम: 

2.3 |फार्माकोलॉजी — औषधि अध्ययन (स्थायी आदेशों के तहत सूचीबद्ध 
औषधियां) - 5 प्रस्तुतियों की लिखित रिपोर्ट (बेडसाइड प्रस्तुतियां) 
ओषधि का नामः 


2.3. 
2.3.2 
2.3.3 
2.3.4 
2.3.5 


48 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


क्र. नैदानिक आवश्यकताएं तिथि प्रीसेप्टर / संका 
सं. य के हस्ताक्षर 
2.3.6 
2.3.7 
2.3.8 
3 अतर्विषयक नैदानिक दौरे (जराबिकित्सक के साथ) — 
WAS नैदानिक ग्रस्तुति 
(लिखित रिपोर्ट जमा करने हेतु है) 
3.4 [स्वास्थ्य आंकलन (वयस्क) -इतिवृत्त और शारीरिक जांच 
(दो लिखित रिपोर्ट) 
3.4.4. 
3.4.2. 
3.4.3. 
3.4.4. 
3.4.5. 
3.2 [स्वास्थ्य आंकलन (बुजुर्ग) - इतिवृत्त और शारीरिक जांच 
(दो लिखित रिपोर्ट) 
3.2.4. 
3.2.2. 
3.2.3. 


“उन्नत नर्सिंग अभ्यास - एपीएन, शोध अनुप्रयोग - आरए, नेतृत्व, प्रबंधन तथा शिक्षण - एलएमएंडटी 
कार्यक्रम समन्वयक / संकाय के हस्ताक्षर विभागाध्यक्ष / प्रधानाचार्य के हस्ताक्षर 


नैदानिक अनुभव विवरण - प्रथम वर्ष 

वार्ड / नैदानिक नैदानिक स्थिति देखभाल प्रदान | संकाय प्रीसेप्ट 
इकाई का किए गए दिनों की | र के हस्ताक्षर 
नाम संख्या 


[भाग ave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


49 


वार्ड / नैदानिक नैदानिक स्थिति देखभाल प्रदान | संकाय / प्रीसेप्ट 
इकाई का किए गए दिनों की | र के हस्ताक्षर 
नाम संख्या 


कार्यक्रम समन्वयक / संकाय के हस्ताक्षर विभागाध्यक्ष / प्रधानाचार्य के हस्ताक्षर 


द्वितीय वर्ष 
नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग कार्यक्रम हेतु नैदानिक आवश्कताएं 


नैदानिक आवश्यकताएं तिथि प्रीसेप्टर / संका 
य के हस्ताक्षर 


=| 4. || 


नैदानिक सेमिनार, जर्नल क्लब, नैदानिक कान्फ्रेंस 


fie 4 |जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग अभ्यास के मूल atin eae) 
विष्य का शीर्षक: 


ia 2 जेरिएट्रिक aft. (नैदानिक सेमिनार) 
विषय का शीर्षक: 


4.3 |जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग - I (जर्नल क्लब) 
विषय का शीर्षक: 


fee 4 |जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग . गा (नैदानिक सेमिनार) 
विषय का शीर्षक: 


[= 5 |जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग . I (जर्नल क्लब) 
विषय का शीर्षक: 


a नैदानिक दौरे (ARPT स्टाफ, TH, छात्रों के साथ) — 
मायला,/ नैदानिक अ्स्तुति 
(लिखित रिपोर्ट जमा करने हेतु हैं) 


खो 4 |जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग अभ्यास के मूल (पारिवारिक शिक्षा / परामर्श) 
(लिखित रिपोर्ट) 
विषय का ye: 


pee जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग अभ्यास के मूल (नैदानिक देखभाल मार्ग) 
विषय का शीर्षक: 


2.3 जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग . I (नैदानिक प्रस्तुति) 
नैदानिक स्थिति का नाम: 


हिल जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग I (मामले की अध्ययन रिपोर्ट) 
नैदानिक स्थिति का नाम: 


Hea! जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग . गा (नैदानिक प्रस्तुति) 
नेदानिक स्थिति का नाम: 


teal जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग . गा (मामले की अध्ययन रिपोर्ट) 
नैदानिक स्थिति का नाम: 


2.7 (औषधि अध्ययन (स्थायी आदेशों क॑ तहत सूचीबद्ध औषधियां) 
बेडसाइड प्रस्तुति 
(ara लिखित रिपोर्ट) 


50 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEC.4] 
क्र. नैदानिक आवश्यकताएं तिथि प्रीसेप्टर / संका 
सं. य के हस्ताक्षर 


nok} का ATF: 


2.7.4| औषधि का AT 


3 | अतर्विषयक नैदानिक दौरे (जराविकित्सक के साथ) — 
मायला, नैदानिक अस्तुति 


3.4 |जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग . I (नैदानिक प्रस्तुति) 


नैदानिक स्थिति का नाम: 


3.2 


3.3 


3.4 


3.5 | (शयले की अध्ययन Rad) 


3.6 |जेरिएट्रिक नर्सिंग . वा (नैदानिक प्रस्तुति) 


३.7 


3.8 


3.9 | (We की अध्ययन रिपोर्ट) 


3३.40 | लिखित रिपोर्ट (विकाम्रित नैदानिक, देखभाल ArT) 


टिप्पणी : मामले की अध्ययन रिपोर्ट के लिए नैदानिक प्रस्तुति लिखी जा सकती है। 
विभागाध्यक्ष / प्रधानाचार्य के हस्ताक्षर 


कार्यक्रम समन्वयक / संकाय के हस्ताक्षर 


नैदानिक अनुभव विवरण - द्वितीय वर्ष 


वार्ड / नैदानिक नैदानिक स्थिति देखभाल प्रदान | संकाय / प्रीसेप्ट 
इकाई का किए गए दिनों की | र के हस्ताक्षर 
नाम संख्या 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 5] 


वार्ड / tarp नैदानिक स्थिति देखभाल प्रदान | संकाय / प्रीसेप्ट 
इकाई का किए गए दिनों की | र के हस्ताक्षर 
नाम संख्या 
कार्यक्रम समन्वयक / संकाय के हस्ताक्षर विभागाध्यक्ष / प्रधानाचार्य के हस्ताक्षर 
परिशिष्ट--5 
स्थायी आदेश 


नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर्स को बुजुर्ग रोगियों की देखभाल के लिए जिम्मेदारी और उत्तरदायित्व लेने हेतु तैयार और योग्य 
बनाया जाता है। वे उच्च तीक्ष्णता वाले रोगियों के लिए सटीक उपचार सुनिश्चित करने हेतु गहनतावादियों, 
चिकित्सकों, शल्यचिकित्सकों और विशेषज्ञों के साथ सहयोग करते हैं। कार्यक्रम के पूरा होने पर, नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर्स को 
संस्थागत स्थायी आदेशों के अनुसार स्थायी आदेशों में सूचीबद्ध औषधियों को प्रशासित करने की अनुमति होगी। उन्हें 
संस्थागत प्रोटोकॉल के अनुसार नैदानिक परीक्षण » प्रक्रियाओं और उपचारों के आदेश देने की भी अनुमति होगी। 
स्थायी आदेश 

amide स्थिति के दौरान नर्स चिकित्सक द्वारा निम्नलिखित अंतःशिरा (इंट्रावीनस) इंजेक्शन या इन्फ्यूजन दिए 
जा सकते हैं:- 
कैटेकोलमाइन 
l. एड्रेनलाइन 
2. वैसोप्रेसिन 
अतालतारोधी (एंटीडिसरिथमिक) 
3. एमियोडेरोन 
एड्रेनार्जिक एजेंट 
4. एफेड्रीन 
श्वासनलिकासारकयंत्र (ब्रोंकोडाईले टर्स) 
5. एमीनोफाइलिन 
6. डेरिफाइलिन 


52 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


7. 


टिओवा 


एंटीहिस्टमीन 


8. 


एविल 


उच्चरक्तचापरोधी (एंटीहाइपरटेंसिव्स) 


9. 


ग्लिसरीन ट्राइनाइट्रेट 


कोर्टिकोस्टेरॉयड 


0 


. हाइड्रोकॉर्टिसोन 


मिर्गीरोधी (एंटीएपीलेप्टिक) 


il 


. लेवेटिरेसिटम 


पीड़ाहर व आरामदायक (सीडेटिव्स एंड रिलेक्सेंट्स) 


2 


. वैलियम 


इलेक्ट्रोलाइट्स Us एसिड बेस gra एजेंट 


3. 
4. 
5. 
6. 
7. 
8. 


सोडा बाइकार्बोनेट 8.4: 
सोडा बाइकार्बोनेट 7.5: 
3: नॉर्मल सेलाइन 

0.9: नॉर्मल सेलाइन 
एंटीपायरेटिक्स 

एंटी पार्किसंस ड्रग्स 


दोहराने वाली औषधियां 
9. कैल्शियम सप्लीमेंट - सैंडाकोल, vend, ऑस्टियोकैल्शियम 
20. ओरल एंटीडायबेटिक एजेंट्स - मेटफॉर्मिन, ग्लाइनेज, इंसुलिन 


नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर्स द्वारा निम्नलिखित जांच और उपचार के आदेश दिए जा सकते हैं: 


जांच के आदेश 


उपचार के आदेश 


ईसीजी 
एबीजी 
छाती का एक्स-रे 


नेबुलाइजेशन 
are फिजियोथेरेपी 
डिस्टल कोलेस्टोमी ater 


मूल जैवरसायनिक जांच - भ्इए we VSN Se 


महिला रोगियों को मूत्रवर्धक लगाना और हटाना 


ज्वजंसए ce कर्पामितमदजपंसे, KV इलेक्ट्रोलाइट्स, 
प्लेटलेट्स, WY च्ज्ज्ए ब्लीडिंग एंड क्लॉटिंग टाइम, 
प्रोकेल्सिटोनिन, ककपउठमतए क्रिएटिनिन, भ्इ |॥बए 
बए WY HRY ERY ज्प्छए कोलेस्ट्रॉल टोटल, भ्प्टए 
भ्ठे [हुए भ्ब्ट 


टैस्ट फीड्स 

uF 

शल्यचिकित्सा मरहम-पट्टी 

डायलिसिस शुरु करना और बंद करना 
थ्रोम्बोफ्लेबिटिस / परिस्त्रण. के लिए इचथमोल 


मूल सूक्ष्म जीव-विज्ञानीय जांच - संस्कृति व 
संवेदनशीलता के लिए Yad के नमूने 


ग्लिसरीन /मैग्गीशियम सल्फेट मरहम-पट्टी का 
अनुप्रयोग 

बाह्य निर्धारकों पर रोगियों के लिए पिन साइट 
देखभाल 

e आइसोमेट्रिक तथा आइसोटोनिक अभ्यास 

* डिजिटल इवेक्यूएशन 


[PART HI—SEc.4] 


[भाग Wave 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 53 


संस्थागत स्थायी आदेश और प्रोटोकॉल 

ya अस्पताल में, आपातकालीन स्थिति के दौरान दी जाने वाली विशिष्ट खुराक के साथ औषधि प्रशासन के 
लिए स्थायी आदेश एनपीजीएन ware के लिए दिशानिर्देशों के रूप में उपलब्ध कराए जा सकते हैं। एनपी छात्रों 
को इन औषधियों को प्रीसेप्टर्स / एनपी संकाय की देखरेख में प्रशासित करने के लिए प्रशिक्षित किया जाएगा। चुनिंदा 
जांच के लिए आदेश देने और विशिष्ट उपचार प्रक्रियाओं का संपादन करने के लिए प्रोटोकॉल एनपीजीएन छात्रों को 
प्रशिक्षित करने वाले प्रत्येक अस्पताल में भी उपलब्ध हो सकते हैं। 


St. टी. दिलीप कुमार, अध्यक्ष 
[विज्ञापन-/4/असा./644/2024-25] 


INDIAN NURSING COUNCIL 
NOTIFICATION 
New Delhi, the 7th October, 2024 


INDIAN NURSING COUNCIL {NURSE PRACTITIONER IN GERIATRIC NURSING (NPGN) - 
POSTGRADUATE RESIDENCY PROGRAM} REGULATIONS, 2023 


F.No. 4-/2024-INC (IV).—In exercise of the powers conferred by sub-section (l) of Section l6 of Indian 
Nursing Council Act, 947 (XLVHI of 947), as amended from time to time, the Indian Nursing Council hereby 
makes the following regulations, namely:— 


l. SHORT TITLE AND COMMENCEMENT 
i. These Regulations may be called the Indian Nursing Council {Nurse Practitioner in Geriatric Nursing 
(NPGN) - Postgraduate Residency Program} Regulations, 2023. 
ii. These shall come into force on the date of notification of the same in the Official Gazette of India. 


2. DEFINITIONS 
In these Regulations, unless the context otherwise requires, 

i. ‘the Act’ means the Indian Nursing Council Act, 947 (XLVI of 947) as amended from time to time; 

ii. ‘the Council’ means the Indian Nursing Council constituted under the Act; 

iii. ‘SNRC’ means the State Nurse and Midwives Registration Council, by whichever name constituted, by the 
respective State Governments; 

iv. ‘RN & RM’ means a Registered Nurse and Registered Midwife (RN & RM) and denotes a nurse who has 
completed successfully, recognised Bachelor of Nursing (B.Sc. Nursing) or Diploma in General Nursing and 
Midwifery (GNM) course, as prescribed by the Council and is registered in a SNRC as Registered Nurse and 
Registered Midwife; 

v. ‘Nurses Registration & Tracking System (NRTS)’ means a system developed by the Council and software 
developed in association with National Informatics Centre (NIC), Government of India, and hosted by NIC 
for the purpose of maintenance and operation of the Indian Nurses Register. It has standardised forms for 
collection of the data of Registered Nurse and Registered Midwife (RN & RM)/ Registered Auxiliary Nurse 
Midwife (RANM)/Registered Lady Health Visitor (RLHV) upon Aadhar based biometric authentication; 

vi. ‘NUID” is the Nurses Unique Identification Number given to the registrants in the NRTS system; 

vii. “General Nursing and Midwifery (GNM)’ means Diploma in General Nursing and Midwifery qualification 
recognized by the Council under Section 0 of the Act and included in Part-I of the Schedule of the Act. 


NURSE PRACTITIONER IN GERIATRIC NURSING (NPGN) - 
POSTGRADUATE RESIDENCY PROGRAM 


I. Introduction and Background 


There is a rise in life expectancy of an adult in the world as per the WHO data base (2022). This rise in older 
population increases the burden of disease and disability, and poses a tremendous challenge to the health sector as 
well as to the social and economic infrastructure. National Health Policy (207), National Population Policy (205)) 
and National Program for Health Care of the Older Adults (204) have emphasized the need for provision of quality 
and specialized health care of the older population. NHP (207) emphasizes on significant expansion in tertiary care 
services both in public and private health sectors. In building capacity, the health care professionals require advanced 


54 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


educational preparation to support specialized and super-specialized healthcare services. Nurse Practitioners (NPs) 
will be able to meet this demand provided they are well trained and empowered to practice through critical thinking, 
judgement, and skill. Rigorous educational preparation will enable them to assess and participate in promoting health, 
health maintenance, health restoration, rehabilitation and palliative care for older adult patients with chronic and 
critical illnesses. The role of NPGN was established in Unites States in 975, and then introduced in Australia, Israel, 
Norway and other countries. 

A curricular structure/framework is proposed by the Council towards preparation of Nurse Practitioner in 
Geriatric Nursing (NPGN) at the Master’s Level. The special feature of this program is that it is a clinical residency 
program emphasizing a strong clinical component with 45% of theoretical instruction and 85% of practicum. 
Competency based training is the major approach and NP education is based on competencies adapted from 
International Council of Nurses (ICN, 2005) and the NONPF competencies (20!7). NPGN education and training is 
based on competencies adapted from AACN, 207. Every course is based on achievement of competencies. The 
NPGN program consists of various courses of study that are based on strong scientific foundations including 
evidenced based practice and the management of complex health systems. These are built upon the theoretical and 
practice competencies of B.Sc. trained nurses. 

The NPGN program is intended to prepare registered B.Sc. nurses to provide advanced nursing care to older 
patients in hospital and community settings. The nursing care is focused on stabilizing patients’ condition, minimizing 
acute complications and maximizing restoration of health. The practice settings for NPGN include hospital outpatient 
clinics and in-patient facilities and long-term care facilities and they focus mainly on primary and secondary care. 
These NPs are required to practice in geriatric care units of tertiary care centres too. The NPGN would be equipped to 
diagnose, treat and manage chronic and acute conditions and geriatric symptoms associated with ageing and provide 
therapeutic interventions or, at times, palliative treatments and end of life care. They receive advanced education to 
provide services that address the health issues that impact older adults, as well as on the resultant cognitive, physical, 
psychological and social impairments. 

On completion of the program and registration with respective SNRC, they are permitted to practice all 
competencies listed in the logbook of the Council syllabus and also independently administer drugs and order 
diagnostic tests, procedures, medical equipment and therapies as per institutional protocols/standing orders. The 
NPGN when exercising this authority, they are accountable for the competencies in 


a) Using scientific knowledge and theoretical foundations in ageing; 

b) Patient selection/admission into geriatric unit and discharge; 

c) Problem identification through appropriate assessment; 

d) Selection/administration of medication or devices or therapies; 

e) Patient education for use of therapeutics; 

f) Knowledge of drug interactions of therapeutics; 

g) Evaluation of outcomes; 

h) Recognition and management of complications and untoward reactions; 

i) Contribution towards evidence-based innovations in geriatric clinical practice; 

j) Providing guidance, consultation, mentorship and educational experiences to students, nurses and other 
health professionals regarding acute and primary care; 

k) Participation in national health programs in geriatric care effectively. 


The NPGN is prepared and qualified to assume responsibility and accountability for the holistic care of older 
adults under his/her care. This has necessitated retention of “domains of learning” under “competencies”. With 
establishment of new cadre at the central and state level, NPGN will be able to provide cost effective, competent, safe 
and quality driven specialized nursing care to older adult patients in a variety of settings such as geriatric wards, 
outpatient department, geriatric day care services, psycho geriatric ward, community geriatric and geriatric 
rehabilitation wards. 

The said postgraduate degree will be registered as an additional qualification by the SNRC. 


Philosophy 

The Council believes that there is a great need to establish a postgraduate program titled Nurse Practitioner in 
Geriatric Nursing (NPGN) to meet the challenges and demands of primary and tertiary health care services in India 
and to provide quality care to older adult patients and their families. 

The Council believes that the postgraduates from a residency program focused on strong clinical component and 
competency-based training must be able to demonstrate clinical competence based on sound theoretical and evidence- 
based knowledge. The teaching learning approach should focus on adult learning principles, code of ethics, 
competency-based education, collaborative learning, precepted clinical learning with medical and nursing preceptors, 
experiential learning, and self-directed learning. Education providers/preceptors/mentors must update their current 
knowledge and practices. Medical faculty are invited to participate as preceptors in the training. 

The Council also believes that a variety of educational strategies can be used in the clinical settings to address the 
deficit of qualified geriatric nursing faculty. It is hoped to facilitate developing policies towards registration/ licensure 


[भाग पा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 55 


and create cadre positions for appropriate placement of these postgraduate NPs in Geriatric Nursing to function in 


primary and acute care centres. 

The Council believes that values, ethics and beliefs and motivation would achieve competencies in patient and 
family centred care, process-oriented care, self-care and continuing professional development utilizing evidence-based 
practice that are essential to achieve quality outcomes. 

An educational framework for the NP curriculum is proposed (See Figure-). 


Strong 
Clinical 
Component 
(Clinical Residency) 


4. Core Courses 


e Theoretical Basis for 
Advanced Practice Nursing 

e Research Application and Evidence 
Based Practice in Geriatric Care 

e Advanced Skills in Leadership, 

Management and Teaching 


Advanced 
Pathophysiology 


NP IN applied to 


है दम ste Geriatric Nursing 
cae INLUESSTINEE e Advanced =| 
Practice PROGRAM Pharmacology 
है e Geriatric applied to 
Nursing - I Geriatric Nursing 
e Advanced 


ay 
Assessment 


रत Geriatric 
C Nursing - II 


ty 


Competency Based Advanced 
Education and Knowledge 
and Ethics 


Training 


Figure-l. Nurse Practitioner in Geriatric Care - An Educational Curricular Framework 


II. Program Description 

This program is designed to assist students in developing expertise and in-depth understanding in the field of 
Geriatric Nursing. It will help students to develop advanced nursing skills in Geriatric Nursing. 

The NPGN program is a nursing residency program with a main focus on competency-based training. The 
duration of the course is of two years with the curriculum consisting of theory that includes core courses, advanced 
practice courses and clinical courses, besides clinical practicum which is a major component (Refer Curricular 


Framework). 


वा, Aim 
The NPGN program prepares registered B.Sc. nurses for advanced practice roles such as clinical experts, 
managers, educators, and consultants as Nurse Practitioners in Geriatric Nursing leading to M.Sc. Nursing (NP in 


Geriatric Nursing). 
The aim of this curriculum is to create a cadre of nursing professionals in the care of the older adults who would 


acquire knowledge about the age-related biological changes. 


IV. Objectives 
On completion of the program, the NPGNs will be able to: 
l. Assume responsibility and accountability to provide competent and appropriate family centred care to older 
adult patients; 


56 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


2. Demonstrate clinical competence/expertise in providing geriatric care which includes assessment, diagnostic 
reasoning, complex monitoring and therapies; 

3. Apply theoretical, pathophysiological, and pharmacological principles and evidence base in implementing 
therapies/interventions in geriatric care; 

4. Assess and participate in managing acute illnesses in older adults to stabilize and restore the patient’s health 
and minimize or manage complications as part of geriatric multidisciplinary team; 

5. Collaborate with other health care professionals in the geriatric care team, across the continuum of care. 


V. Minimum requirements to start the Nurse Practitioner in Geriatric Nursing (NPGN) Program 


The institution must accept the accountability for the NPGN program and its students and offer the program 
congruent with the Council standards. It must fulfil the following requirements: 


I. Essentiality Certificate 
a. Any institution who wishes to start Nurse Practitioner in Geriatric Nursing Program shall obtain an 
Essentiality Certificate/Government Order from the State. 
b. The following institutions are exempted from obtaining Essentiality Certificate: 
i. Institutions/Universities already offering B.Sc. Nursing or M.Sc. Nursing programs and found suitable 
by the Council under Sections 3 and 4 of the Act; 
ii. Institutions/Universities offering MBBS/DNB programs. 


2. Hospital 
a. The institute should have a parent hospital/tertiary care centre with a minimum of 200 beds. 
b. Itis preferable to have a medical college/nursing college attached to the parent hospital. 


3. Beds 
a. The hospital should have a minimum of 30 bedded geriatric ward with supportive services such as 
orthopaedics, neurology, physiotherapy, occupational therapy department, ophthalmology, gynaecology, 
dentistry, rheumatology, psychiatry, rehabilitative and community health services; 


4. Affiliation with Old Age Homes 
a. The hospital can have affiliation to old age homes. 


5. Staffing for Geriatric Unit 

a. Every geriatric ward should have a Charge Nurse preferably with B.Sc. Nursing or M.Sc. Nursing 
qualification; 

b. The nurse patient ratio should be :4 as per the Council norms; 

c. Provision of additional 45% staff towards leave reserve; 

d. The geriatric unit must have a geriatric physician, social worker/counsellor, physiotherapist and an 
occupational therapist; 

e. Doctor patient ratio can be I:0. 


6. Faculty/Staff Resources 


a. Clinical area: 
i. Nursing Preceptor: Full time qualified GNM with 6 years of experience, preferably qualified in Post 
Basic Diploma in Geriatric Nursing or B.Sc. Nursing with 2 years’ experience or M.Sc. (Medical 
Surgical Nursing/Community Health Nursing) with one year of experience, in a geriatric unit; 
ii. Medical Preceptor: MD in Geriatric/General Medicine; 
iii. Preceptor Student Ratio: Nursing :0, Medical :0 (Every student must have a medical and a nursing 
preceptor). 


b. Teaching faculty: 
i. Professor/Associate Professor: 4 {Teaching experience: 5 years post PG-M.Sc. (Medical Surgical 
Nursing/Community Health Nursing)} - One faculty for every 0 students; 
ii. Assistant Professor: | (Teaching experience: 3 years post B.Sc. Nursing). 


c. The above faculty shall perform dual role or be a senior nurse with M.Sc. Nursing qualification employed in 
geriatric unit. 


d. Guest lecturers: Pharmacology, Pathophysiology, Geriatric Medicine, General Medicine and General 
Surgery, Cardiology, Orthopaedics, Psychiatry, Community Medicine, Physiotherapy and occupational 
therapy. 


7. Physical and Learning Resources at Hospital/College 
a. One class room/conference room in the clinical area; 
b. Skills lab for simulated learning (hospital/college); 


[भागवता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 57 


c. Library and computer facilities with access to online journals; 
d. E-learning facilities. 


8. List of equipment for a thirty bedded geriatric ward (See Appendix-l). 


9. Student Recruitment/Admission Requirements 
a. Applicants must have a registered B.Sc. Nursing/P.B.B.Sc. Nursing degree with a minimum of one-year 
clinical experience, preferably in any general medical-surgical/geriatric care setting prior to enrolment; 
b. Must have undergone B.Sc. Nursing in an institution recognized by the Council and have been registered by 
the respective SNRC; 
Must have scored not less than 55% aggregate marks in the B.Sc. Nursing program; 
d. Selection must be based on the merit of an entrance examination and interview held by the competent 
authority; 
e. Must be physically fit. 


६2 


Number of candidates: | candidate for l0 geriatric beds. 


Salary: 


l. In-service candidates will get regular salary. 
2. Stipend/Salary for the other candidates as per the salary structure of the hospital where the course is 
conducted. 


VI. Examination Regulations 


Eligibility for appearing in the examination 
Attendance: Minimum 80% for Theory and Practical before appearing for final university examination but must 
complete !00% in practical before the award of degree. 


There is no minimum cut off for the Internal Assessment marks, as internal and external marks are added together 
for declaring pass. 


Examining and Degree Awarding Authority: Respective University. 


Declaration of Results 


The candidate is declared to have passed the exam if the score is 60% and above. This score is the aggregate of 
both internal and external university examination in theory and practical in every course/subject and less than 60% is 
fail. 

For calculating the rank, the aggregate of the two years’ marks will be considered. 

If a candidate fails in theory or practical, he/she must appear for the paper in which he/she has failed. 

Rank will not be declared for candidates who fail in any subject. 

Maximum period to complete the program is 4 years. 


Practical Examination 

OSCE type of examination is to be conducted alongside viva - Refer OSCE Guidelines found in 
Appendix-2. 

Maximum number of students per day = 0 students. 

Examination should be held in the clinical area only. 


The team of practical examiners will include one internal examiner {M.Sc. Nursing faculty with two years of 
experience in teaching the NPGN program/M.Sc. Nursing faculty (Medical Surgical Nursing preferable) with 5 years 
of Post PG experience}, one external examiner (same as above) and one medical internal examiner who should have 
served as the preceptor for NPGN program. 


Dissertation 

Research Guides: Main guide: Nursing faculty (3 years Post PG experience) teaching NP program, 
Co-guide: Medical preceptor. 

Submission of research proposal: 6-9 months after date of admission in the first year. 

Guide Student Ratio: :5 

Research Committee: There shall be a separate research committee in the college/hospital to guide and oversee 
the progress of the research (minimum of 5 members with principal or CNO who is M.Sc. Nursing qualified). 

Ethical clearance must be obtained by the Institutional Review Board/Hospital Ethics Committee since it 
involves clinical research. 


58 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


Topic Selection: The topic should be relevant to geriatric nursing that will add knowledge or evidence for nursing 
intervention. The research should be conducted in any of the geriatric care settings. 


Data collection: 7 weeks are allotted for data collection, which can be integrated during clinical experience after 6 
months in first year and before 6 months in second year. 


Writing the Research Report: 6-9 months in second year. 

Submission of Dissertation Final: 3 months before completion of the second year. 
Dissertation Examination 

Internal Assessment: Viva & Dissertation report = 50 marks. 

University Examination: Viva & Dissertation report = 50 marks. 

(Marking guide used for other M.Sc. Nursing specialties can be used for evaluation). 


VII. Assessment (Formative and Summative) 


e Test paper, quiz, seminar 
e Written assignments/Term papers 
e Case/Clinical presentation 
e Clinical or Care pathway/Case study report 
e Clinical performance assessment 
e Objective Structured Clinical Examination (OSCE) 
e Final examination 
(See Appendix-2 for Assessment Guidelines) 
Scheme of Final Examination 
S.No. Title Theory % Practical % 
Hours | Internal | External | Hours | Internal | External 
I year 
Core Courses 
l /|Theoretical Basis for Advanced Practice 2 hours 50 
Nursing 
2 |Research Application and Evidence Based |3 hours 30 70 
Practice in Geriatric Care 
3 |Advanced Skills in Leadership, Management| 3 hours 30 70 
and Teaching 
Advanced Practice Courses 
4  |Advanced Pathophysiology & Advanced 3 hours 30 70 
Pharmacology applied to Geriatric Nursing 
35 {Advanced Health/Physical Assessment 3 hours 30 70 50 50 
II" year 
Specialty Courses 
l_ |Foundations of Geriatric Nursing Practice 3 hours 30 70 00 00 
2 {Geriatric Nursing - I 3 hours 30 70 00 00 
3 |Geriatric Nursing - IT 3 hours 30 70 00 00 
4  |Dissertation and viva 50 50 
VIII. Courses of Instruction 
S.No. Title Theory (hours) | Lab/Skill Lab (hours) | Clinical (hours) 
I year 
Core Courses 
I |Theoretical Basis for Advanced Practice 40 
Nursing 
II /Research Application and Evidence Based 56 24 336 (7 weeks) 
Practice in Geriatric Care 
Il |Advanced Skills in Leadership, Management 56 24 92 (4 weeks) 
and Teaching Skills 
IV_ |Advanced Practice Courses 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 59 


S.No. Title Theory (hours) | Lab/Skill Lab (hours) | Clinical (hours) 
Advanced Pathophysiology applied to कि 336 (7 weeks) 
Geriatric Nursing 

V_ |Advanced Pharmacology applied to Geriatric 54 336 (7 weeks) 
Nursing 
जा |Advanced Health/Physical Assessment 70 48 576 ((2 weeks) 
TOTAL = 2208 hours 336 (7 weeks) 96 (2 weeks) 776 (37 weeks) 
II year 
Specialty Courses 
जा |Foundations of Geriatric Nursing Practice ee 48 576 (2 weeks) 
VIII |Geriatric Nursing - I |_9% | 48 576 (2 weeks) 
IX |Geriatric Nursing - II |_9% | 48 624 ((3 weeks) 
TOTAL = 2208 hours 288 (6 weeks) 44 (3 weeks) 776 (37 weeks) 


Number of weeks available in a year = 52 - 6 (Annual leave, Casual leave, Sick leave = 6 weeks) = 46 weeks x 48 
hours = 2208 hours 

Two years = 446 hours (Examination during clinical posting) 

Instructional hours: Theory = 624 hours, Skill Lab = 240 hours, Clinical = 3552 hours, Total = 446 hours 

I* year: 336-96-776 hours (Theory-Skill Lab-Clinical) {Theory = 5%, Practicum (Skill Lab & Clinical) = 85%} 

II" year: 288-44-776 hours (Theory-Skill Lab-Clinical) {Theory = 5%, Practicum (Skill Lab & Clinical) = 85%} 
I* year = 46 weeks/2208 hours (46 x 48 hours) (Theory + Lab: 7.5 hours per week for 44 weeks = 330/336 + 
96 hours*) 

*Theory + Lab = 96 hours can be given for 2 weeks in the form of introductory block classes and workshops 

II"? year = 46 weeks/2208 hours (46 x 48 hours) (Theory + Lab: 8.5 hours per week for 45 weeks = 384 + 
48 hours) 

(I week Block Classes = 48 hours) 


CLINICAL PRACTICE 


A. Clinical Residency experience: A minimum of 48 hours per week is prescribed, however, it is flexible with 
different shifts and OFF followed by ON CALL duty. 


B. 8 hours duty with one day OFF in a week and ON CALL duty one per week. 


Clinical placements 
Ist year: 44 weeks (excludes 2 weeks of introductory block classes and workshop) 


Geriatric wards - 2 weeks 
General medical wards - 6 weeks 
General surgical wards - 2 weeks 
Orthopaedic ward - 4 weeks 
Ophthalmology ward - | week 
Neurology ward and OPD - 3 weeks 
Psychiatric ward - 3 weeks 
Community field practice area - 3 weeks 
Emergency department - | week 


Outpatient Department 


Geriatric OPD - 4 weeks 
Psychiatric OPD - | week 
Endocrine OPD - 2 weeks 


Physiotherapy and Occupational therapy - 2 weeks 


II™ year : 45 weeks (excludes one week of block classes) 


Geriatric ward - |2 weeks 
Medical ICU - 3 weeks 
Surgical ICU - 3 weeks 
Rehabilitation unit - 5 weeks 
Palliative and hospice centre - 4 weeks 
Old age home - 4 weeks 


Haematology and Oncology ward - | week 


60 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SECc.4] 
Urology ward - | week 
Psychogeriatric ward/dementia - 2 weeks 
Community field practice area - 3 weeks 
Emergency department - | week 
Outpatient Department 
Geriatric OPD and dementia clinic - 2 weeks 
Gynae Oncology OPD - | week 
Geriatric day care centre - | week 
Podiatric OPD - | week 
Field visits - | week 


Hospice care 
Palliative care unit 
Old age homes 


Teaching methods: Teaching - Theoretical, Lab & Clinical can be done in the following way and integrated 
during clinical posting: 


Experiential learning 
Reflective learning 
Simulation 

Clinical seminars 

Clinical conference 
Case/clinical presentation 

In depth drug study, presentation and report 
Nursing rounds 

Journal clubs 

Case study 

Advanced health assessment 
Faculty lecture 

Directed reading 
Assignments 

Workshops 


Procedures/Log Book: At the end of each clinical posting, Clinical Log Book (Specific Procedural 
Competencies/Clinical Skills) (Appendix-3) and Clinical Requirements (Appendix-4) have to be signed by the 
preceptor/faculty. 


Nurse Practitioner in Geriatric Care Competencies (Adapted from AACN, 207) 


Nurse Practitioner in Geriatric Nursing (NPGN) 


Contributes to knowledge development and improved care of the geriatric population. 
Develops the ability to obtain a relevant focused history. 


Demonstrates the ability to appropriately diagnose, evaluate and prescribe treatment and preventive strategies 
for older adults. 


Develops ability to manage/control infection in patients including risk of cross infection. 

Works effectively with teams to ensure quality and safety of patient care. 

Demonstrates ability to perform a comprehensive geriatric assessment. 

Demonstrates ability to assess the nutritional status of older adult and appropriate nutritional support strategy. 
Describes the current and evolving role of NP in geriatric acute care. 


Provides guidance, consultation, mentorship and educational experiences to students, nurses and other health 
professionals about the care of geriatric population. 


. Provides leadership to facilitate the highly complex coordination and planning required for the delivery of 


care to young adults (including late adolescents), adults, and older adults. 


. Implements evidence-based practice interventions to promote safety and risk reduction for older adults with 


acute, critical, and complex chronic illness needs. 


[भाग ave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


6l 


equi 


2. Demonstrates continuous quality improvement of one’s own practice. 


3. 


4. 
5. 
6. 


Identifies the important concepts of Pathophysiology of common diseases of older adults. 
Provides effective care and excels in clinical skills in geriatric care. 


Analyses strengths and barriers of technological and information systems with the goal of improving care 
delivery and coordination. 
Applies ethical and legal standards in health care for the geriatric population. 


Institutional Protocol/Standing Orders-based administration of drugs & ordering of investigations and 


therapies 


The students will be trained to independently administer drugs and order diagnostic tests, procedures, medical 


pment and _ therapies 


as per institutional protocols/standing orders 


(Appendix-5: Standing Orders). 


Administration of emergency drugs is carried out in consultation with concerned physician and endorsed later by 
written orders. 


Implementation of Curriculum - A Tentative Plan 


Ist year Courses Introductory | Workshop |Theory integrated in Methods of Teaching 
Classes Clinical Practicum (Topic can be specified) 

l. Theoretical Basis for 8 hours | x 32 = 32 hours e Seminar/Theory application 
Advanced Practice e Lecture (faculty) 

Nursing (40) 

2. Research Application and 8 hours 40 (5 days) |] x 24 = 24 hours e Research study analysis 
Evidence Based Practice + 8 hours e Exercise/Assignment (lab) 
in Geriatric Care 
(56 + 24) 

3. Advanced Skills in 2 + 2 hours l x 26 = 26 hours e Clinical conference 
Leadership, Management 2.5x 6=40 hours |e Seminar 
and Teaching (56 + 24) e Exercises/Assignment (lab) 

4. Advanced .5x40=60 hours |e Case presentation 
Pathophysiology applied e Seminar 
to Geriatric Nursing (60) e Clinical conference 

5. Advanced Pharmacology 0 hours l x 44 = 44 hours e Nursing rounds 
applied to Geriatric e Drug study presentation 
Nursing (54) e Standing orders/presentation 

6. Advanced Health/ 8 hours 2 x 26 = 52 hours e Clinical demonstration 
Physical Assessment .5 x 8 = 27 hours (faculty) 

(70 + 48) ] x 5 = 35 hours e Return demonstration 
2 x 6 = [2 hours e Nursing rounds 
2x2=4 hours e Physical assessment (all 
systems) 
e Case study 
TOTAL 48 hours | 48 hours 336 hours 


I year: Introductory classes = | week (48 hours), Workshop = | week (48 hours), 44 weeks = 7.5 hours per 
week (330/336 hours) 


II" year Courses 


I week Block classes (48 hours) 


Theory integrated into 
Clinical Practicum 


Methods of Teaching 


l. 


Foundations of Geriatric 
Nursing Practice 
(96 + 48 hours) = 44 hours 


9 hours x ll weeks = 99 hours 


Demonstration (lab) 
Return demonstration (lab) 
Clinical teaching 

Case study 

Seminar 

Clinical conference 
Faculty lecture 


2. Geriatric Nursing - I 


(96 + 48 hours) = 44 hours 


9 hours x 6 weeks = [44 hours 


Demonstration (lab) 
Return Demonstration (lab) 
Clinical conference/journal club 


62 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


Ist year Courses Introductory | Workshop |Theory integrated in Methods of Teaching 
Classes Clinical Practicum (Topic can be specified) 


Seminar 

Case presentation 

Drug study (including drug interaction) 
Nursing rounds 

Faculty lecture 


3. Geriatric Nursing - II 9 hours x 6 weeks = |44 hours 
(96 + 48 hours) = 44 hours 


Demonstration (lab) 

Return Demonstration 

Nursing rounds 

Clinical conference/journal club 
Seminar 

Faculty lecture 


II™ year: Block classes - | week, 45 weeks - 8.5/9 hours per week (382.5/384 hours). 
Topic for every teaching method will be specified in the detailed plan by the respective teacher/institution concerned. 


CORE COURSES 
I. Theoretical Basis for Advanced Practice Nursing 
COMPETENCIES 
l. Analyses the global healthcare trends and challenges. 
2. Analyses the impact of Healthcare and Education policies in India on nursing. 
3. Develops in depth understanding of the healthcare delivery system in India, and its challenges. 
4. Applies economic principles relevant to delivery of geriatric care services. 
5. Manages and transforms health information to effect health outcomes such as cost, quality and satisfaction. 
6. Accepts the accountability and responsibility in practicing the Nurse Practitioner’s roles and competencies. 
7. Actively participates in collaborative practice by involving all healthcare team members in geriatric care and 


perform the roles within the authorized scope of practice. 
8. Engages in ethical practice having a sound knowledge of law, ethics and regulation of advanced nursing practice. 
9. Uses the training opportunities provided through well planned preceptorship and performs safe and competent 
care applying nursing process/care pathways or clinical pathways. 
0. Applies the knowledge of nursing theories in providing competent care to geriatric patients. 
ll. Predicts future challenges of Nurse Practitioner’s roles in a variety of healthcare settings. 


Hours of Instruction: Theory: 40 hours 


S.No. Topic Hours 
l. |Global Health Care Challenges and Trends (Competency-) 2 
2. |Health System in India: 2 
Health Care Delivery System in India - Changing Scenario (Competency-3) 
3. |National Health Planning - 5-year plans and National Health Policy (Competency-2) 2 
Health Economics & Health Care Financing (Competency-4) 4 
5. |Health Information System including Nursing Informatics (use of computers) (Competency-5) 4 


ADVANCED NURSING PRACTICE (ANP) 


fa ANP - Definition, Scope, Philosophy, Accountability, Roles & Responsibilities (Collaborative 3 
Practice and Nurse Prescribing Roles) (Competency-6 & 7) 


7. |Regulation (Accreditation of Training Institutions and Credentialing) & Ethical Dimensions of 3 
Advanced Nursing Practice Role (Competency-8) 


ey . |Nurse Practitioner - Roles, Types, Competencies, Clinical Settings for Practice, Cultural 3 
Competence (Competency-6) 


| 9. | Training for NPs - Preceptorship (Competency-9) 


0. |Future Challenges of NP Practice (Competency-I) 


ll. |Theories of Nursing applied to APN (Competency-!0) 


2. |Nursing Process/Care Pathway applied to APN (Competency-9) 


७5 | ।> | ७२ | ++ | rw 


SELF-LEARNING ASSIGNMENTS 


l. |Identify Health Care and Education Policies and analyse its impact on Nursing 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 63 


S.No. Topic Hours 


Describe the legal position in India for NP practice. What is the future of nurse prescribing 
policies in India with relevance to these policies in other countries? 


3. |Examine the nursing protocols relevant to NP practice found in primary and acute care 
geriatric units 
Total 40 hours 
Bibliography: 


Il. 


AACN (202). The Essentials: Core Competencies for Professional Nursing Education - Entry level and 
Advanced level Nursing Education, American Association of Colleges of Nursing. 

De Nisco & Barkers A.M. (205). Advanced Practice Nursing: Essential Knowledge for the Profession (3 ed.), 
Massachusetts: Jones & Bartlett Publishers Inc. 

ICN (2020). Guidelines on Advanced Practice Nursing, Geneva: ICN. 

NONPF (2022). Nurse Practitioner Role Competencies, National Organization of Nurse Practitioner Faculties. 
Schober M. & Affara F.A. (2006). Advanced Nursing Practice. Oxford: Blackwell Publishing. 

Stewart G.J. & Denisco S.M. (20I5). Role Development for the Nurse Practitioner. USA: Springer Publishing 
Company. 


Research Application and Evidence Based Practice in Geriatric Care 


COMPETENCIES 


940 at a ae 


6. 


Applies sound research knowledge and skills in conducting independent research in geriatric care setting. 
Participates in collaborative research to improve in quality of patient care. 

Interprets and uses research findings to produce EBP. 

Tests/evaluates current practice to develop best practices and health outcomes and quality care. 

Analyses the evidence for nursing interventions carried out in geriatric nursing practice to promote safety and 
effectiveness of care. 

Develops skill in writing scientific research reports. 


Hours of Instruction: Theory: 56 + Lab/Skill Lab: 24 = 80 hours 


S.No. Topic Hours 
l. |Research and Advanced Practice Nursing: 2 
Significance of research and inquiry related to advanced nursing role (Competency-!) 
2. |Research Agenda for APN Practice: 5 


Testing current practice to develop best practice, health outcomes and indicators of quality 
care in advanced practice (Competency-3, 4, 5), promoting research culture 


3. |Research Knowledge and Skills: 40 
Research competencies essential for APNs (interpretation and use of research, evaluation of] (5 days 
practice, participation in collaborative research) workshop) 
Introduction to Evidence Based Practice (EBP) project - PICOT question, steps of planning, 
implementation, evaluation and dissemination (project proposal and project report) 

Research Methodology 

Phases/steps 

(Research question, Review of literature, conceptual framework, research designs, 
sampling, data collection, methods & tools, Analysis and Reporting) 

Writing research proposal and research report (Competency-|, 2) 

4. |Writing for publication 5 
(Writing workshop - Manuscript preparation and finding funding sources) (Competency-6) | (workshop) 

5. |Evidence based practice 4 


- Concepts, principles, importance, and steps 

- Integrating EBP to work environment 

- Barriers to implement EBP 

- Strategies to promote EBP 
(Competency-3, 4, 5) 


Total 56 hours 


64 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


Practical/Lab & Assignments: 24 hours 


Identifying research priorities 

Writing exercises on research question, objectives, and hypothesis 

Writing research proposal/EBP project proposal 

Scientific paper writing - preparation of manuscript for publication 

Writing systematic reviews/literature review - Analyse the evidence for a given nursing intervention in geriatric 
nursing. 


Practicum 


Research practicum: Dissertation (336 hours = 7 weeks)/Evidence Based Practice Project (EBP project) 


Bibliography 


Il. 


Gray J. & Grove S.K. (2020). Burns & Groves. The Practice of Nursing Research: Appraisal, Synthesis and 
Generation of Evidence (9" ed.), St. Louis: Elsevier Saunders. 

Polit D.F. & Beck C.T. (202). Nursing research: Generating and assessing evidence for nursing practice ([ 
ed.), New Delhi: Wolters Kluwer. 

Schmidt N.A. & Brown J.M. (202). Evidence-based practice for nurses’ appraisal and application of research. 
Sd: Jones & Bartlett Publishers Inc. 


| th 


Advanced Skills in Leadership, Management and Teaching 


COMPETENCIES 


० 7०० ० 9 ० के ७२ (७ :- 


0. 


Applies principles of leadership and management in geriatric care units. 

Manages stress and conflicts effectively in a geriatric care setting using sound knowledge of principles. 
Applies problem solving and decision-making skills effectively. 

Uses critical thinking and communication skills in providing leadership and managing geriatric patient care. 
Builds teams and motivates others in a geriatric care setting. 

Develops unit budget, manages supplies and staffing effectively. 

Participates appropriately in times of innovation and change. 

Uses effective teaching methods, media and evaluation based on sound principles of teaching. 

Develops advocacy role in patient care, maintains quality and ethics in geriatric units in hospital and community 
settings. 

Provides counselling to families and patients in crisis situations particularly end of life care. 


Hours of Instruction = Theory: 56 + Lab/Skill Lab: 24 = 80 hours 


S.No. Topic Hours 
l. |Theories, styles of leadership and current trends 2 
2. |Theories, styles of management and current trends 2 
3. |Principles of leadership and management applied to geriatric care settings 4 
4. |Stress management and conflict management - principles and application to geriatric care 4 


environment, effective time management 


5. {Quality improvement and audit 4 

rey Problem solving, critical thinking and decision making, communication skills applied to 5 
geriatric care nursing practice 

7. |Team building, motivating and mentoring within geriatric ward and community set up 2 

ea . |Budgeting and management of resources including human resources in geriatric ward/ 5 
community setting including material management, staffing, and assignments 

| 9. | Change and innovation 2 

0. |Staff performance and evaluation (performance appraisals) | 6 | 

ll. |Teaching-learning theories and principles applied to Geriatric Nursing 2 

2. |Competency-based education and outcome-based education 2 

3. |Teaching methods/strategies - experiential, reflective, scenario based, simulation etc., Le) 


media: educating patients and staff in gerontology care settings 


4. |Staff education and use of tools in evaluation 4 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 65 


S.No. Topic Hours 
5. |APN - roles as a teacher 2 
6. |Advocacy roles in geriatric care environment 2 
Total 56 hours 


Practical/Lab = 24 hours 


SO QO VON FON BS 9 Ne कक 


il 
2 


Preparation of staff patient assignment 
Preparation of unit budget 
Preparation of staff duty roster 
Patient care audit 
Preparation of nursing care standards and protocols 
Management of equipment and supplies 
Monitoring, evaluation, and writing report of infection control practices 
Development of teaching plan 
Micro teaching/patient education sessions 
. Preparation of teaching method and media for patients and staff 
. Planning and conducting OSCE/OSPE 
. Construction of tests 


Assignment : Prepare Nursing care standards for a geriatric unit. 


Bibliography 


Bastable S.B. (209). Nurse as educator: Principles of teaching and learning for nursing practice (5 ed.), New 
Delhi: Jones & Bartlett Publishers Inc. 

Billings D.M. & Halstead J.A. (20I9). Teaching in nursing: A guide for faculty (67 ed.), St. Louis, Missouri: 
Saunders Elsevier. 

Clark C.C. (200). Creative nursing leadership and management, New Delhi: Jones & Bartlett Publishers Inc. 
Liebler J.G. & McConnel C.R. (2008). Management principles for health professionals. Sudbury, M.A.: Jones & 
Bartlett Publishers Inc. 

Roussel L. & Swansburg R.C. (200). Management and leadership for nurse administrators (57 ed.), New Delhi: 
Jones & Bartlett Publishers Inc. 


ADVANCED NURSING COURSES 


IV. Advanced Pathophysiology applied to Geriatric Nursing 
COMPETENCIES 


l. 


2. 


3. 


Integrates the knowledge of pathophysiological process in geriatric conditions to diagnosis and formulating plan 
of care. 

Applies the pathophysiological principles in symptom management and secondary prevention of illnesses among 
older adults. 

Analyses the pathophysiological changes relevant to each geriatric illnesses recognizing the value of diagnosis, 
treatment, care and prognosis 


Hours of Instruction: Theory: 60 hours 


U 


nit | Hours Content 


|r | | 4 | IMMUNOLOGICAL FACTORS IN DISEASE 


e Components of immune system 


e Mechanism of the immune response 


e Immune deficiency and lymph proliferative disorders 


e Immunity 


e Types of immune reactions 


e Vaccines 


| | 2  |INFECTION AND DISEASES 


e Epidemiology and spread of infections 


e Diagnosis and management of infections (RTI, UTI, Skin) 


66 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART HI—SEc.4] 


Unit 


Hours 


Content 


| वा | 


FLUID AND ELECTROLYTE BALANCE 


Hypernatremia and hyponatremia 


Hyperkalaemia and hypokalaemia 


Calcium - phosphate and magnesium metabolism/Vitamin D 


Disturbance in acid base 


IV 


CARDIOVASCULAR FUNCTION 
Advanced pathophysiological process of cardiovascular conditions 


Cardiomyopathies 


Myocarditis 


Hypertension 


Diseases of the aorta 


Peripheral vascular disease 


Ischemic heart disease 


PULMONARY FUNCTION 
Advanced pathophysiological process of pulmonary conditions 


Disease of the upper and lower respiratory tract 


Bronchial asthma, COPD, Cor pulmonale 


Acute and chronic respiratory failure 


Neoplasms of lung 


Interstitial lung disease (ILD) - Disease of pleura, mediastinum and diaphragm 


VI 


GASTROINTESTINAL FUNCTION 
Advanced pathophysiological process of gastrointestinal conditions 


Diseases of the oesophagus 


Gastroesophageal reflux disease 


Peptic ulcer, gastritis 


Malignancy of stomach, colon 


VII 


HEPATOBILIARY AND PANCREATIC FUNCTION 
Advanced pathophysiological process of hepatobiliary conditions 


Diagnostic procedures in liver disorders 


Derangement of hepatic/biliary metabolism 


Acute hepatitis 


Chronic hepatitis 


Cirrhosis of liver 


Tumours of liver 


Liver abscess 


Cholecystitis, cholelithiasis 


Pancreatitis 


Pancreatic malignancy 


Vill 


ENDOCRINE FUNCTIONS 
Advanced pathophysiological process of endocrine conditions 


Pituitary gland 


Diseases of the anterior pituitary 


Disorders of the neurohypophysis 


Hyper and hypothyroidism 


Hyper and hypoparathyroidism 


Diabetes mellitus 


Diseases of the adrenal cortex and medulla 


[भागवता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


Unit | Hours Content 


Ix ॥ RENAL AND URINARY FUNCTIONS 
Advanced pathophysiological process of the kidney and urinary conditions 


e Acute renal failure 


e Chronic kidney disease 


e Nephrotic syndrome 


e Nephritic syndrome 


e Vascular diseases of the kidney (Renal artery stenosis) 


e Nephrolithiasis 


e Obstructive uropathy 


e Urinary tract infections 


e Urinary incontinence 


e Epididymo-orchitis 


x ka HAEMATOLOGICAL FUNCTION 
Advanced pathophysiological process of haematological conditions 


e Blood formation and destruction 


e Blood groups and blood transfusion reaction 


e Anaemia 


e Bone marrow failure 


e Myeloproliferative disorders 


e Idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura (ITP) 


e Leukaemia 


e Lymphomas 


XI (ae FUNCTIONS OF CONNECTIVE TISSUE, JOINTS, AND BONES 
Advanced pathophysiological process of conditions affecting connective tissue, joints and bones 


e Rheumatoid arthritis 


e Ankylosing spondylitis 


e Systemic lupus erythematosus 


e Polymyalgia 


e Gout 


e Osteoarthritis 


e Diseases of bone - metabolic and endocrine 


XII ei NEUROLOGICAL FUNCTION 
Advanced pathophysiological process of neurological conditions 


e Diagnostic tests in neurology - EMG, scans 


e Coma 


e Headache 


e Epilepsy 


e Sleep disorders - obstructive sleep apnoea 


e Diseases of the cranial nerves 


e Cerebrovascular diseases - CVA, Transient ischemic attack 


e Spinal cord injury 


e Peripheral neuropathy 


e Pyogenic infections of the CNS - encephalitis, meningitis 


e Viral infections - herpes zoster 


e Demyelinating diseases 


e Degenerative diseases - Parkinson’s disease, progressive supra nuclear palsy 


e Metabolic and nutritional diseases in CNS - Vitamin 82, Thiamine 


68 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


Unit | Hours Content 


XI (a INTEGUMENTARY FUNCTION 


Advanced pathophysiological process of integumentary conditions 


e Cutaneous manifestation of systemic illness 


e Generalised pruritis 


e Skin pigmentation and Ichthyosis 


e Scabies 


e Photosensitivity 


e Psoriasis 


e Fungal infections of skin 


Bibliography 


Berkowitz A. (202). Clinical Pathophysiology (274 ed.). MedMaster. Inc. 
Huether S.E., McCance K.L. & Brashers V.L. (20]9). Understanding Pathophysiology (7" ed.). St. Louis, 
Missouri: Elsevier. 
Norris T.L. (2020). Porth’s Essentials of Pathophysiology. (5" ed.). Walters & Kluwer. 
Porth C.M. (2007). Essentials of Pathophysiology: Concepts of altered health states (4 ed.). Philadelphia: 
Lippincott Williams and Wilkins. 

Story L. & Dlugasch L. (209). Advanced Pathophysiology for The Advanced 
Practice Nurse. ([/ ed.). Jones & Bartlett Publishers Inc. 

Willis L.M. (209). Professional Guide to Pathophysiology. (47 ed.). LWW. 


V. Advanced Pharmacology applied to Geriatric Nursing 


COMPETENCIES 

l. Applies the pharmacological principles in providing care to geriatric patients and families. 

2. Analyses relevant pharmacotherapeutic drugs used in geriatric patients. 

3. Performs safe drug administration based on principles and institutional protocols. 

4. Documents accurately and provides follow up care. 

5. Applies sound knowledge of drug interactions in administration of drugs to geriatric patients in the acute care 


settings. 


6. Guides their families in self-care management. 
Hours of Instruction: Theory: 54 hours 
Unit | Hours Content 
| 2  |INTRODUCTION TO PHARMACOLOGY IN GERIATRIC CARE 
e History 


e Index card 
e Classification of drugs and schedules 


हि PHARMACOKINETICS AND PHARMACO-DYNAMICS 


Introduction 

Absorption, Distribution, Metabolism, Distribution and Excretion in older adult 
Plasma concentration, half life 

Loading and maintenance dose 

Therapeutic index and drug safety 

Potency and efficacy 

Principles of drug administration 

= The rights of drug administration 

= Systems of measurement 

= Drug administration - enteral, topical, and parenteral 


7 5 PHARMACOLOGY AND CARDIOVASCULAR ALTERATIONS IN OLDER ADULT 


e Medications in the management of angina pectoris, myocardial infarction and heart failure 

e Medications in the management of dysrhythmias, heart block and conduction disturbances 

e Medications in the management of atherosclerotic disease of aorta and peripheral artery 
disease 

e Medications in the management of deep vein thrombosis 


[भागवता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


69 


Unit 


Hours 


Content 


e Institutional Protocols/Standing Orders for cardiac emergencies 


IV हि PHARMACOLOGY AND PULMONARY ALTERATIONS IN OLDER ADULTS 
e Medications in the management of status asthmaticus 
e Medications in the management of pulmonary edema 
e Medications in the management of pulmonary embolism 
e Medications in the management of acute respiratory failure and acute respiratory distress 
syndrome 
e Medications in the management of chronic obstructive pulmonary disease 
e Medications in the management of pneumonia 
e Medications in the management of pleural effusion 
e Medications in the management of atelectasis 
e Standing Orders for pulmonary emergencies 
Vv | PHARMACOLOGY AND NEUROLOGICAL ALTERATIONS IN OLDER ADULTS 
e Pain 
= WHO analgesic (pain) ladder 
=» NSAID 
= Opioid analgesia 
e Sedation 
= Gamma amino butyric acid stimulants 
= Dexmedetomidine 
= Analogizations 
= Sedation monitoring policy 
e Delirium 
= Haloperidol 
= Atypical antipsychotics 
e Medications used for local and general anaesthesia 
= Local - Amides, esters, and miscellaneous agents 
= General - Gases, Volatile liquids, IV anaesthetics 
= Non-anaesthetic drugs adjuncts to surgery 
= Patient controlled anaesthesia 
e Paralytic Medications 
= Non-depolarizing and depolarizing agents 
= Anxiolytics 
e Autonomic drugs 
= Adrenergic agents/sympathomimetics 
= Adrenergic blocking agents 
= Anti cholinergic agents 
e Medications in the management of anxiety and insomnia 
= Antidepressants 
= Benzodiazepines 
e Medications in the management of neurological conditions 
= Cerebro-vascular disease and cerebro-vascular accident 
= Encephalopathy 
= Acute head and spinal cord injury with elevated intracranial pressure 
= Coma, unconsciousness, and persistent vegetative state 
= Seizure disorder 
= Parkinsonism 
« Alzheimer’s disease 
= Bed bound patients 
e Standing orders for neurological emergencies 
VI 5 PHARMACOLOGY AND NEPHROLOGY ALTERATIONS IN OLDER ADULTS 


e Diuretics 

e Fluid replacement 
= Crystalloids 
= Colloids 

e Electrolytes 
= Sodium 


70 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


Unit 


Hours 


Content 


= Potassium 
= Calcium 
= Magnesium 
= Phosphorus 
= Bicarbonate 
e Renal conditions 
= Medications in the management of acute/chronic renal failure 
= Medications in the management of acute tubular necrosis 
= Medications used during dialysis. 
e Standing orders for nephrology emergencies 


Vil 


PHARMACOLOGY AND GASTROINTESTINAL ALTERATIONS IN OLDER 
ADULTS 

e Anti-ulcer drugs 

Laxatives 

Anti-diarrheal 

Anti-emetics 

Pancreatic enzymes 

Nutritional supplements, vitamins, and minerals 
Gastrointestinal conditions 

Medications in the management of 

= Gastrointestinal surgeries and liver transplant 
= Acute gastrointestinal bleeding 

= Hepatic failure 

= Acute pancreatitis 

= Hepatic encephalopathy 

e Standing orders for gastrointestinal emergencies 


Vill 


PHARMACOLOGY AND ENDOCRINE ALTERATIONS IN OLDER ADULTS 
e Hormonal therapy 
e Insulin and other hypoglycaemic agents 
e Endocrine critical care conditions 
= Medications in the management of hypoglycaemia and hyperglycaemia 
= Medications in the management of hypothyroidism and hyperthyroidism 
= Medications in the management of adrenal crisis 
= Medications in the management of SIADH 
e Standing orders for endocrine emergencies 


Ix 


PHARMACOLOGY AND HAEMATOLOGY ALTERATIONS IN OLDER ADULTS 

e Anticoagulants 

Antiplatelet drugs 

Thrombolytics 

Haemostatics/antifibrinolytics 

Blood and blood products indication and reaction 

= Whole blood packed red blood cells, Leukocyte-reduced red cells, Washed red blood cells, 
Fresh frozen plasma, Cryoprecipitate 

= Transfusion reactions, transfusion administration process 

= Albumin 

e Vaccines 

e Immunosuppressant 

e Chemotherapeutic drugs - alkylating agents, anti-metabolites, anti-tumour antibiotics, 
alkaloids, hormones and hormone antagonist, corticosteroids, gonadal hormones, anti- 
oestrogens, androgen antagonists, biologic response modifiers 

e Haematology conditions 
= Medications in the management of anemia thrombocytopenia 
= Medications in the management of DIC 
= Medications in the management of thrombocytopenia and acute leukemia 
= Medications in the management of tumor lysis syndrome 

e Standing orders for hematology emergencies like graft versus host disease 


[भाग Wave 


कल 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


ZI 


Unit 


Hours 


Content 


PHARMACOLOGY AND SKIN ALTERATIONS IN OLDER ADULT 
e Medications used in burn management 

e Medications used in wound management 

e Standing orders for skin critical care emergencies 


XI 


PHARMACOLOGY AND MULTISYSTEM ALTERATIONS IN OLDER ADULT 
e Medications in the management of shock, sepsis, multiple organ dysfunction, systemic 
inflammatory response syndrome, anaphylaxis 
e Medications in the management of bites, drug overdose and poisoning 
e Medications in the management of short duration fever 
= Antipyretics 
= Corticosteroids 
e Standing orders for multi system emergencies 


XII 


PHARMACOLOGY AND INFECTIONS IN OLDER ADULTS 
e Antibacterial drugs 
= Introduction 
= Beta lactams - Penicillins, cephalosporins, monobactams, carbapenems 
= Aminoglycosides 
= Anti MRSA drugs - Vancomycin 
= Macrolides 
=" Quinolones 
= Miscellaneous - lincosamide group, nitroimidazole, tetracycline and chloramphenicol, 
polymyxins, anti-malarial, anti-fungal, anti-viral, anti-protozoal drugs 
e Choice of antimicrobials 
e Infectious conditions 
= Medications in the management of HIV, Tetanus, SARS, Rickettsiosis, Leptospirosis, 
Dengue, Malaria, Chikungunya, Rabies, Avian flu and Swine flu, COVID 
= Barrier Nursing 
e Standing orders for infectious emergencies 


XI 


MISCELLANEOUS 

Polypharmacy 

Adherence to drugs 

Patient education and drug compliance 
General prescribing principles 

Drugs in Psychogeriatrics 

= Dementia 

= Delirium 

= Bipolar associative disorder 

= Depression 


= Insomnia 


Bibliography 


e = Eisen H.J. (2020). Pharmacology of Immunosuppression (I* ed.). Springer. 


e McKay G.A. & Walters M.R. (202). Clinical Pharmacology and Therapeutics (0" ed.). Wiley-Blackwell. 


e Tripathi K.D. (209). Essentials of Medical Pharmacology (87 ed.). Jaypee Brothers Medical Publishers, New 
Delhi. 
e Wynne A.L., Woo T.M. & Olyaei A.J. (2007). Pharmacotherapeutics for Nurse Practitioner Prescribers (2 ed.). 
Philadelphia: Davis. 


VI. Advanced Health/Physical Assessment 

COMPETENCIES 

l. Applies the physical assessment principles in developing appropriate system wise examination skills and specific 
to falls, drugs, bed sore etc. 


2. Uses advanced health assessment skills to differentiate between variations of normal and abnormal findings. 


3. Orders screening and diagnostic tests based on the examination findings and institutional protocols. 
4. Analyses the physical examination findings and results of various investigations and works collaboratively with 
geriatricians needed for development of diagnoses. 


72 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


5. Documents assessment, diagnosis, and management and monitors follow up care in partnership with health care 
team members, patients, and families. 


Hours of Instruction: Theory: 70 hours + Lab/Skill Lab: 48 hours 


Unit | Hours Content 


i ey INTRODUCTION 
e History taking 
e Physical examination 


System-wise assessment 


i 7 CARDIOVASCULAR SYSTEM 

e Cardiac history 

e Physical examination 

e Cardiac laboratory studies - biochemical markers, blood investigations 

e Cardiac diagnostic studies - electrocardiogram, echocardiography, stress testing, radiological 
imaging 


i i RESPIRATORY SYSTEM 

e History 

e Physical examination 

e Respiratory monitoring - Arterial blood gases, pulse oximetry 

e Respiratory diagnostic tests - Chest radiography (ventilation perfusion scanning, pulmonary 
angiography, bronchoscopy, thoracentesis, sputum culture, pulmonary function test) 


IV है NERVOUS SYSTEM 

Neurological history 

General physical examination 

Assessment of cognitive function 

Assessment of higher mental function 

Motor assessment - muscle strength, power, and reflexes 
Cerebellar function - gait 

Sensory assessment - dermatome assessment 
Neurodiagnostic studies - CT scan, MRI, PET, eye/hearing 


Vv RENAL SYSTEM 

e History 

e Physical examination 

e Assessment of renal function 
e Assessment of fluid balance 


VI ' GASTROINTESTINAL SYSTEM 

e History 

Physical examination 

Nutritional assessment 

Laboratory studies - liver function studies, blood parameters, stool tests 
Diagnostic studies - radiological studies, imaging studies and endoscopic studies 


Vil 7 ENDOCRINE SYSTEM 
e History, physical examination, laboratory studies and diagnostic studies of 
= Pituitary gland 
= Thyroid gland 
= Parathyroid gland 
= Endocrine gland - diabetes mellitus 
= Adrenal gland 


Vill y HAEMATOLOGICAL SYSTEM 
History 

Physical examination 

Laboratory studies - blood investigations 


७ 
७ 
७ 
e Diagnostic studies - bone marrow aspiration 


Ix 3 |INTEGUMENTARY SYSTEM 


[भाग ता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 73 


Unit | Hours Content 


e History 
e Physical examination 
e Pathological examination - tissue examination 


x ¥ MUSCULOSKELETAL SYSTEM 

History 

Physical examination - gait and joint assessment 

Laboratory studies - blood parameters (inflammatory markers, uric acid) 
Diagnostic studies - radiological studies 


XI 5  |REPRODUCTIVE SYSTEM (MALE & FEMALE) 
History 

Physical examination 

Laboratory studies 

Diagnostic studies 

Post menopausal problems - hot flush 


XII है SENSORY ORGANS 

e History 

e Physical examination 

e Laboratory studies 

e Diagnostic studies - radiological and imaging studies, endoscopic studies 


XT) 40 |COMPREHENSIVE GERIATRIC HEALTH ASSESSMENT 
History 

Physical examination 

Functional assessment 

Safety assessment 

ADL assessment 

Fragility assessment 

Nutritional assessment 

Psychosocial assessment 


List of skills to be practiced in the skill lab (48 hours include demonstration by the faculty and practice by the 
students) 


= Comprehensive geriatric assessment 

= Monitoring clinical parameters (system wise) & investigations 

= Invasive BP monitoring, Multi-parameter Monitors, ECG, ABG, Pulse Oximetry, Glasgow Coma Scale (GCS), 
Pain and Sedation score Motor assessment, Sensory assessment, Renal function tests, Fluid balance, acid base 
balance, electrolytes, Bowel sounds, Abdominal pressure, Residual gastric volume, Liver function tests, GRBS, 
Lab tests, Radiological and Imaging tests (system wise) 

= Ordering and interpretation of screening and diagnostic tests (system wise) (See enclosed Appendix-3) 

= Assessment of Older adults (See enclosed Assessment Guidelines) 


Bibliography 

e = Bickley L.S. & Szilagyi P.G. (208). Bates’ guide to physical examination and history taking (South Asian Ed.). 
Wolters Kluwer India Pvt. Ltd. 

e Rhoads J. (203). Advanced health assessment and diagnostic reasoning (207 Ed.). Philadelphia: Lippincott 
Williams & Wilkins. 

e Wilson S.F. & Giddens J.F. (202). Health assessment for nursing practice (7" Ed.). Elsevier - Health Sciences 
Division. 


Ir" YEAR 
GERIATRIC SPECIALTY COURSES 
(Foundations of Geriatric Nursing Practice, Geriatric Nursing - I and Geriatric Nursing - ID) 


COMPETENCIES 
l. Demonstrates knowledge about developmental, age related, and gender specific variations. 


2. Obtains relevant comprehensive and problem-focused health histories for complex, acute, critical, and chronically 
ill patients. 


74 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


Evaluates signs and symptoms, including age-appropriate changes. 

Prioritizes data collection, according to the patient’s age, immediate condition or needs, as a continuous process. 

Accurately documents relevant comprehensive and problem-focused health histories. 

Performs and accurately documents a pertinent, comprehensive, and focused physical, mental health and 

cognitive assessment. 

7. Assesses the impact of family, community, and environment, including economic, work, institutional, school, 
social, and living environments, on an individual’s health status and quality of life. 

8. Assesses the individual’s and support system’s ability to cope with and manage developmental (life stage) 
transitions. 

9. Determines the individual’s ability to participate in care, care decisions, work, school, physical, and social 

activities. 


DS. टी तक कर 


VII. Foundations of Geriatric Nursing Practice 


Hours of Instruction: Theory: 96 hours + Lab/Skill Lab: 48 hours 


Unit | Hours Content 


i | INTRODUCTION & HEALTHY AGEING 
e Biology of ageing 

e Epidemiology of human ageing 

e Immunology of human ageing 


: 7 OVERVIEW OF GERIATRIC NURSING 

Foundations of the specialty of geriatric nursing 
Demographic profile of the older population 

Health status of older adults 

Burden of geriatric care - global and national 

Impact of an ageing adult population on geriatric nursing 


e 
७ 
७ 
७ 
e 
e Health risks in older person 


0.  |GERIATRIC NURSING: CONCEPTS AND PRINICPLES 

Definition, concepts, and principles of geriatric nursing 

Ageing process 

Women’s ageing 

Nursing process 

Levels of geriatric care and role of nurse 

Geriatric care team: geriatric physician, geriatric nurse, neuro psychiatrist, occupational 
therapist, physiotherapist, ALC department staff, psycho-geriatrician, speech therapist, 
social worker, religious leader 

e Role of specialists in geriatric care and geriatric nurse practitioner 

e Principles of prevention of infections in older person 

e Standard safety measures and biomedical waste management 


IV 7 ADVANCED GERIATRIC NURSING ASSESSMENT 

e Comprehensive and focused health history and physical assessment 

e Evaluation of newly worsened health status 

e Components - clinical, functional, activities of daily living (ADL), environment, social 
support, mental status examination (MSE) 

e Multidisciplinary geriatric assessment 

e Tools and scales for assessment - cognitive scales 


Vv i2. |PSYCHOSOCIAL ISSUES RELEVANT TO GERIATRIC NURSING 
Psychosocial aspects of ageing 

Psychological changes in ageing 

Learning, motivation, attention, and perception 
Emotions 

Human behaviour and needs in crisis 

Stress and coping in crisis situations 

Attitudes and caring with humanity 

Social organization and community resources 
Leadership role in community 

Social roles and aspects in care of older persons 


[भाग ave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


75 


Unit 


Hours 


Content 


Family and family relationships 
Sociocultural influences on care of older person 


VI 


0 


INFLUENCES ON HEALTH AND ILLNESS 


A. 


Cultural 

e Demographics 

Cultural concepts 

Cultural variation in health and illness 
Concepts of intercultural communication with older adults 
Cultural theory and framework 

Family 

Role and functions of families 

Common late life family issues and decisions 
Family care giving 

Caregiver burden 

Working with ageing families - strategies 
Socioeconomic and Environment 

e Socioeconomic factors 

e Environmental influences 

e Advocacy 


= e@ @ ७ @ 


VII 


SOCIAL SUPPORT AND SERVICES FOR AGEING 


National policies and national health policies for older persons 

Ageing and its influence in society 

Role of governmental organizations and NGOs 

Agencies working for the older person: national and state 

Social support and social networking, self-help groups, older person clubs, role of police 
Welfare measures and provision for the older persons - schemes available - national and 
state 


Vill 


2 


SPECIAL NEEDS IN GERIATRICS 


A. 


Nutrition 

e Assessment 

e Nutritional advice 

e Wellness: health promotion 

e Nutrition, Exercise 

Sleep and Activity 

Stages of sleep 

Normal age-related changes in sleep 

Drugs influencing sleep 

Sleep disorders and conditions influencing sleep 
Management of sleep disorders 

Intimacy and Sexuality 

e Normal changes of ageing sexual response 

e Alternative sexual practices 

e Pathologic conditions affecting older adults’ sexual response 
e Environmental barriers to sexual practice 


. Safety 


e Risk factors in rehabilitation setting 

e Prevention 

e Major non-fall related injuries 

e Vulnerable patients 

Mental Health 

e Major mental health problems - Bipolar affective disorder, depression 
e Mental health resources 


Ix 


2 


COMMON PSYCHOPHYSIOLOGIC STRESSORS 


A. 


Chronic IlIness and Rehabilitation 
e Chronicity 


76 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


Unit | Hours Content 


e Rehabilitation 
B. Cancer 
e Overview of cancer 
e Psychosocial impact of cancer 
e Spirituality and cancer 
C. Pain 
e Overview of pain in the older adult 
D. Infection 
e Age related changes in the immune system 
e Factors affecting immunocompetence 
e Common problems and conditions 
E. Substance Abuse 
Risk factors 
Assessment 
Interventions 
Commonly abused substances in the older adult 
Future trends 
F. Loss, Dying and Death 
e Loss, grief and mourning 
e The process of dying: older person’s perspective 


i2. |LEGAL AND ETHICAL ISSUES 

e Ethical principles, ethical decision making - advance directive, Will 
e Euthanasia 

e Ethical issues in geriatric medicine 
e Strategies in promoting ethical decision making 
e Organ donation, brain death - nurses’ role 
e Government Acts 
e Help Age India 

e Senior Citizen Act 

e Social justice 

e Social agencies - role of NGO 
e End of life care 


List of skills to be practiced in the skill lab (48 hours include demonstration by the faculty and practice by the 
students) 


Assessment and health teaching on immunization 
Mini mental status examination 

Biomedical waste management 

Geriatric home visit for societal support 
Investigations: Cancer screening 


VIII. Geriatric Nursing - I 
COMPETENCIES 


l. 


2. 


3. 


Assesses the impact of an acute, critical, and/or chronic illness or injury and the health promotion needs, social 
support and physical and mental health status. 

Identifies the presence of co-morbidities, age-related changes, their impact on presenting health problems, 
potential for rapid physiologic and mental health deterioration. 

Plans diagnostic strategies and appropriate uses of diagnostic tools to screen for and prevent squeal of acute and 
critical illnesses. 

Manages the evaluation of acute, critical, and chronically ill patients through ordering, interpretation, 
performance, and supervision of diagnostic testing and clinical procedures. 

Performs specific diagnostic strategies and technical skills to monitor and sustain physiological function and 
ensure patient safety. 

Provides anticipatory guidance and counselling to individuals and their families based on identified health 
promotion needs. 


[भागवता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


Hours of Instruction: Theory 96 hours + Lab/Skill Lab: 48 hours 


Unit | Hours Content 


22 |NURSING CARE OF ELDERLY WITH SYSTEMWISE AGE RELATED CHANGES 
AND COMMON DISORDERS 


Cardiovascular function 
e Common cardiovascular problems in elderly 


Respiratory function 

e Age related changes in structure and function 

e Respiratory changes associated with anaesthesia and surgery 
e Common respiratory problems and conditions in older person 
e Bronchopulmonary infection 


Endocrine function 

e Incidence of general pathology to the endocrine system in older adult 
e Normal glucose metabolism 

e Age related changes in glucose metabolism 

e Age related changes in the thyroid 

e Common problems in thyroid 

Liver function 

e Age related changes in structure and function of liver 
e Common problems and conditions 


Gastrointestinal function 
e Age related changes in structure and function in gastrointestinal system 
e Common problems and conditions 


Urinary function 

Age related changes in urinary tract 
Common problems and conditions 
Urinary incontinence in the elderly 
Normal prostate structure and function 
Common problems in prostate 

Sexual function 


Neurological function 
e Normal age-related changes of the neurologic system 


Neurological problems 

e Transient Ischemic Attack 

e Cerebrovascular Disorders and Stroke 
e Parkinson’s disease 


Integumentary system 

e Age related changes in skin structure and function 
e Common problems and conditions 

e Infection 

e Pressure sores 

Sensory function 

Vision 

e Age related changes 

e Common complaints in vision 


Hearing and balance 

e Auditory structures and their functions 
Age related changes 

Hearing loss 

Management of hearing disability 


e 
e 
e 
e Balance 


78 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART HI—SEc.4] 


Unit 


Hours 


Content 


e Taste and smell 

e Age related changes in sensory function 

e Touch 

e Dental problems 

Musculoskeletal function 

e Age related changes in structure and function 
e Management of musculoskeletal disorders 


7 


COGNITIVE DISORDERS 


Altered thought process 

e Delirium/acute confusion state 
e Dementia 

e Depression 


4 


MENTAL DISORDERS IN ELDERLY 
Epidemiology of mental disorders 
Definition and classification of psychiatric disorders 
Depression in old age 

Bipolar disorder 

Functional psychiatric disorders in old age 
Personality and behavioural disorders 
Psycho geriatric service 

Management of psychiatric illness 
Alcoholism and the elderly patient 

Care giver’s problems 


IV 


HOME CARE SERVICES 

e Geriatric home care services in India and western countries 
Hospice care 

Care giver’s role 

Ambulatory care 


e 
e 
e 
e Assistive devices 


QUALITY ASSURANCE 

Quality assurance models applicable to geriatrics 
Standards, protocols, policies, procedures 
Infection control and practices 

Standard safety measures 

Nursing audit 

Staffing 


VI 


2 


SURGERY IN THE ELDERLY 
Preoperative assessment 

Priorities for surgery 

Surgical emergencies 

Fractures 

Pathological fractures 

Benign lesions 

Gangrene - amputation 

Elective surgery 

Post operative problems and management 


e 
७ 
७ 
७ 
७ 
७ 
७ 
e 
e 
e Anaesthesia in old age 


VII 


0 


SPECIAL PROBLEMS 


Geriatric Syndrome 

e Pressure sore 

e Care of the chronically ill 

e Care of patients with terminal illness 


[भागवता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


79 


Unit | Hours Content 


Religion and illness 
Falls 

Nursing home placement 
Syncope 

Frailty 

Palliative care 


Gynaecological problems among elderly women 
Gynaecological crisis 

Vulvovaginal inflammation 

Genital prolapses 

Postmenopausal bleeding 

Alterations in bladder function 

Hormone treatment in postmenopausal women 


Vill 0) |PREVENTIVE GERIATRICS 

e Preventing diseases and promoting health in old age 

e Theories/models of health promotion 

e Health belief model - general health practices in elderly 

e Exercise in the elderly - physical and mental domain - benefits of exercise 
e Development of anticipatory care and its rationale 

e Health promotion needs of older patients 

e Health promotion and health education in the elderly 

e 
e 
७ 
७ 


Anti-ageing interventions 
Prevention of adverse drug reaction 
Immunization 


Guidance and counselling to patients and families to meet health promotion needs 


Ix 0  |REHABILITATION 

The concepts and history of rehabilitation 

Goals of rehabilitation 

Principles of rehabilitation 

Rehabilitation in old age 

Rehabilitation as teamwork 

Self-care evaluation and management of activities of daily living 
Aids and application 

Role of physiotherapy in elderly 

Contractures and other deleterious effects of immobility 
Pressure ulcer 

Rehabilitation of stroke in the elderly 

Rehabilitation of specific diseases 

Organization and effectiveness of rehabilitation services 
Geriatric unit, day hospital, day care centre, long stay care institution 


List of skills to be practiced in the skill lab (48 hours include demonstration by the faculty and practice by the 


students) 


= Diagnostic tool: geriatric depression scale, mini cog test, CAM ICU scale 
= Psychometric testing 

= Health education on assistive devices at home 

= Quality project - infection control practice 

= Preoperative preparation 

= Care of patient with traction, splint, cast and amputation 

= Wound dressing 

= Podiatric care 

= Investigations: HUT test 


80 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


IX. Geriatric Nursing - II 

COMPETENCIES 

l. Individualizes the plan of care to reflect the dynamic nature of the patient's condition, age, developmental and life 
transitions, patients, and family’s needs. 

2. Uses pharmacologic and non-pharmacologic management strategies to ameliorate physical and behavioural 
symptoms in individuals who have psychiatric/substance misuse disorders. 

3. Prescribes medications maintaining awareness of and monitoring for adverse drug outcomes and complex medical 
regimens, especially in high-risk and vulnerable populations. 

4. Manages pain and sedation for patients with complex acute, critical, and chronic illness. 

5. Provides education and counselling to individuals and their families based on identified education and counselling 
needs. 


Hours of Instruction: Theory 96 hours + Lab/Skill Lab: 48 hours 


Unit | Hours Content 


i a INTRODUCTION 

e Morbidity and mortality in old age 

Stereotyping of ageing - common myths and facts 
Nursing process in caring for older patients 
Challenges in caring for older adults 


e 
७ 
७ 
e Role of nurse in supporting older adults 


| i MALIGNANCIES IN OLD AGE 

Cancer in old age 

Women and cancer: Breast cancer, endometrial and cervical cancer 
Cancer screening in women 

Principles of management: surgery, radiotherapy, chemotherapy 
Quality of life in older person with cancer 

Palliative care 

Hospice care 


e 
e 
e 
७ 
७ 
७ 
७ 
e Care of terminally ill - end of life care 


; 0  |ADVANCES IN GERIATRIC MEDICINE 
e Alzheimer’s disease 

e Parkinsonism 

= Osteoporosis 

= Urinary incontinence 

= Falls/prevention of fractures 

e Parenteral nutrition 

e Stroke clinic and memory clinic 

e Anti-ageing research 


IV 20 |SPECIAL CARE SETTINGS 


Acute Care 

e Acute care environment 

e Client care issues 

e Future trends and research 

e Counselling - end of life care 


Home Care 

Quality of life 

Community based long term care 
Home care 

Profile of home health agencies 
Continuity of care 

Implementing the plan of treatment 
Home care management and support 
Quality assessment and improvement 


[भाग ave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


8l 


Unit 


Hours 


Content 


Long Term Care 


Clinical aspects of the nursing facility 
Management aspects of the nursing facility 
Specialty care settings 

A resident’s perspective of life in a nursing facility 
Family involvement in nursing facility 
Innovations 

Futuristic goals in nursing care 


0 


ELDER ABUSE AND VIOLENCE 


Identification of elder abuse 
Likely victims 

Prevention and management 
Counselling client, abuser/family 


VI 


CAREGIVER STRESS 


Burden of care giving 
Assessment of caregiver burden 
Supportive the care giver 


VII 


0 


AGE FRIENDLY ENVIRONMENT 


Safety considerations, prevention of risks, fall injuries 

Modifications in home, institutions and community: roads, buildings, hospitals, public 
places, old age homes 

Technology to enhance independence 

Assisting devices 

Role of society, neighbours, police 


Vill 


THERAPEUTIC RELATIONSHIP 


Nurse patient relationship 
Therapeutic communication skills 
Therapeutic touch 

Role of a nurse in caring an elderly 
Nursing care home 


Ix 


PATIENT AND FAMILY EDUCATION AND COUNSELLING 


Challenges of patient and family education 
Process of adult learning 

Factors affecting teaching learning process 
Informational needs of families in geriatric care 
Counselling needs of patient and family 
Counselling techniques 


20 


COMMUNITY HEALTH: 
HEALTH SERVICES AND PROGRAMS FOR OLDER ADULT 


Older women in rural India 

Types of services for care of older adult 

Health promotion and disease prevention 

- Health education 

- Screening of general health 

- Screening for cancer of uterine cervix 

- Specific health promotion programs (smoking cessation, immunization) 

Curative 

- Early diagnosis and treatment of day-to-day ill health in PHC, Medicare, mobile clinics 
- Health insurance/securities 

- Diagnosis and treatment of serious ill health in secondary and tertiary care hospitals 
- Chronic care in home 

Rehabilitative 


82 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


Unit | Hours Content 


- Physiotherapy, restorative surgery, prosthesis, occupational therapy 
e Mental health services 
- Counselling services for retirement, relocation, widowhood and bereavement, drug and 
substance abuse, ambulatory treatment for mental diseases 
- Role of a geriatric nurse specialist 
- Health education: concepts, principles, approaches and methods 
- Content of health education for older person 


List of skills to be practiced in the skill lab (48 hours include demonstration by the faculty and practice by the 
students) 


Pain assessment - WHO ladder, VAS 
Administration of chemotherapy drugs 

Post monitoring of radiation therapy 

Monitoring clinical parameters (system wise) 
Total parenteral nutrition (TPN) 

Investigations : bladder ultrasound, uroflowmetry 
Bladder diary 

Pelvic floor exercise 

BLS/ACLS 

PHC visit 


Cc 


ounselling: End of life care 


Bibliography 


Cash Jill and Glass Cherya (209). Adult Gerontology Guidelines (27 ed.), Springer Publication, New York. 
Carpenter Dawn (20I9). Adult Gerontology acute care nurse practitioner Q & A review, Springer publication, 
New York. 

Charolotte Eliopoulos (2022). Gerontological Nursing (0" ed.), Philadelphia: Wolters Kluwer Publications. 
Linton Adrianne D. & Lach H.W. (2007). Matteson and McConnell’s Gerontological Nursing Concepts and 
Practice (37 ed.), Saunders Publication. 

Sharma K.L. (2007). Studies in gerontology intergenerational perspectives, Rawat Publications, Jaipur. 

Geriatric Tool Kit, Texas Nurses Association https://cdn.ymaws.com/www.texasnurses.org/resource/ 
resmgr/docs/practice/Geriatric Competency - Full .pdf 


National Medical Council: https://www.nmc.org.in/information-desk/for-colleges/pg-curricula-2., 
https://www.nmc.org.in/wp-content/uploads/209/09/MD-Geriatrics.pdf 
National Geriatric Council: https://main.mohfw.gov.in/sites/default/files/8324324520perational__ 


Guidelines NPHCE final.pdf 


APPENDIX-I 

LIST OF EQUIPMENT FOR A THIRTY BEDDED GERIATRIC WARD 
Adjustable geriatric cot wit mattress (head end, foot end elevation, cot raising facility, trapeze bar, foot board, 
side rails - 30 
IV stand - 20 
Bed side locker - 30 
Over bed trolley - 30 
Dressing trolley (Small) - 5 
Dressing trolley (medium) - 2 
Syringe pump - l0 
Infusion pump - 40 
Alpha mattress or air mattress - 25 


. Monitors - 0 

. Transport monitor/pulse oximeter - 2 
. ECG machine - | 

. Ultrasound machine (bladder) - | 

. Defibrillator - | 

. Crash cart - | 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 83 


6. 
7. 
8. 
9. 
20. 
2I. 
22. 
23. 
24. 
25. 
26. 
27. 
28. 
29. 
30. 
3. 
32. 
33, 
34. 
35. 
36. 
37. 
38. 


39. 
40. 
4l. 


Crash cart items: Ambu bag, Laryngoscope, drugs, suction catheters 
Height adjustable transfer trolley - 4 

OR trolley - | 

Wheelchair with lock - 6 

Safe slider - | 

Computer - 4 

Printers - 2 

Oxygen flowmeter - |5 

Suction port with jar - I5 

Pulmo-aid - 0 

Refrigerator - 3 (। - feeds, | - drugs, | - other use) 
Metal footstep/foot stool - 20 

Ambulation geriatric chair - 6 

Flat trolley - | 

Spotlight - 2 

Glucometer - 6 

Tuning fork - 2 

Ophthalmoscope - | 

Otoscope - | 

Knee hammer - 2 

Inch tape - 2 

Assistive devices - Walker, quadripods, tripod 
Trays with sterile sets/disposable sets for various procedures (e.g., Insertion of central venous catheter, 
tracheostomy etc.) 

Snellen’s chart 

Nebulizer - 4 

Pulse Oximeter - 2 


Other items for mobility and exercise: minimum standard 


42. 
43. 
44. 
45. 
46. 
47. 
48. 


Cervical traction (intermittent) 
Walking for gait training equipment 
Walking Sticks/Callipers 

Shoulder Wheel 

Pulley 

Walker (ordinary) 

Cervical traction (manual) 


Physiotherapy equipment 


Short wave diathermy, wax bath, Interferential Therapy Unit, Exercise Therapy Unit - Parallel Bars, Stationery 


Cycle, Mariner’s Wheel etc. Assistive Devices - Working frames, Wheelchairs, Bedside Chairs, Hoist, tilt table etc. 


Setting up geriatric ward 


Oxygen outlets - 2 

Vacuum outlets - 2 

Compressed air outlets - | 

Electric outlets (2 on each side of patients) with 3/ 5-37 pins 

Central nursing station 

The Department of Geriatrics in the Medical College hospitals should have the following building outlay for the 


inpatient and outpatient services. 


OPERATIONAL GUIDELINES 


Out Patient Department 


007 05065" 


Waiting hall/registration room - 36 sq.m. with computer, telephone. 
Three OPD Cubicles - 6 sq.m. each 

Pharmacy 

Special Clinic 

Resuscitation room 

Physiotherapy (for both out-patients and in-patients) 


84 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


ECG - |2 sq.m. 

Basic Radiology Services 
Laboratory/sample collection room 
Counselling room 

Demonstration room - 36 sq.m. 
Library 

Faculty room - |! sq.m. 
Injection/procedure room - 2 sq.m. 


Bg eS Born 


In-patient Services (30 bed ward) 


e Male wards: I5 beds (3 acute care, 7 sub-acute care and 5 long term care) 

e Female wards: |5 beds (3 acute care, 7 sub-acute care and 5 long term care) 

e =©Pantry room, linen room, nursing station, duty doctor’s room, side lab, procedure room, class room, lecture hall, 
faculty room, library, administrative office, Storeroom, bathroom with shower chair facility, shower stretcher, 
recreational hall. 


General Guidelines of Age-Friend Environment 


e Wide corridors, ramps, railings, grab bars, anti-skid tiles, adequate illumination, Allen door key lock/toilet for the 
disabled and elevators should be implemented in the outpatient and inpatient facility. 

e Items for occupational therapy services - art and craft items, indoor games items, charts, television. 

e Develop a comprehensive database, website, practice guidelines, model outpatient and inpatients records, 
assessment (cognitive and functionality). 

e Carry out research on: the biology of ageing, social and psychological aspects of ageing and family support, 
caregiver burden, epidemiology of various old age disease, innovations in interventions, anti-ageing medicine 
etc., as single centre or multi-centric studies with funding from national and international agencies. 

(Ref : MOHFW guidelines) 


APPENDIX-2 
ASSESSMENT GUIDELINES (including OSCE guidelines) 


INTERNAL ASSESSMENT (Theory and Practical) 
I* Year 


l. Theoretical Basis for Advanced Practice Nursing 
College examination of Theory only: 50 marks 
Internal assessment: 
Test paper and Quiz: 0 marks 
Written assignment/term paper: l0 marks (Global and National Healthcare Trends & Policies) 
Clinical seminar (Clinical/Care pathway in specific clinical condition/Application of specific nursing theory): 5 
marks 
Final theory exam: 25 marks 
Total: 50 marks 


2. Research Application and Evidence Based Practice in Geriatric Care 
Theory: 
Test papers: 20 marks 
Written assignment: 5 marks (Literature review/Preparation of research instrument) 
Journal club: 5 marks (Analysis of research evidence for nursing competencies) 
Total: 30 marks 


3. Advanced Skills in Leadership, Management and Teaching 
Theory: 
Test papers: |5 marks 
Journal club (Trends in Leadership/Management/Teaching): 5 marks 
Written assignment: 5 marks (Geriatric syndrome) 
Microteaching: 5 marks 
Total: 30 marks 


4. Advanced Pathophysiology & Advanced Pharmacology applied to Geriatric Nursing 
Theory: 
Test papers and Quiz: 20 marks (Pathophysiology - 0, Pharmacology - 0) 
Drug studies: 5 marks (Drug study and presentation) 
Case presentation and case study report (Pathophysiology): 5 marks 


[भागवता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


85 


4 


Total: 30 Marks 


Advanced Health/Physical Assessment 

Theory: 

Test papers: 20 marks 

Written assignment: !0 marks (Diagnostic/investigatory reports - interpretation and analysis of findings) 
Total: 30 marks 


Practicum: 

Clinical performance evaluation: !0 marks 

End of posting exam (OSCE): !0 marks 

Case presentation and case study report: 5 marks 

Internal OSCE: 25 marks 

Total Internal practical: 50 marks 

(End of posting exam can be conducted in any Geriatric Ward/unit, one practical session should be in the 
community) 


Year 


Foundations of Geriatric Nursing Practice 

Theory: 

Test papers and Quiz: 20 marks 

Written assignment: !0 marks (Government programs) 
Total: 30 marks 


Practicum: 

Clinical performance evaluation: 20 marks 

Drug studies (Drug study and presentation): 0 marks 

Case presentation and case study report (Family education/counselling): 5 marks 
Case presentation (Application of Clinical/Care Pathway): 5 marks 

End of posting exam (OSCE): !0 marks 

Internal OSCE: 50 marks 

Total Internal practical: 00 marks 


Geriatric Nursing - I 

Theory: 

Test papers and Quiz: 20 marks 

Clinical seminar and Journal club: 0 marks 
Total: 30 marks 


Practicum: 

Clinical performance evaluation: 20 marks 
End of posting exam (OSCE): !0 marks 
Clinical presentation: 0 marks 

Case study report: 0 marks 

Internal OSCE: 50 marks 

Total Internal practical: 00 marks 


Geriatric Nursing - I 

Theory: 

Test papers: 20 marks 

Clinical Seminar: ।0 marks 

Total: 30 marks 

Practicum: 

Clinical performance evaluation: 20 marks 

End of posting (OSCE): 0 marks 

Clinical presentation: l0 marks 

Case study report (Developed clinical/care pathway): l0 marks. 
Internal OSCE: 50 marks 

Total Internal practical: 00 marks 

(End of posting exam can be conducted in any Geriatric Ward/unit, one practical session should be in the 
community) 


Dissertation 
Practicum: 50 marks 


86 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


EXTERNAL (FINAL) EXAMINATION (As per schedule in syllabus) 


Theory: Short answer and essay type questions (Weightage can be decided by the University) 
{Essay 2 x 5 marks = 30, Short answers 5 x 6 marks = 30, Very short answers 5 x 2 marks = 0} 


OSCE GUIDELINES FOR INTERNAL AND EXTERNAL PRACTICAL EXAMINATION 


I* YEAR 
I. HEALTH ASSESSMENT 
INTERNAL 


OSCE: 25 marks 


CORE COMPETENCY DOMAINS 
Focused history taking 

Physical examination of a geriatric patient 
Interpretation of findings and results 
Monitoring of clinical parameters 

Scales - cognitive, depression, bedsore etc. 
Number of stations: 5 (4 + I Rest station) 
Time for each station: 0 minutes 

Marks for each station: 5 marks (As per competency Check list and allotted marks) 
Total: 4 x 5 = 20 marks 

Oral exam = 5 marks 

Total = 25 marks 


iT Oo a 


EXTERNAL 
OSCE: 50 marks 
CORE COMPETENCY DOMAINS 


Focused history taking of geriatric patient 

Focused physical examination of geriatric patient 
Interpretation of history 

Interpretation of physical exam findings 
Interpretation of results of laboratory diagnostic tests 
. Monitoring clinical parameters 

Number of stations: 0 (8 + 2 Rest stations) 

Time for each station: 0 minutes 

Marks for each station: 5 marks (As per competency check list and allotted marks) 
Total: 8 x 5 = 40 marks 

Oral exam = 0 marks 

Total = 50 marks 


9 ० # 9 ० :- 


On completion of procedural competencies in log book and clinical requirements, the NP student 


is qualified to appear for final practical examination. 


Ir YEAR 


Il. 


FOUNDATIONS OF GERIATRIC NURSING PRACTICE, GERIATRIC NURSING - I & GERIATRIC 
NURSING - II 

(The same pattern described below is followed for all the three courses respectively) 

INTERNAL 

OSCE: 50 Marks 

CORE COMPETENCY DOMAINS 


l. Focused history taking and physical examination and interpretation of findings and results 

2. Monitoring competencies (Geriatric assessment) 

3. Therapeutic interventions (Emergency procedural competencies) including drug administration 
4. Family education and counselling - breaking bad news, case education 


[aT WI—ave 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 87 


Number of stations: 5 (4 + २८४ station) 

Time for each station: 0 minutes 

Marks for each station: 0 marks (As per competency check list and allotted marks) 
Total: 0 x 4 = 40 marks 

Oral exam = 0 marks 

Total = 50 marks 


EXTERNAL 
OSCE: 00 marks 
CORE COMPETENCY DOMAINS 


Focused history taking, physical examination and interpretation of results of geriatric patient 
Monitoring competencies 

Development of care plan 

Family education and counselling 

Therapeutic interventions (Emergency procedures) including drug administration 

. Family centred care 


Number of stations: 0 (8 + 2 Rest stations) 
Time for each station: 0 minutes 


9 ० # 9 ० :- 


Marks for each station: 0 marks (As per competency Check list and allotted marks) 
Total: 8 x 0 = 80 marks 

Oral exam = 20 marks 

Total = 00 marks 


On completion of procedural competencies in log book and clinical requirements, the NP student 


is qualified to appear for final practical examination. 


Specific guidelines for using assessment scales 


ae a फा 


6 9 93.7४: 


Skin integrity - Braden scale, Norton pressure sore risk assessment scale. 

Urinary incontinence - IPSS questionnaire, male urogenital distress inventory (MUDD. 

Geriatric syndrome - SPICES Tool (sleep disorders, problems with eating or feeding, incontinence, confusion, 
evidence of falls, skin breakdown), comprehensive geriatric assessment. 

Nutritional status assessment - 72 hours recall, swallowing assessment. 

Pain - Pain scale assessment (visual analogue scale), geriatric pain assessment. 

Sleep - Pittsburgh sleep quality index (PSQD), Epworth sleepiness scale (ESS). 

Cognitive function - Geriatric Depression Scale (GDS), the Impact of Event scale, CAM - ICU - Confusion 
assessment method for ICU, Mini Cog test, TUG test, Folstein Mini Mental Status Examination (MMSE), 
IQCODE, MOCA. 

Screening for delirium, dementia and depression in older adults - nursing best practice guidelines. 

Restraints. 

Elder mistreatment assessment. 

Falls prevention - Falls Efficacy Scale - international (FES-I), Modified Morse Fall Risk scale, Performance 
oriented mobility assessment (POMA), Fall risk assessment scale (FRAT-up scale). 

Communication - Hearing screening in older adult. 

Care giver coordination - modified caregiver strain index (MCSJ). 

Activities of daily living - functional assessment - Barthel index. 

Rehabilitative measures - Self efficacy for exercise scale (SEE scale). 


APPENDIX-3 


CLINICAL LOG BOOK FOR NURSE PRACTITIONER IN GERIATRIC NURSING (NPGN) PROGRAM 


(Procedural Competencies/Clinical Skills) 
I YEAR 


S.No. Specific Competencies/Skills Number | Signature of the 


Performed Preceptor*/Faculty 


RESEARCH APPLICATION AND EVIDENCE BASED PRACTICE 


Preparation of research instrument 


Writing systematic review/literature review 


88 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART HI—SEc.4] 


S.No. Specific Competencies/Skills Number pe Signature of the 
Performed Preceptor*/Faculty 
3. |Preparation of a manuscript for publication (I* or II"? Year) 
4 [Dissertation (74 year) 


Topic: 


| om | LEADERSHIP, MANAGEMENT AND TEACHING 
l_ |Preparation of staff patient assignment 
2  |Preparation of unit budget 
3 {Preparation of staff duty roster 
4 {Patient care audit in the unit 
5 |Management of equipment and supplies 
Pi Monitoring, evaluation and writing report related to infection 
control/adverse drug reaction 
7 \Preparation of teaching plan and media for teaching 
patients/staff 
| 8 | Micro teaching/patient education sessions 
| 9 | Planning and conducting OSCE/OSPE 
0 |Construction of tests 
| शा | HEALTH ASSESSMENT 
l |Comprehensive history taking 
2 {Comprehensive geriatric assessment 
3 Focused physical examination (System wise) 
3.l |Respiratory system 
3.2 |Cardiovascular 
3.3 |Gastrointestinal 
3.4 |Nervous 
3.5 |Genitourinary 
3.6 |Endocrine 
3.7 Haematological 
3.8 |Musculoskeletal 
3.9 |Integumentary 
3.0 |Sensory organs 
a. Vision 
b. Hearing 
4  |Geriatric assessment 
5. |Assessment of muscle power 
| 6 | Gait assessment 
7 |Nutritional assessment 
| 8 | Fall risk assessment 
| 9 | Functional assessment - Barthel index 
0 |Mini Mental Status Examination 
l] |Pain assessment 
2 |Pressure sore assessment 
3 |Assessment and care of patients with dementia 
4  |Assessment and care of patients with Parkinsonism 
5 |Geriatric depression scale 
6 |Mini cog test 
7  |Timed up and Go test 


[भाग ave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


89 


S.No. Specific Competencies/Skills Number eal Signature of the 
Performed Preceptor*/Faculty 
IV |PROCEDURES TO BE PERFORMED 
l {Residual urine measurement by bladder ultrasound 
2  |Cardiac monitoring 
3 |/Arterial BP monitoring 
4  |Oropharyngeal airway 
5 |Endotracheal suctioning 
| 6 | Oral suctioning 
7 {IV cannulation/therapy 
रॉ Oxygen therapy 
a. Nasal cannula/Venturi/Simple Face mask 
b. NIV 
| 9 | Care of tracheostomy 
0 |Diet planning 
a. Soft solid 
b. Liquid diet 
ll  /|Total Parenteral Nutrition 
2 |Care of pressure sore 
3 |Elderly rehabilitation 
a. Eyecare 
4 |Exercise 
a. Swallow 
b. Speech 
c. Brandt-Daroff 
5 |Physiotherapy 
a. Chest/Limbs 
6 |Exercise 
a. Isotonic exercise 
b. Isometric exercise 
[7  |Care of patients on restraints 
a. Physical 
b. Chemical 
8 |End of life care 
9 |Counselling 
a. Patient 
b. Family 
20 |Administration of IV drugs 
2! {Intramuscular Injection 
22 |Podiatric care 
23 |Setting of ventilators 
24 |Care of patient with 
a. Ventilators 
b. Infusion pump 
25 |Home safety measures 
26 |Pain management 
a. Acute pain - visual analogue scale 
b. Chronic pain - WHO pain ladder 
27 |Care of patient on 


a. Cast 
b. Splint 
c. Traction 


90 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SECc.4] 


S.No. Specific Competencies/Skills Number pe Signature of the 
Performed Preceptor*/Faculty 


d. Amputee 


28 |Use of prosthesis/hearing aid 


29 |Care of dentures 


३0 |Use of walkers 


३]| |Use of wheelchairs 


३2 |Assistive devices for ADL 


THERAPIES 


33 |Diversional therapy 


34 |Cognitive stimulation therapy 


35 |Group therapy 


HEALTH EDUCATION 


36 |Glucose monitoring 


37 |Home care management of insulin 


38 |Self-administration of insulin 


39 |Metered dose use 


40 |Therapeutic diets 


4l |Foot care 


42 |Vaccination 


43 |Oxygen concentrators 


44 Portable suctioning 


45 |Participation in Group Counselling 


* - When the student is found competent to perform the skill, it will be signed by the preceptor. 


Students: Students are expected to perform the listed skills/competencies many times until they reach level 3 
competency, after which the preceptor signs against each competency. 


Preceptors/Faculty: Must ensure that the signature is given for each competency only after they reach level 3. 
e Level 3 Competency denotes that the NP student is able to perform that competency without supervision. 
e Level 2 Competency denotes that the student is able to perform each competency with supervision. 


e Level ] Competency denotes that the student is not able to perform that competency/skill even with supervision. 


Signature of the Program Coordinator/Faculty Signature of the HOD/Principal 
Ir YEAR 
S.No. Specific Competencies/Skills Number pee Signature of the 
Performed Preceptor*/Faculty 


ADVANCED COMPETENCIES 


l_ [Setting up, use and maintenance of geriatric ward 
equipment 


l.l  |Ventilator 


l.2 |Defibrillator 


.3. [Pacemaker 


.4 |CRASH trolley 


.5 |CPAP/BiPAP machines 


Triage 


Discharge/LAMA check list 


2 
3 |Family education and counselling 
| 4 | 
5 


Medico-legal compliance 


[भाग ave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


9] 


S.No. Specific Competencies/Skills Number eal Signature of the 
Performed Preceptor*/Faculty 
| 6 | End of life care 
7 |After life care 
| 8 | Infection control practices 
| 9 | Standard/Universal precautions 


0 |Disinfection/sterilization 
il |BLS and ACLS 
i2 |Preparation of policies/standards/protocols in ICU 


Ist & "4 Year 


Administration of medication (includes standing orders) 


a. Adrenaline 
b. 


Catecholamines (calculation, titration & administration) 


3.2 


Antidysrhythmic 
a. Amiodarone 
b. 


Adrenergic agent 
a. Ephedrine 
b. 


3.4 


Bronchodilators 
a. Aminophylline 
b. Deriphylline 

८. 


Analgesics 
a. NSAIDs 


3.6 


Antihistamine 
a. Avil 


3.7 


Antihypertensives 
a. Glyceryl] Trinitrate 
b. 


Corticosteroids 
a. Hydrocortisone 


Antiepileptics 
a. Levetiracetam 
b. 


3.0 


Muscle relaxants & Sedatives 
a. Valium 
b. 


3.I] 


Antipyretics 


3.2 


Anti Parkinson’s disease 
a. 
b. 


3.3 


Electrolyte and acid base correction agents 
(Na, K, Cal, P, Mg, Fe) 

a. Soda bicarbonate 8.4% 

b. Soda bicarbonate 7.5% 

c. Potassium chloride 

d. 3% Normal Saline (sodium chloride) 

e. 0.9% Normal Saline (sodium chloride) 


3.4 


Anti-diabetic agents 
a. Insulin 


b. 


92 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART HI—SEc.4] 


S.No. 


Specific Competencies/Skills 


Number 
Performed 


pee 


Signature of the 
Preceptor*/Faculty 


4 


Management of Cardiovascular Alterations 


4.] 


Intravenous fluid administration (Colloid/Crystalloid) 


4.2 


Blood and blood product administration 


4.3 


Application of TED stocking 


4.4 


Care of Patient on Pacemaker 


45 


Management of Pulmonary Alterations 


5.] 


Care of airway 


5.2 


Laryngeal mask airway application 


5.3 


Extubation 


5.4 


Endotracheal/tracheal suctioning - Open and closed 


5.5 


Nebulization 


5.6 


Care of patient with chest drainage tube 


5.7 


Care of patient on invasive ventilation 


5.8 


Non-invasive ventilation 


5.9 


Connecting to ventilator 


5.0 


Weaning from ventilator 


5.] 


Use of T-tube and Venturi devices 


5.2 


Weaning from tracheostomy 


5.3 


Chest physiotherapy 


6 


Management of Neurological Alterations 


6.] 


Sensory stimulation 


6.2 


Consciousness/Coma status monitoring 


6.3 


ICP monitoring 


॥7 


Management of Genitourinary Alterations 


7.] 


Care of patient on haemodialysis 


7.2 


Initiating peritoneal dialysis 


7.3 


Care of patient on peritoneal dialysis 


7.4 


Calculation of fluid replacement 


7.5 


Bladder ultrasound 


7.6 


Uroflowmetry 


7.7 


Management of bladder incontinence 
e Bladder diary/Timed voiding 

e Condom catheterization 

e Diaper use 


7.8 


Pelvic floor Exercise (Kegel’s exercise) 


8 


Management of Gastrointestinal Alterations 


8.] 


Estimation of dietary allowance 


8.2 


Therapeutic diet planning 


8.3 


Enteral nutrition - Gastrostomy/Jejunostomy feeding 


8.4 


Administration of Parenteral nutrition (TPN) 


8.5 


Hypodermoclysis 


9 


Management of Endocrine Alterations 


9.] 


Insulin therapy (sliding scale & infusion) 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 93 


S.No. Specific Competencies/Skills Number ee Signature of the 
Performed Preceptor*/Faculty 


Calculation, titration, and administration 


9.2 |Steroids-Calculation and administration 


9.3 |Foot assessment 


9.4 |Health teaching 
a. Self-administration of insulin 
b. Foot care 


20 |Ordering Investigations 


20.l |ECG 


20.2 |ABG 


20.3 |Chest X-Ray 


20.4 /Basic microbiology investigations 


20.5 |Basic biochemistry investigations 


2l |Ordering Procedures/Treatment 


2i.l |Nebulization 


2.2 |Chest physiotherapy 


2.3 |Insertion and removal of urinary catheter 


2.4 |TEDS 


2.5 |Surgical dressing 


2.6 |Application of Ichthammol Glycerine/Magnesium Sulphate 
dressing for Thrombophlebitis/extravasation 


2.7 |Pin site care for patients on external fixators 


2.8 |Isometric and isotonic exercises 


2.9 |Hot and cold applications 


2.0 |Digital evacuation 


22 |Procedures Observed 


22.] |Gastroscopy 


22.2 |Cystoscopy 
23 |Field Visit 
23.l |Old age home 


23.2 |Hospice centre 


23.3 |Day care centre 
23. 4 |Geriatric club 


* - When the student is found competent to perform the skill, it will be signed by the preceptor. 

Students: Students are expected to perform the listed skills/competencies many times until they reach level 3 
competency, after which the preceptor signs against each competency. 

Preceptors/Faculty: Must ensure that the signature is given for each competency only after they reach level 3. 

e Level 3 Competency denotes that the NP student is able to perform that competency without supervision. 

e Level 2 Competency denotes that the student is able to perform each competency with supervision. 

e Level ] Competency denotes that the student is not able to perform that competency/skill even with supervision. 
NOTE: 5-0% of procedures that are rare, can be practiced in skill lab and attained level 3 competency. 


Signature of the Program Coordinator/Faculty Signature of the HOD/Principal 


94 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART III—SEc.4] 


CLINICAL REQUIREMENTS FOR NURSE बा IN GERIATRIC NURSING PROGRAM 
I* YEAR 
S.No. Clinical Requirement (| Signature of the 
Preceptor/Faculty 
l_ |Clinical Seminar/Journal Club/Clinical Conference 


l. 


*APN - Clinical pathway in specific clinical conditions/ 
Application of specific nursing theory (Clinical Seminar) 
Title of the topic: 


.2 


*RA - Evidence search for geriatric nursing competencies 
(Clinical Conference/Journal Club) 
Title of the topic: 


.3 


*LMA&T - Trends in Leadership/Management/Teaching 
(Journal Club) 
Title of the topic: 


Clinical Rounds (With Nursing staff, faculty, students) - 
Case/Clinical Presentation 


2. 


Pathophysiology (Clinical Conditions) 
Name of the clinical condition: 


Pathophysiology (Clinical Conditions) 
Case study (Written Report) 
Name of the clinical condition: 


2.3 


Pharmacology - Drug Studies (Drugs listed under Standing Orders) - 
written report of 5 presentations (Bedside Presentations) 


Name of the drug: 


Interdisciplinary Clinical Rounds (With geriatrician) - 
Case/Clinical Presentation 
(Written reports are for submission) 


उ. 


Health Assessment (Adult) - History & Physical Examination 
(Two written reports) 

3..L. 

3..2. 

3..3. 

3..4. 

3..5. 


3.2 


Health Assessment (Geriatric) - History & Physical Examination 
(Two written reports) 

3.2.]. 

32232, 

3.2.3. 


*Advanced Practice Nursing - APN, Research Application - RA, Leadership, Management and Teaching - LM&T 


Signature of the Program Coordinator/Faculty 


Signature of the HOD/Principal 


[भागवता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


95 


CLINICAL EXPERIENCE DETAILS - I* YEAR 
Name of Ward/ Clinical Condition Number of Signature of 
Clinical Unit days care given | Faculty/Preceptor 


Signature of the Program Coordinator/Faculty 


Signature of the HOD/Principal 


Ir YEAR 
CLINICAL REQUIREMENTS FOR NURSE PRACTITIONER IN GERIATRIC NURSING PROGRAM 
S.No. Clinical Requirement [| Signature of the 
Preceptor/Faculty 
l |Clinical Seminar/Journal Club/Clinical Conference 


l] 


Foundations of Geriatric Nursing Practice (Clinical Conference) 
Title of the topic: 


Geriatric Nursing - I (Clinical Seminar) 
Title of the topic: 


Geriatric Nursing - I (Journal Club) 
Title of the topic: 


.4 


Geriatric Nursing - IT (Clinical Seminar) 
Title of the topic: 


5 


Geriatric Nursing - II (Journal Club) 
Title of the topic: 


96 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART IHI—SEc.4] 


S.No. 


Clinical Requirement 


eae 


Signature of the 
Preceptor/Faculty 


Clinical Rounds (with Nursing Staff, Faculty, Students) - 
Case/Clinical Presentation 
(Written reports are for submission) 


2. 


Foundations of Geriatric Nursing Practice 
(Family Education/Counselling) 

(Written report) 

Title of the topic: 


2.2 


Foundations of Geriatric Nursing Practice (Clinical/Care Pathway) 
Title of the topic: 


2.3 


Geriatric Nursing - I (Clinical Presentation) 
Name of the clinical condition: 


2.4 


Geriatric Nursing - I (Case Study Report) 
Name of the clinical condition: 


2.5 


Geriatric Nursing - II (Clinical Presentation) 
Name of the clinical condition: 


2.6 


Geriatric Nursing - II (Case Study Report) 
Name of the clinical condition: 


2.7 


Drug Studies (Drugs listed under Standing Orders) 
Bedside Presentation 
(Five written reports) 


Name of the drug: 


Name of the drug: 


Interdisciplinary Clinical Rounds (With geriatrician) - 
Case/Clinical Presentation 


3.l 


Geriatric Nursing - I (Clinical Presentation) 


Name of the clinical condition: 


3.2 


3.3 


3.4 


3.5 


(Case Study Report) 


3.6 


Geriatric Nursing - II (Clinical Presentation) 


3.7 


3.8 


3.9 


(Case Study Report) 


3.0 


Written Report (Developed Clinical/Care Pathway) 


Note: 


Clinical presentation can be written for case study report. 


Signature of the Program Coordinator/Faculty 


Signature of the HOD/Principal 


[भागवता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 97 


CLINICAL EXPERIENCE DETAILS - II"? YEAR 


Name of Ward/ Clinical Condition Number of Signature of 
Clinical Unit days care given | Faculty/Preceptor 
Signature of the Program Coordinator/Faculty Signature of the HOD/Principal 
APPENDIX-5 
STANDING ORDERS 


Nurse Practitioners are prepared and qualified to assume responsibility and accountability for the care of geriatric 
patients. They collaborate with intensivists, physicians, surgeons, and specialists to ensure accurate therapy for 
patients with high acuity needs. On completion of the program, the Nurse Practitioners will be permitted to administer 
drugs listed in standing orders as per the institutional standing orders. They will also be permitted to order diagnostic 
tests/procedures and therapies as per institutional protocols. 


STANDING ORDERS 


The following intravenous injections or infusions may be administered by the Nurse Practitioner during 
emergency:- 


Catecholamines 
l. Adrenaline 
2. Vasopressin 


Antidysrhythmic 
3. Amiodarone 


98 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 


Adrenergic agent 
4. Ephedrine 


Bronchodilators 
5. Aminophylline 
6. Deriphylline 
7. Tiova 
Antihistamine 

8. Avil 


Antihypertensives 
9. Glycerine trinitrate 


Corticosteroid 
0. Hydrocortisone 


Antiepileptic 
ll. Levetiracetam 


Sedatives & relaxants 
2. Valium 


Electrolytes & acid base correction agents 
3. Soda bicarbonate 8.4% 

4. Soda bicarbonate 7.5% 

5. 3% Normal saline 

6. 0.9% Normal saline 

7. Antipyretics 

8. Anti Parkinson’s drugs 


Repeat medications 
9. Calcium supplements - Sandacol, Shelcal, Osteocalcitum 
20. Oral antidiabetic agents - Metformin, Glynase, Insulin 


The following investigations and therapies may be ordered by the NPs 


Ordering Investigations Ordering Therapies 
e ECG e Nebulization 
e ABG e Chest physiotherapy 
e Chest X-Ray e Distal colostomy wash 
e Basic Biochemistry investigations - e Insertion and removal of urinary catheter for female 


Hb, PCV, TIBC, WBC Total, WBC differentials, | patients 
ESR, Electrolytes, platelets, PT, aPTT, bleeding Test feeds 
and clotting time, procalcitonin, D-dimer, TEDS 
creatinine, HbAlc, AC, PC, HDL, LDL, TIG, Surgical dressing 
Cholesterol total, HIV, HBsAg, HCV Starting and closing dialysis 
* Basic Microbiology investigations - Application of Ichthammol Glycerine/Magnesium 
blood samples for culture and sensitivity Sulphate dressing for Thrombophlebitis/extravasation. 
e Pin site care for patients on external fixators 
e Isometric and isotonic exercises 
e Digital evacuation 


INSTITUTIONAL STANDING ORDERS AND PROTOCOLS 


In every hospital, the standing orders for drug administration with specific dosage to be administered during 
emergency situations can be made available as guidelines for NPGN graduates. The NP students will be trained to 
administer these drugs under supervision by preceptors/NP faculty. The protocols for ordering selected investigations 
and carrying out specific therapeutic procedures can also be available in every hospital that trains NPGN students. 

DR. T. DILEEP KUMAR, Chairman 


[ADVT.-IHI/4/Exty./6!/2024-25] 


Uploaded by Dte. of Printing at Government of India Press, Ring Road, Mayapuri, New Delhi-0064 
and Published by the Controller of Publications, Delhi-0054. 


GORAKHA NATH 
/ADAVA 


